2
THE PIONEER.
I was travelling a few years ago, in the
northern
part of Illinois, where the settlements, now
thinly scattered, were but just commenced. A
few hardy men, chiefly hunters, had pushed
themselves
forward in advance of the main body of
emigrants, who were rapidly but quietly taking
possession of the fertile plains of that beautiful
state; and their cabins were so thinly scattered
along the wide frontier, that the traveller rode
many miles, and often a whole day together,
without
seeing the habitation of a human being. I had
passed beyond the boundaries of social and civil
subordination, and was no longer within the
precincts
of any organized country. I saw the camp
of the Indian, or met the solitary hunter,
wandering
about with his rifle and his dog, in the full
enjoyment of that independence, and freedom from
all restraints, so highly prized by this class of our
countrymen. Sometimes I came to a single log
hut, standing alone in the wilderness, far removed
from the habitations of other white men, on a
delightful
spot, surrounded by so many attractive
and resplendent beauties of landscape, that a prince
might have selected it as his residence; and again
I found a little settlement, where a few families,
far from all other civilised communities, enjoyed
some of the comforts of society among themselves,
and lived in a state approaching that of the social
condition.
But whether I met the tawny native of the forest,
or the wild pioneer of my own race, I felt equally
secure from violence. I found them always
inoffensive
,
and usually hospitable. That state of
continual warfare, which marked the first
settlements
upon the shores of the Ohio, had ceased to
exist. The spirit of the red man was broken by
repeated defeat. He had become accustomed to
encroachment, and had learned to submit to that
which he could not prevent. However deeply he
might feel the sense of injury, and however fiercely
the fires of revenge might burn within his bosom,
too many lessons of severe experience had taught
him to restrain his passions. Bitter experience
had inculcated the lesson, that every blow struck
at the white man recoiled with ten-fold energy
upon himself.
I found the pioneers a rude but a kind people.
The wretched hovels, built of rough logs, so
carelessly
joined together as to afford but a partial
protection from the storm, afforded a welcome
shelter, when compared with the alternative of
camping out
, which I had been obliged to adopt
more frequently than was agreeable. Their tables
displayed little variety, but they were spread with
a cheerful cordiality that was delightful to the
weary traveller. There were venison, poultry,
rich milk, and excellent bread, in abundance.
There was honey too, for those that liked it, fresh
and fragrant from the cell of the wild bee. But
the smile of the hostess was that which pleased me
most; her hospitable reception of the tired
stranger
the
alertness with which she prepared the
mealher attention to his wantsthe sympathy
she expressed for any misadventure that had
befallen
him, and the confidence with which she
tendered
the services of her man, when it happened
that the more slowly spoken host faltered in the
performance of any of the rites of hospitality;all
these, while they afforded the evidence of a noble
trait of nationality, which I recognised with pride
as a western American, reminded me also of the
delicacy and quickness of perception with which a
woman recognises the wants of him who has no
mother to bring him milk, no wife to grind his
corn.
I halted once upon the Starved Rock, a spot
rendered memorable by a most tragic legend which
has been handed down in tradition. It is a
stupendous
mass of insulated rock, standing upon the
brink of the Illinois river, whose waters wash its
base. Viewed from this side, it is seen to rise
perpendicularly, like the ramparts of a tall castle,
frowning over the still surface of that beautiful
stream, and commanding an extensive prospect of
low, but richly adorned, and quiet, and lovely
shores. Passing round, the bulwark of rock is
found to be equally precipitous and inaccessible on
either side, until the traveller reaches the rear,
where a narrow ledge is found to slope off from the
summit towards the plain, affording the only means
of access to this natural fortress. Here a small
tribe of Indians, who had been defeated by their
enemies, are said to have taken refuge with their
wives and children. The victorious party
surrounded
the rock, and cut off the wretched
garrison
from all possibility of retreat, and from every
means of subsistence. The siege was pressed
with merciless rigour, and the defence maintained
with undaunted obstinacyexhibiting, on either
side, those remarkable traits of savage character:
on the one, the insatiable and ever vigilant thirst
for vengeance; on the other, unconquerable
endurance
of suffering. The position is so inaccessible,
that any attempt to carry it by assault was wholly
2*
impracticable, and the dreadful expedient was
adopted of reducing it by starvationan expedient
which was rendered inevitably and rapidly
successful
,
by the circumstance that the summit of the
rock afforded no water, and that the besieged party
had laid in no supply of provisions.
It is shocking to reflect on such warfare. There
is nothing in it of the pomp, or pride, or
circumstance
,
which often deceive us into an admiration
of deeds of violence. In reading of the stern
conflict
of gallant men who meet in battle, our feelings
are enlisted by the generosity which exposes life
for life. The plumed troops, and the big wars,
stir up the soul to a momentary forgetfulness of
the vices they engender, and the wretchedness
they produce, though we cannot agree with the
poet, that they make ambition virtue. We
admire the genius which plans, and the talent that
executes, a successful stratagem, and pay the
homage
of our respect to any bright development of
military science. Courage always wins applause;
we cannot withhold our approbation from a daring
act, even though the motive be wrong. But
bravery
on a fair field, and in a good cause, becomes
heroism, and warms the heart into an enthusiastic
admiration. How different from all this, and from
all that constitutes the chivalry of warfare, and
how like the cold-blooded sordidness of a deliberate
murder, was that savage act of starving to death a
whole tribe,the warriors, the aged, the females,
and the children! And such, in fact, became the
fate of that unhappy remnant of a nation which had
once possessed the sovereignty over these beautiful
plains, and had hunted, and fought, and sat in
council, in all the pride of an independent people.
The pangs of hunger and thirst pressed them, but
they maintained their post with obstinate courage,
determined rather to die of exhaustion, than to
afford their enemies the triumph of killing them in
battle or exposing them at the stake. Every
stratagem
which they attempted was discovered and
defeated
.
When they endeavoured to procure water
in the night, by lowering vessels attached to long
cords into the river, the vigilant besiegers detected
the design, and placed a guard in canoes to prevent
its execution. They all perishedone, and only
one, excepted. The last surviving warriors
defended
the entrance so well, that the enemy could
neither enter nor discover the fatal progress of the
work of death; and when, at last, all show of
resistance
having ceased, and all signs of life disappeared,
the victors ventured cautiously to approach, they
found but one survivora squaw, whom they
adopted
into their own tribe, and who was yet living, at
an advanced age, when the first white men
penetrated
into this region.
One morning, on resuming my journey, I found
that my way led across a wide prairie. The road
was a narrow foot-path, so indistinct as to be
scarcely visible among the high grass. As I stood
in the edge of a piece of woodland, and looked
forward
over the extensive plain, not the least
appearance
of forest could be seennothing but the grassy
surface of the broad natural meadow, with here
and there a lonely tree. It was in the spring of
the year, and the verdure was exquisitely fresh
and rich. The undulating plain, sloping and
swelling
into graceful elevations, was as remarkable for
the beauty of its outline as for the resplendent
brilliancy
of its hues. But although the prairie was
so attractive in appearance, there was something
not pleasant in the idea of crossing it alone. The
distance over it, to the nearest point of woodland,
was thirty miles. There was, of course, neither
a house nor any shelter by the waynothing but
the smooth plain, with its carpet of green richly
adorned with an endless variety of flowers. To
launch out alone on the wide and blooming desert,
seemed like going singly to sea; and it was
impossible
to avoid feeling a sense of lonesomeness when
I looked around, as far as the eye could reach,
without seeing a human being or a habitation, and
without the slightest probability of beholding either
within the whole day. As I rode forth from the
little cabin which had given me shelter through
the night, I could not avoid looking back repeatedly
at the grove which surrounded it, with a
wistfulness
like that of the mariner as he regards a slowly
receding shore. But the sun was rising in
majestic
lustre from the low distant horizon, shedding a
flood of light over the placid scene, and causing
the dew-drops that gemmed the grass to sparkle
like a silver tissueand I spurred my steed
forward
with mingled sensations of delight and
pensiveness
.
I soon became convinced that the journey of this
day was likely to prove disagreeably eventful.
There had recently been some heavy falls of rain,
and the ravines which intersect the prairie, and
serve as drains, were full of water. Some of these
are broad, and many of them too deep to be crossed
when filled, without obliging the horse to swim;
and the banks are often so steep, that, before the
rider is aware of his danger, the horse plunges
forward headlong, throwing the unwary traveller
over his neck into the stream. I rode on,
however
,
wading through pools and ravines, but happily
escaping accident, and meeting with no place
sufficiently
deep to try the skill of my steed in the
useful art of swimming, though the water often
bathed his sides, and sometimes reached nearly to
his back. Nor was this allmisfortunes never
come single. The clouds began to pile
themselves
up in the west,rolling upward from the
horizon portentously black. The signs were
ominous
of a day of frequent and heavy showers. But
how could I help myself? On a prairie there is
no refuge from the fury of the storm, any more
than there is upon the ocean; and to warn a
traveller
that the rain is soon to fall, is about as
practically
useful to him as would be the inculcation of
that ancient canon of the church,No man may
marry his grandmother. I looked back at the
clouds, and then looked forward to a wetting. It
is vexatious to be caught thus. A shower-bath is
pleasant enough when taken voluntarily, but not
so when it must be received upon compulsion. To
be wet is no great misfortune, nor is there any
thing dangerous or melancholy in the occurrence.
But this only makes it the more provoking. If
there was any thing pathetic in the catastrophe of
a ducking, or any bravery to be evinced in bearing
the pitiless peltings of the storm, it might do. But
there is no sympathy for wet clothes, nor does a
man earn any tribute of respect for his patient
endurance
,
when sitting like a nincompoop under the
outpourings of a thundergust. The whole affair
is undignified and in bad taste. Few things so
humble one's pride, and make one feel so utterly
insignificant, and so like a wet rag, as to be soaked
to the skin against our own consent.
It was thus that I felt on this unlucky day. The
clouds rolled on until the whole heavens became
overcast. That splendid sun which had risen so
joyously, and lighted up the landscape, and
gladdened
the face of nature, was obscured, and heavy
shadows pervaded the plain. The clouds settled
down, until the low arch of suspended fluid appeared
to rest upon the prairie. I drew on my great coat.
A blast of wind swept past methen the rain fell
in torrents upon my back, as if poured out from ten
thousand water buckets. What a dunce was I
to put on my over-coat, which only served as a
spunge to suck in the descending cataract, and load
me down with an accumulated weight. The rain
poured in streams from the eaves of my hatit
beat upon my neck, and insinuated itself under my
clothesit ran down into my boots, and filled them
until they overflowed. I felt cowed, crest-fallen,
hen-peckedI compared myself to a drowned rat
to a pelted incumbent of the pilloryto any
thing but an honest man, a republican, and a
gentleman
.
I got vexed, and kicked my spurs into
my horse, who, instead of mending his pace, only
threw up his head indignantly, as if to reproach
me for the supplementary torture thus gratuitously
bestowed upon my companion in trouble. I
relented
,
drew in my rein, stopped short, and just sat
still and took itand presently the rain stopped
also. It cannot rain always.
I drew a long breath, and looked around me, as
the war of the elements ceased. My saturated
garments hung shapelessly about my person, and
I had the cold comfort of knowing that there they
must continue to hang, and I to shiver under them,
until all the particles of moisture should be carried
away by the slow process of evaporationfor the
rain had penetrated my saddle-bags and soaked my
whole wardrobe. The clouds still looked watery,
and were rolling up in heavy masses, portentous of
new and repeated showers. If it would not have
been unmanly, and unlucky too, I should have
turned back, and regained the shelter of my last
night's lodgingsbut I was as wet as I could be,
andas General Washington said when he was
sitting for his portraitin for a penny, in for a
pound.
As I looked about me I perceived, at a great
distance, a horseman approaching in my rear, and
travelling in the same direction with myself. I
determined to wait for him,the more readily, as
I had just arrived at the brink of a ravine which
was broader and apparently deeper than any I had
passed, and in which, in consequence of the recent
shower, the water was rushing rapidly. Any
company
at such a time was better than none: I was
willing to run the risk of being scalped by a
Winnebago
,
talked out of my senses by a garrulous
Kentuckian, or questioned to death by a travelling
Yankee, rather than ride any further alone.
As the traveller approached me and halted, with
the courtesy usual in the country, I was struck
with his appearance. From his countenance one
would have pronounced him to be a soldier, but his
garb was that of a methodist preacher. Dressed
in the coarse homespun fabric which is made, and
almost universally worn, in this region, there was
yet a dignity in the air and conduct of this
stranger
which was independent of apparel. His coarse
and sunburnt complexion was that of a person who
had been exposed to the elements from childhood.
It was not scorched and reddened by recent
exposure
,
but regularly tanned and hardened, until its
texture would have bid defiance to the attacks of a
musquito, or any other insect or reptile of less
muscular powers than the rattlesnake. His
features
were composed, but the air of perfect calm
that rested upon them was that of reason and
reflection operating upon a vigorous mind, which
had once been violently excited by passion. There
could be no mistake in the expression of these
thin compressed lips, indicating unalterable
resolution
and sternness of purpose. The high relief,
and strong development of the muscles of the face,
evinced the long continued impulse of powerful
emotion. But the small gray eye was that which
most attracted attention. It was fierce, and bold,
yet subdued. Time and the elements had driven
the blood from the cheeks, but the eye retained
all the fire of youth. There was an intensity in
its glance which caused another eye to sink or turn
aside, rather than gaze at it directly; and this
3
was not in consequence of any thing sinister or
repulsive in the expression, but because the power
of vision seemed to be so concentrated and intense
as to defy concealment. There was a vigilance,
too, about that eye, as I had afterwards occasion to
observe, which seemed never to sleep, and suffered
nothing to escape its attention. Without at all
disturbing the sedate demeanour of the body, and
the nearly motionless position of the headthe
eye, moving quietly and almost imperceptibly
under the lid, watched all that passed around,
while the ear caught the slightest sound with an
acuteness which was extraordinary to one not
accustomed to this perfect exercise of the faculty
of attention.
In the wilderness, it is well understood that
strangers who meet may address each other with
frankness: it was soon discovered that we were
travelling in the same direction, and agreed that
we should go together. The stranger took the
lead; and if I was at first struck with his
appearance
,
I was now even more surprised at his perfect
composure, under circumstances which were
certainly
unpleasant, and perhaps dangerous. He
rode into the ravine before us, as carelessly as
if it had formed a part of the hard path, neither
changed position nor countenance as his horse
began to swim, managed the animal with the most
perfect ease and expertness, and, on reaching the
opposite shore, continued to move quietly forward,
without seeming to notice the splashing and
puffing
which it was costing me to effect the same
operation.
As we rode on we found the earth saturated,
and the surface of the plain flowing with water.
Throughout the day the showers were frequent
and heavy, gust after gust passed over us, each as
furious as the last. We had to wade continually
through pools, or to swim our horses through
torrents. My companion minded none of these
things, and I became astonished at the
imperturbable
gravity with which he encountered those
difficulties, which had not only fatigued me nearly
to death, but so worried my patience that I had
grown nervous and irritable. On he plunged,
through thick and thin, selecting the best paths
and crossing placesguiding his horse with
consummate
skillfavouring the animal by avoiding
obstacles, and taking all advantages which
experience
suggested,yet pushing steadily on through
impediments which, at first sight, seemed to me
impassable. On such occasions he took the lead,
as he did generally along the narrow path which
we could only travel comfortably in single file;
but, when the ground permitted, we rode abreast
and engaged in conversation.
Towards evening we arrived at the brink of a
small river, not wide, but brim-full, and whose
stream swept along impetuously, bearing logs and
the recently riven branches of trees upon its
foaming
bosom. The idea of swimming on the backs
of our tired horses, over such a torrent, was not to
be entertained; and I actually groaned aloud, in
despair, at the thought of being obliged to spend
the night upon its banks. But my companion,
without halting, observed calmly, that a more
favourable place for crossing might possibly be
found; and, turning his horse's head along the
brink of the river, began to trace its meanders.
Presently we came to a spot where a large tree
had fallen across, the roots adhering to one bank
while the top rested upon the other. My
companion
dismounted and began to strip his horse,
leaving nothing on him but the bridle, the reins of
which he fastened carefully over the animal's
head, and then leading him to the water, drove
him in. The horse, accustomed to such
proceedings
,
stepped boldly into the flood, and, stemming
it with a heart of controversy, swam snorting to
the opposite shore, followed by my trusty steed.
We then gathered up our saddles, and other
plunder, and mounting the trunk of the fallen
tree, crossed with little difficulty, caught our steeds
who were waiting patiently for us, threw on our
saddles, and proceeded.
It was night when we reached a cabin, where
we were hospitably entertained. Kindly as
strangers
are always received in this region, I could
not but observe that the ecclesiastical character of
my companion excited, on this occasion, an unusual
assiduity of attention and homage of respect. The
people of our frontier are remarkable for the
propriety
of their conduct in this particular.
However
rude or careless their demeanour towards
others may sometimes be, a minister of the gospel
is always received at their houses with a mixture
of reverence and cordiality, which shows the
welcome given him to be as sincere as it is
liberal. They seem to feel unaffectedly grateful
for the labours of these devoted men in their
behalf, and to consider themselves honoured, as
well as obliged, by their visits. And none deserve
their gratitude and affection in a greater degree
than the preachers of that sect to which my
companion
belonged. They are the pioneers of
religion
.
They go foremost in the great work of
spreading the gospel in the desolate places of our
country. Wherever the vagrant foot of the hunter
roams in pursuit of gamewherever the trader is
allured to push his canoe by the spirit of traffic
wherever the settler strikes his axe into the tree,
or begins to break the fresh sod of the prairie, the
circuit-riders of this denomination are found
mingling
with the hardy tenants of the wilderness,
curbing their licentious spirit, and taming their
fierce passions into submission. They carry the
3*
Bible to those, who, without their ministry, would
only
See God in clouds, or hear him in the wind.
They introduce ideas of social order, and civil
restraint, where the injunctions of law cannot be
heard, and its arm is not seen. And these things
they do at the sacrifice of every domestic comfort,
and at the risk of health and life. At all seasons,
and in all weathers, they go fearlessly on; riding
through trackless deserts, encamping in the open
air, crossing rivers, and enduring the same
hardships
which beset the hunter in the pursuit of his
toilsome calling, or the soldier in the path of
victory.
These reflections occurred to my mind when I
recalled the superiority over myself, young and
vigorous as I thought I was, which my companion
had shown in surmounting the difficulties of a
border journey. As I saw him seated at the
cheerful fireside of the woodsman, I was surprised
to perceive how little he seemed affected by the
fatigues of the day, how totally he appeared to
forget them, and with what ease and earnestness
he conversed with the family on serious topics
suggested by himself. He sat with them as their
equal and their friend. He enquired familiarly
about their health, their crops, their cattle, and
all their concernsled them gradually to speak of
their moral habits, and, finally, of their religious
opinions. As the time to retire approached, he
drew the sacred volume from his pocket, and
proceeded
to the performance of that service which
has always struck me as the most solemn and
affecting
of religious exercisesthe worship of the
familywhere those united by the tenderest ties
of affection kneel together before the throne of
grace, to render their humble tribute of thanks
for blessings received, and to invoke for each
other the continued protection of Heaven.
On the following morning we departed at the
dawn. I accompanied my new acquaintance
several
days, during which we experienced a variety
of adventures and hardships; and I had many
opportunities for observing the courage of my
companion, his perfect self-possession under every
vicissitude, and his skill in all the arts of the
backwoodsman. He was the most accomplished
woodsman that I have ever met. No danger
could daunt him, no obstacle impeded our way
which he had not some expedient to obviate or
avoid. He was never deceived as to the points of
the compass or the time of day. If our path
became dim, or seemed to wind away from the
proper direction, he struck off without hesitation
across the prairie, or through the forest, and
always reached the place which he sought with
unerring certainty. Community of peril and
adventure
soon begets friendship, and our casual
acquaintance ripened speedily into intimacy. I
became struck with the conversational powers of
my companion; though habitually taciturn, he
sometimes grew social and communicative, and
then his language was energetic, his train of
thought original, and his figures bold and
rhetorical
.
He seemed to have no acquaintance with
books, but had studied nature, and had stored his
mind with a fund of allusions drawn from her
ample volume. There was something mysterious
about him that excited my curiosity. His
peaceful
garb and holy calling were entirely inconsistent
with his military bearing, his keen jealous eye, his
intimate acquaintance with the artifices of the
hunter, and the wistful glances which I
sometimes
saw him throw at the rifles of the persons
we occasionally met. At last I ventured to
suggest
the impressions made upon my mind by these
seeming contradictions, and was gratified by a
frank relation of his history. It was minutely
detailed in the course of several conversations.
I cannot pretend to repeat his wild emphatic
language
,
but will give the story as nearly as I can
in his own manner.
THE PIONEER'S TALE.
There are some events in my life, said my
friend, to which I cannot look back without
shuddering
.
Although time has cooled my feelings,
and given a better tone to the decisions of my
judgment, it has not destroyed the vividness of
those impressions which were made upon my
memory in childhood. They still present
themselves
with all the familiarity of recent
transactions
;
and there are times when a peculiar
combination of circumstances awakens them with
a freshness that seems to partake more of reality
than of recollection, and when I can hardly
persuade
myself that the same scenes are not again
about to be acted over. Sometimes a particular
state of the atmosphere, the position of the clouds,
and the distribution of light and shade, give a
character to the landscape which transports me
back in a moment to the days of childhood, and
pictures, in living truth upon my imagination, an
event which occurred under such circumstances,
as to have connected it indissolubly with those
natural appearances. A sound has suddenly poured
in a train of associations: the song of the bird in
some distant tree, the hooting of an owl, the long
dissonant bay of the wolf, borne on the still air
when the moonlight reposed on the tops of the
trees, has awakened reminiscences which reach
back almost to infancy.
I have but an indistinct recollection of my father.
I have endeavoured to preserve the impression, for
there is a sacredness connected with his memory,
which renders it dear to my heart; but it is so
dim, and so shadowed over by other images, that
I know not whether it be the real impress made by
his kindness on my young nature, or the offspring
of fancy. He was one of the pioneers who came
to the forests of Kentucky, among the first
adventurers
to that scene of disastrous conflict. My
mother followed his footsteps to the wilderness,
bearing me, an infant, in her arms, resolved to
participate in the vicissitudes of his fortune,
however
precarious, and to brave all the dangers and
hardships of a border life, rather than endure the
greater pain of separation. Their cabin was
reared upon the shores of the Kentucky river, in
one of the most blooming valleys of that Eden,
which nature seems to have created in a moment
of prodigal generosity. They were happy; though
destitute of all that constitutes the felicity of the
larger portion of mankind. Without society, with
no luxuries, and with few of the comforts of
civilised
life, they were content in the society of each
other. My father was a bold and successful hunter;
he delighted to rove over those fertile plains,
whose magnificent forests, abounding in game, and
rich in beauty, were so alluring to every lover of
sylvan sport. Having selected an excellent tract
of land, from which he began to clear the trees,
he indulged, like others, in flattering anticipations
of the wealth and independence which would
crown his labours, when these broad lands should
become the seat of an industrious population, and
when Kentucky, then the paradise of hunters,
should be the garden of Western America. These
were not visionary dreams; though he and others
who indulged them did not live to behold their
accomplishment
,
their descendants have seen them
abundantly fulfilled.
This spot was the birth-place of my sister. I
remember her too, with a fondness that no
subsequent
emotion has equalled or effaced. I cannot
forget her, for she was my only playmate. The
bitter moment when I realised the truth, that this
sweet child was separated from us, to be restored
no more in this world, caused a gush of anguish,
almost too strong for the tenderness of my young
affections, and left a wound which saddened my
spirits throughout the years of my early life.
Year after year rolled away, and my parents
continued in the wilderness, almost alone, and
exposed to continual danger. At first, the
frequent
alarms caused by the incursions of the
savages, and the many vicissitudes incident to
their situation, produced discontent, and they
would probably have returned to North Carolina,
had it not been for the shame of turning their
backs on danger, and leaving others exposed to
that which they would have avoided. But the
burthen gradually grew lighter, and their strength
to bear it increased. The little cabin appeared
more and more comfortable, because its inmates
became accustomed to its narrow dimensions, and
its meagre accommodations. It was their HOME;
it was the spot where they began to live for each
other, to enjoy the endearments of conjugal
affection
,
and to accumulate the comforts of domestic
life around them; and every year brought some
addition to their little circle of enjoyments, and
added new links to the chain of agreeable
associations
,
which at last rendered this retreat,
savage as it was, the dearest place to them on
earth. So my mother has told me; and I well
remember the glow of feeling with which she
spoke of those years, and of that spot which was
her first home in the wilderness.
She had to endure many sufferings; but they
were light when placed in the balance against
the pleasures that sweetened her existence. Her
husband cherished her with tenderness; and with
the shield of his affection around her, the clouds
of sorrow, though they might sadden her heart
for a moment, could not chill it with the
withering
blight which falls on those who are alone in
the world. In the labours of husbandry, they
toiled as others toil: their hopes were sometimes
disappointedthe frost blasted their grain, a
drought shortened their crops, the enemy ravaged
their fields, or drove away their cattle, and they
found themselves as poor as when they first began
the world. But they lived in a plentiful country;
their neighbours, though few, were hospitable,
and they never knew want. The pangs of
hunger
the
deeper anguish of listening to the cries
of famishing children, are not among the evils
which infest the dwelling of the American
borderer
.
She had her hours of solitude; when my
father was employed in wielding the axe, or
guiding the plough, with his loaded rifle at hand,
and his dog keeping watch, to prevent surprise
by the Indians, she pursued her appropriate
duties in silence and pensiveness at home. But
she was working for him, and this reflection
supported
her in his absence, until his return brought
an ample recompense for the temporary
deprivation
of his society. Those who reside in towns,
or in thickly settled neighbourhoods, cannot
understand
the full force of this language; but
thousands of matrons are daily realising upon the
frontiers of our country, that which I describe.
The young wife has left father and mother to
cleave unto her husbandshe has abandoned the
parental roof, the home of childhood, the
companions
4
of her infancythe tenderness of a proud
father, the care of an experienced mother, are
hers no longershe has left the circle of intimate
friends by whom she is known and appreciated
and she has followed cheerfully, in the buoyancy
of hope and love, the footsteps of the husband of
her choice, to some spot beautifully embellished
by the hand of nature, where they anticipate all
the joys of Arcadian felicity. But their dwelling
stands alone, separated from all others by miles
of forest, or uninhabited prairie. All her
affections
are concentrated upon him who is her only
friend and sole companion; and that tie which
is ordinarily so sweet, so strong, and so
indissoluble
,
becomes more powerful by the absence of all
other objects of attachment or companionship.
The office of the husband assumes a tenderer
and holier character,for he is the only adviser,
friend, and protector, of her who has forsaken all
for him. In his absence she sits alone, for the
time being a widowed and desolate creature. If
disease suddenly invade the dwelling there is no
friend nor neighbour at hand; if an accident
befal her infant, she has perhaps no messenger
to send for assistance; and in those early times,
in which the scenes that I relate occurred, there
was the continual terror of the savage, pressing
like the hideous monster of an unquiet dream,
upon the bosom of the wife, who, in the absence
of her husband, was terrified alike by his
exposure
to danger, and her own unprotected
condition
.
Often did the young mother, of those
days, hide her infant in some secret place, while
she pursued her domestic labours.
My father, fearless himself, placed too little
confidence in the reality of such perils; and
although generally at home, suffered himself
occasionally
to be persuaded to join a hunt, or a
war party. Sometimes a longer hunt than usual,
or an accident, detained him from home all
night, and then my mother passed the sleepless
hours in listening to catch the sound which
might announce his return, and dreading the
moment when the stealthy footstep of the Indian
might invade the sanctity of her dwelling. On
such occasions, she would hide her sleeping
infants, in some secret spot, not likely to be
suspected, and then retire to her own bed,
awaiting
the result in anxious suspense. But the
severest of all the trials of her fortitude came,
when the pioneers were summoned to the field,
and my father joined the parties of armed
rangers
,
who drove the savages from our settlements,
or pursued them to their own villages. Then it
was, that day after day, and night after night, she
watched, and wept, and prayed, and felt herself
already bowed down in anticipation, under the
hopeless grief of an imaginary widowhood.
At length the blow came. The storm, whose
voice had often been heard at a distance, and
which had thrown its lengthened shadow over
our little dwelling, burst over us in the fulness of
its destructive energy. One day my father had
gone out to a piece of ground which he was
clearing, not far from the house, accompanied
by a few of the neighbouring men, who had
assembled to assist him in rolling some large
logs into heaps, for burning. My mother was
employed in sewing, while my little sister and
myself played on the floor. She heard the crack
of a rifle, in the direction of the newly cleared
ground, and as this was always a sound which
excited
interest in the mind of the wife of a pioneer,
in those days of continual warfare, she hastily
stepped to the door to listen. A single report
did not necessarily imply danger, for the farmers
always carried their rifles with them to the field
of labour; and they might have fired at one of
the wild animals with which the forest abounded.
But another and another report followed in quick
successionand then the shrill war-whoop of the
Indianthat terrific sound, which once heard,
is never forgotten. The little party had been
attacked by the savages. My mother rushed
out of the house. Her first impulse was to
hasten to the scene of action, to aid her husband
with her feeble strength, or die by his side. But
the recollection of her children, and the
conviction
that she could render no service in the battle,
but might endanger the safety of her little ones
by abandoning the spot which was her post of
duty, restored her presence of mind; and she
climbed to the top of a high fence, to catch, if
possible, a view of the combatants. The guns
continued to be discharged in rapid succession;
she saw the smoke rising in thin columns from
each explosion, and settling in a dense cloud over
the field of conflict, and, under the dark shadow
of the edge of the forest, even the flashes were
visible. What a scene for a wife to witness!
The yells of the Indians were mingled with the
shouts of the white menthe screams of anguish,
and the horrible exclamations of revenge, were
borne together to the ear of the affrighted and
only spectator of this bloody drama.
In this moment of horror, the distracted mother
heard the piercing screams of one of her children,
and rushed instinctively to the house, expecting
to find that the savages had also approached in
that direction. My little sister had fallen into
the fire, and was severely burned. She snatched
up her child, began to tear the blazing clothes
away from it, and soon ascertained, that the
injury, though severe, was not dangerous. While
thus employed, she became conscious that the
war-whoop had died away, and the firing ceased.
4*
What a moment for the wife and mother! What
excruciating torments are inflicted upon the
helpless
dependents, and inoffensive companions of
man, by his ambition, his fierce passions, and
his reckless prodigality of life! The battle was
over, and the slain were lying upon the field.
She knew not certainly that any had fallen, but
the probability was, that even if the white men
were victorious, the triumph had been purchased
by a heart-breaking loss to some unhappy wife,
or wretched motherperhaps to herself. But if
the Indians had prevailed, how accumulated the
horror of her situation! The tomahawk might
even now be performing its brutal office in
despatching the vanquished, or mutilating the
dead, and in a few moments she might be
compelled
to witness the expiring agonies of her
children!
She wept bitterly over her screaming infant,
and almost blamed the unconscious child that
detained her from rushing to her husband.
Unable
to restrain her impatience, she hastened to
the door with the babe in her arms, and saw the
little party of backwoods-men slowly returning.
Why came they with such tardy stepswhy thus
closely crowded togetherwhy did they halt so
often? Alas! they bore one of their number a
corpse in their arms! She ran to meet them.
As she came near, the men laid down their
burthen
under the shade of a large tree, and then
stood respectfully backwhile my poor mother,
recognising her husband in the agonies of death,
threw herself on the ground beside him, and had
only time to attract one look from the dying man,
by her shriek of agony, ere his eyes were closed
for ever.
The remains of my father were buried near
the house, and my mother could not be prevailed
upon to quit the spot around which her affections
lingered. After spending a few weeks at the
house of a neighbour, who had kindly taken us
home during the confusion of the melancholy
event, she returned to her deserted cabin, havings,
in the mean while, written to an unmarried
brother
in North Carolina to come to her. He
came and remained with us, carrying on the
business of our farm, and acting as a kind
protector
to us all.
From this period I date the commencement of
my recollections. I remember well the care-worn
figure and broken-hearted countenance of my
mother
.
She was so bowed down under affliction
that her voice had acquired a tremulous tone,
which was very touching to those who knew the
cause, and especially to the few who participated
in her grief. The neighbours were kind to her;
they gathered her corn, looked after her affairs,
and provided for her until my uncle's arrival; and
continued ever afterwards to treat her with
considerate
attention. There are few who do not
feel deep sympathy for the utter desolation of the
widow's heart, and for the helpless wretchedness
of her unprotected situation; nor do any people
exhibit, in the indulgence of this natural feeling, a
more manly benevolence than our backwoodsmen.
Continually exposed to danger, and dependent on
each other for a thousand charitable offices, which
are always rendered without remuneration, they
do not become callous to the misery of others, but
learn to feel and act as if bound to those around
them by the ties of fraternity. They visited my
mother often; and the story of my father's death
was repeated so frequently as to be deeply
impressed
upon my memory. In the higher circles
of life, where a great degree of refinement is said
to prevail, it is not customary, I believe, to
converse
with the parties interested upon those sad
topics which deeply affect the heart, and throw a
gloom over the family circle. In humble life it
is different: the fountains of grief are familiarly
approached and thrown open, and the bitter waters
of affliction suffered to flow freely out. The heart
relieves itself by these discussions, and, instead of
brooding over its sorrows, gives them vent, and
does better than adding imaginary ills to those
which are real, by learning to consider the subject
in the same practical light in which it is viewed
by others.
My sister and myself often strolled to the woods
to gather nuts, or to hunt for the nests of birds
or stole away to a neighbouring stream to wade
in the water. But we never went far from the
house without having the fear of the Indians
before
our eyes. We had heard the story of our
father's death so often repeatedhad listened to
so many similar legendshad so often witnessed
the alarm created by a rumoured appearance of
the Indians in the vicinity,that our hearts had
learned to quail in terror at the thought of a
savage. The word
Indian
conveyed to our minds
all that was fierce, and dangerous, and hateful.
We knew what we had ourselves suffered from
this ferocious race, and we saw that others lived
in continual fear of them. We heard the men
talk of hunting Indians, as they would speak of
tracking the beast of prey to his lairand the
women never met without speaking of the
abduction
of children, or the murder of females,
repeating
tale after tale, each exceeding the former in
horror, until the whole circle became agitated
with fear, the candles seemed to burn blue, and
the slightest sound was considered as a prognostic
of instant massacre.
Many were our childish discussions and
surmises
on this all absorbing subject, as we played
together.
What made the Indians kill our father? my
little sister would ask, and we would guess and
guess, without coming to any other conclusion
than that it was because they were bad people.
Would they kill us?Do they kill every
body they meet?Do they eat people? were
some of the questions which naturally occurred to
us, and it will be readily believed that the
agitation
of them always led to inferences the most
unfavourable to the Indian. If a bush rustled, or
a footstep was heard as we strolled abroad, we
imagined that the Indians were near; but, instead
of running and screaming, as more civilised
children
would have done, we crept silently under the
nearest cover, or dropped quietly in the high
grass, with the instinct which teaches the young
partridge a similar devicelying perfectly
motionless
,
and throwing our little wild eyes vigilantly
about until the danger had passed. We should
not have moved had an Indian stepped over us;
nor have betrayed any signs of life, so long as
silence would have afforded concealment. Such
are the habits of cunning and of self-command
acquired, even in infancy, by those who live on a
frontier exposed to hostile incursionswho are
often in danger, and who hear continually of
stratagems
and deeds of violence.
Thus two years of my mother's widowhood had
rolled away, when one day my sister and myself
were amusing ourselves by dabbling in the water
of a small branch not far from the house. She
was at a distance from meand, being intent on
different objects, we had not spoken for some
timewhen suddenly I heard her utter a most
piercing shriek. I looked up, and beheld her in
the grasp of an Indian warrior. Instinctively I
recoiled behind a thick bush, where I sat in
breathless
silence, keeping my eye fixed on the savage,
who, not having discovered me, began to retreat
with his terrified prisoner in his arms. Poor
child! I shall never forget the dreadful screams
which she uttereduntil the Indian, placing his
hand on her mouth and menacing with his knife,
gave her to understand that he would kill her
unless she ceased to cry. Nor shall I ever fail to
remember my own agony when I saw her borne
away sobbing, stretching out her little arms, and
gazing wildly towards her home for the last time.
What rage and grief filled my young heart as I
witnessed her pangs, and felt my own impotence
as the most beloved object in existence was torn
from me, while I could neither prevent nor revenge
the violence.
No sooner was the savage out of sight, than I
started up and hurried to the house, taking care
to follow the most concealed path, and treading
with the stealthy caution of the prowler of the
night. My uncle was not at home, and my poor
mothermy widowed, mourning mother, whose
infants were all that were left to her in this world
words cannot describe the acuteness of the grief
with which she was overwhelmed. But she acted
with courage and prudence: displaying, in this
moment of affliction, a self-possession which never
forsook her under any circumstances. After my
father's death, I was perhaps the dearest object of
her affection. She felt at that moment the
sentiment
expressed by the patriarch of Israel: If I
be bereaved of my children, I am bereaved.
Apprehending that the Indians still hovered around
the dwelling, and would soon appear to complete
their ferocious purpose, she closed the door and
placed the heaviest articles of furniture against it,
determined to defend herself to the last. She
said to me, Your father is dead, your sister is
gone, and you are all that is left to meI must
save your life if I lose my own; and then raising
one of the puncheons which formed the floor, she
thrust me under it, and charging me to lie still,
and neither move nor speakwhatever might
happenrestored the puncheon to its place. The
floor was sufficiently open to enable me to see
what passed, and sometimes to catch a glimpse of
the actors. It was now past sunset. In a few
minutes the Indians came to the door, and
attempted
to force their way in; but my mother
having a loaded rifle, presented it through a
crevice of the logs, upon which they retired,
uttering as they went the most horrible yells.
They soon returned, bearing lighted torches,
which they threw upon the roofin a few
minutes
the house was in flamesthe rifle dropped
from my mother's hands, and, before she could
determine what to do, the door was burst open,
and she was dragged out. The savages, finding
no other object upon which to vent their fury,
departed, carrying her with them.
I cannot pretend to convey any adequate idea
of my own emotions during this scene. The loss
of my little sister had gone to my heartthe
self-possession and energy of my mother had
awakened my admirationand in the tumult of
other feelings, my own danger had scarcely been
the subject of a thought. I was naturally bold;
and I was not given to the indulgence of selfish
reflections. But what a moment of horror was
it, when the house was fired, and the savages
rushed in! When they laid their brutal hands
upon my mother, I experienced a sensation of
agony such as I had never known before. How
sacred is the person of a mother! What pure
and hallowed affections cling around her! What
sacrilege in the eyes of a sound hearted child, is
an act of violence against that parent, whose sex
5
claims the respect of her son, while her
tenderness
,
her watchful solicitude, her devotion, her
maternal pride, have entwined a thousand fond
associations among the tendrils of his heart.
Besides that intuitive love, which every mother
kindles in the bosom of her offspring even before
the will begins to exist, I had learned, young as I
was, to reverence mine on account of her
superior
worth. Devoted to her children, I had
witnessed
more than one instance of her self-denial,
which had penetrated my heart. I had seen her
on several occasions display a degree of calmness
in the presence of danger, and of patient fortitude
under extreme suffering, which amounted, in my
eyes, to heroism. I had beheld her widowed and
in sorrow; and had begun to look forward to the
time when I should be her protector. I had seen
the involuntary tear trickling secretly down her
cheek, and had listened, deeply affected, to the
midnight prayer for her children, intended for the
ear of Him only to whom it was addressed. A
deed of violence perpetrated towards any other
woman, would have struck me as brutal,but
there was a sacredness thrown around the person
of my mother which gave to this proceeding a
character of desecration. When I saw her
forced away, I struggled to release myself from
my confinementI screamedbut the shouts of
the infuriated incendiaries drowned my cries.
The flames were raging over my head, but I
thought alone of my mother. The love of life
was smothered by more powerful emotions, and I
only wished to share her captivity, or to die in
her arms.
The sounds of war died away. I no longer
heard the footsteps of men, nor the yells of
vengeance
.
The crackling of flames over my head,
and the falling of firebrands upon the floor under
which I was lying, alone met my ear. I was
confused and stupefied by the ferocious deeds I
had witnessed. A vague sense of my own danger
began to stir within me. I looked round, and
discovered that the space between the floor and
the ground was sufficient to allow me room to
crawl out. I crept from beneath the blazing pile,
and found myself the sole spectator of that
heart-rending
scene of desolation. The perpetrators of
that dark deed of aggression against the widow
and the orphan, had fled with their captives.
The flames were consuming the home which had
sheltered me all the years of my existence of
which I had any recollectionwhere I had
played with my little sister, and had so often
fallen asleep with my head upon my mother's
bosom, and felt her warm kiss upon my lips, and
had been awakend in the morning by her caresses.
Here, morning and evening, had we knelt by her
side, with our little hands pressed in hers, as she
prayed God to protect the bereaved and the
helpless
.
A gush of tenderness overwhelmed my
heart, as the contemplation of my own desolate
wretchedness contrasted itself with past
endearments
.
Around me was the darkness of the
night, rendered more black by the brightness of
the fire. I ran to my father's gravefor I could
not resist the conviction that the spirits of my
murdered mother and sister would hover over a
spot which was so sacred to us all. All was
silent here. The hand of the murderer, though
it may strike terror into the heart of the living,
cannot disturb the repose of the dead. I threw
myself on the ground. The reflection that I was
alone in the world became almost insupportable
tears came to my reliefI wept bitterly.
In a little while I recovered my composure. I
had been reared in habits which were not
calculated
to enervate my faculties; on the contrary, I
was thoughtful and daring. The idea occurred to
me that my mother and sister might still be
living, and could be rescued from captivity. No
sooner had this thought flashed upon my mind,
than I rushed, regardless of my own safety,
towards the house of our nearest neighbour. It
was two miles distant; but I was intimately
acquainted
with the path, and proceeded with a
speed which soon brought me to the place. Pale,
trembling, and in tears, I presented myself before
the astonished family, unable, at first, to articulate
any thing but the word Indians!
The effect produced by this alarming name, so
often heard, and so fraught with danger, was
instantaneous. All started up and prepared for
defence. The doors were closed, and the rifles
grasped. Consternation was painted on every
face; but the men evinced a martial bearing, in
the alacrity with which they subdued their
apprehensions
,
and flew to arms. When I told my
tale, however, in broken fragments, but
intelligibly
enough for the comprehension of those who
were accustomed to such recitals, and it was
rendered probable that the savages were already
on their retreat, a different direction was given to
the feelings of this worthy family. Its head, a
strong, muscular man, slow, heavy, and
apparently
indolent, seemed to be inspired with a new
life.
We must be after them, boys, said he, they
haint got much start of us, no howthere'll be a
nice fresh trail in the morning that can't be
missed, and we can out travel the varmints, let
'em do their best.
John! exclaimed the wife, you're a good
soul! I wish I was a man, and could go along.
Can't you go to-night? Poor Sally Robinson
she'll suffer a heap of misery before morningthe
distressed creetur!
5*
Its no use to try to hunt Indians in the night,
replied the man; and besides, it will take 'til
morning to get the neighbours warned in.
Don't cry, Billy, said the woman, putting
her arms round my neck, and kissing me
affectionately
,
don't cry, my little manthey'll bring
your mammy back afore to-morrow nightno
mistake about thatits mighty hard for Indians
to get away from our people. You shall sleep
with my little boys, and be my son, 'til your
mammy comes back.
The backwoodsman now directed several young
men, his sons and others, who were present, to
mount their horses and spread the alarm through
the neighbourhood, and to summon all the men
to meet at his house the next morning. The
young fellows caught his ardour, and in a few
minutes were dashing off, through the woods, in
different directions.
There was little sleep among the inmates of
this cabin on that eventful night. The children
were afraid to go to bed. The man of the house,
whose name was Hickman, aware of the necessity
of husbanding all his powers for the approaching
chase, which might last several days, threw
himself
down in his clothes, and soon appeared to
slumber. His wife sat by the fire, sighing,
pouring
out bitter anathemas upon the Indians, and
giving utterance to her lively sympathy in the
afflictions of her neighbour, while the children
crowded around her, squatted upon the floor with
their bare feet gathered under them, each
clinging
to some part of her dress, gazing at one
another in mute terror, or asking questions in
whispered and tremulous accents about the
savages
;and
all of them in turns casting glances
of pity at myself, as I sat, sometimes weeping
bitterly, and at other times staring in tearless
agony at the terrified group. At intervals, the
kind-hearted matron would articulate my
mother's
name, accompanied by passionate
expressions
of grief and affection.
Poor Sally Robinson! she has had her own
troubles, poor thing! And she sich a good
creetur
!
It was sorrowful enough to be a lone woman,
and her man murdered the way he was, right
before her eyes, as a body may say! The dear
knows how she did to stand it! Law, children,
don't pull my gownd so,you'll tear every stitch
of clothes off of my back. What are you afeard
of? the Indians aint comin' here, no how,the
varmintsthey know better than for to go where
there's men about the house, 'drot their vile skins!
the 'bominable riff-raff cowardly scum of creation!
they haint got the hearts of men, no how! they
haint no more courage nor a burnt cracklin, no
way they can fix it! Poor Sally! ah me!and
the dear childthe poor, poor little child!
Did the Indians kill little Sue, mammy?
I don't know, childthey carried her off, and
Him that's above only knows what has become of
her. And they have burnt the very roof over the
heads of them that had no one to take care of
them.
Did they burn Miss Robinson's house up,
mammy?
To be sure they didthe cabin, and a
beautiful
piece of cloth that she had in the loom, and
all the plunder that the poor thing has been scrapin
together by the work of her own hands.
Mammy,
Hush, what's that?
Then they would all crowd together and listen.
It's daddy snoring.
It was past midnight when the tramping of a
horse was heard rapidly approaching. The dogs
barked fiercely, as if conscious of the necessity of
unusual vigilance, and then ceased all at once. A
loud voice called, Who keeps house?
Those who were sitting up were afraid to move;
but Mr. Hickman, accustomed to awake at the
slightest alarm, started up, and proceeded, with
his gun in his hand, to open the door cautiously.
My uncle entered. He had heard the rumour
vaguely repeated, had hurried home, and found, in
the smoking embers of his dwelling, a fatal
confirmation
of his worst fears.
Between that time and the dawn of day the
neighbours poured in, all armed, and prepared to
pursue the Indians. Some were ready for action:
others, who had repaired more hastily to the
rendezvous, upon the moment of receiving the
summons, now employed themselves in wiping out
their guns, cleaning the locks, changing the flints,
and supplying their pouches with all the munitions
required for several days' service. Mr. Hickman
seemed to be tacitly agreed upon as the leader.
I watched all his motions, and, young as I was,
saw with admiration the coolness and precision
with which he made his arrangements. He
examined
every part of his rifle with the most severe
scrutiny. He placed a handful of bullets on the
table, and passed them rapidly through his fingers,
one by one, to ascertain that they were perfectly
round and smooth, rejecting those that were in
the slightest degree defective. His flints and
patches underwent the same close inspection.
The tomahawk and knife were placed in his belt
then withdrawn and placed againuntil the
wary pioneer was satisfied that each was so
arranged
as to be capable of being quickly grasped
by the hand, in case of sudden need, and so secured
as not to be liable to be lost while the rider was
dashing rapidly through the bushes. Grave and
taciturn all the time, he was as cool as if preparing
for a hunt.
His wife hung round him during these
operations
,now
officiously tendering her services
now leaning on his shoulder, and speaking to him
in a low voice,then retiring, as if overcome by
her fears, and sometimes secretly wiping away a
tear with the corner of her apron.
John, she would say, you won't lose no time,
I hope. Poor Sally! she will be mighty bad off
'till she sees you cominit's sich a dreadful bad
fix for any body to be in.
We sha'nt be long, I reckon.
Take mighty good care of yourself, John
you know, dear, what a poor broken-hearted body
I'd be without you. Don't ride Ball,you know
he stumbles powerful bad, and falls down
sometimes
and
his sight's so bad, he aint no account,
no how, in the night.
I shall ride Dickno mistake in him.
No two ways about Dick, reiterated the wife;
boys, go and feed Dick, and clean him, and fix
him good for your daddy to ride. And, John,
when you get up to the miserable varmints, don't
be too ambitiousyou know you're apt to be sort
o' quick when you're raiseddon't be too brash;
if you can only get poor Sally Robinson away
from them, don't run no risks. You don't reckon
you'll have to fight with them, do you?
It's a little mixed, replied the husband.
It would be a droll way to hunt Indians, and
not kill any of them, interrupted one of the
party.
I'll be dogged if I don't save one of them,
added another.
I allow to use up one or two, continued a
third.
I'll never agree to return 'til we use up the
whole gangstock, lock, and barrel, added
another
.
They are the darndest puteranimous villyens
on the face of the whole yearthand I go in for
puttin the pewter to 'em, accordin' to law, chimed
in a little dried up old man, who was whetting his
knife against the side of the fire-place, and looking
as savage as a meat-axe. It was very obvious
that the Indians would get no quarter.
At daylight the party began to mount. All
were completely equipped. Under every saddle
was a blanket, to save the horse's backbehind it
was tied either a great coat or a blanket to sleep
inon this was lashed a wallet, containing several
days' provisions, and a tin cup dangled on the top
of the whole. Each man carried a good rifle, in
complete order, and had a knife and a tomahawk
in his belt. Their legs were covered, to protect
them from the briars, with dressed deer-skinnot
made into any garment, but rolled tightly round
the limb and tied with strings. Some wore shoes,
others moccasinssome had hats, others rejected
this covering, and wore only a cotton handkerchief
bound closely round the head. When mounted
they bade adieu to their friends, and set out in
high spiritsnot observing any particular order
of march at first, but falling gradually into the
single file, as the most convenient arrangement
for passing rapidly through the forest.
Towards evening two of the party returned.
They brought the clothes of my sister which had
been found by the way, near the bank of the Ohio,
torn and bloody, but yet in a state to be identified.
There was other evidence, abundant and
conclusive
,
that the poor child had been murdered, and
her body thrown into the river. I cannot express
the poignancy of my sensations on receiving the
intelligence of this catastrophe. I had, until now,
sustained my spirits by the hope of her escape. I
would not believe that even a savage could
wantonly
give pain, much less inflict death, upon my
innocent companiona sweet, rosy, laughing girl.
A girl! a
little
girlI could not imagine it
possible
that any human creature, with the form of
manhood, would touch the life of a thing so
winning, so gentle, so helpless. I dreamed away
the day in painful excitementin feverish visions
of hope and fear; but when the truth came I sunk
down in an agony of grief and horror. I had not
realised the possibility of a catastrophe so terrible.
Another day was drawing near to a close. I
was withering under the pressure of affliction.
Grief, watching, excitement, and loss of appetite,
had produced a bodily exhaustion, attended with
extreme nervous sensibility. I had wandered off
by myself, and came, I hardly know how, to the
blackened ruins of our cabin. I seated myself
under a tree, in the desolated yard. It was a
bright calm evening; the sun was sinking towards
the horizon, and the long shadows of the forest
extended over the spot. The cool air fanned my
burning brow, and brought a momentary sense of
relief from pain. Before me was a silent heap of
ashesbut all else wore the air of home. A few
fruit trees that stood scattered around, were in
full blossom, and the bees were humming busily
among the flowersthe birds sang, and the
domestic
animals seemed to welcome my return.
The cow, that had been standing unmilked, came
lowing towards methe pigs ran to meet me
and the fowls gathered about the place where I
sat, as if they recognised a master whose
protection
had been withdrawn from them. Oh! how
many ties there are to bind the soul to earth!
When the strongest are cut asunder, and the
spirit feels itself cast loose from every bond which
connects it with mortality, how imperceptibly
does one little tendril after another become
entwined
about it, and draw it back with gentle
violence! He who thinks he has but one love is
6
always mistaken. The heart may have one
overmastering affection, more powerful than all
the rest, which, like the main root of the tree, is
that which supports it; but if that be cut away, it
will find a thousand minute fibres still clinging to
the soil of humanity. An absorbing passion may
fill up the soul, and while it lasts, may throw a
shade over the various obligations, and the infinite
multitudes of little kindnesses, and tender
associations
,
that bind us to mankind; but when that
fades, these are seen to twinkle in the firmament
of life, as the stars shine, after the sun has gone
down. Even the brute, and the lilies of the field,
that neither toil nor spin, put in their silent claims;
and the heart that would have spurned the world,
settles quietly down again upon its bosom. A
moment before, I was in despair;and now I was
caressing the dumb animals around me. They
seemed like friends; and a something like joy
revived within me, as I reflected that I was not
entirely forsaken. I raised my eyes and my
heart to Heaven, with a feeling of thanksgiving,
and melted into tenderness.
I looked up and gazed around me. In the
edge of the forest, an object attracted my
attention
.
It was the dim and shadowy representation
of a human figure. It moved; and then seemed
to lean against a tree; again it moved, and halted.
Could it be an Indian? Was the savage thirst
for blood not yet sated? Were they not to be
satisfied until all, even the last, of my unhappy
family, should have fallen under the tomahawk?
I did not fly: I would not have moved from that
spot had a myriad of savages appeared,a legion
of devils could not have daunted my spirit in that
moment of stubborn desperation. The figure
moved along under the shade of a long point of
timber, which approached to within a few yards
of the houseadvancing, and then halting,
cautiously
as an insidious enemy, or painfully like a
friend, who came the bearer of unwelcome tidings.
I watched it with intense interest, until it came
near, and stepped from under the woody covert,
which had rendered the form indistinct,and
then I recognised, with unerring instinct, the
person of my mother. I rushed towards her, and
in a moment was in her arms. I gazed at her
with an overwhelming gush of joy and fondness
but, oh! how changed, how wretched was she!
Her bare feet were torn and bloodyher clothes
were tattered into shredsher eyes redher
face pale and emaciatedher frame exhausted
with fatigue. After being driven forward a whole
day, she had effected her escape in the night, and
had wandered back to the home which had been
desolated by the ruthless hand of the murderer and
incendiary. With my assistance she was enabled,
with much difficulty, to crawl to the house of our
kind neighbour, where she sunk down under her
bodily and mental sufferings, and remained some
days dangerously ill.
The party who had gone to her assistance, had
missed her on the way, but had overtaken the
Indians, and attacked them with such spirit, that
one half the savages were slain in the first onset.
The remainder dispersed, and found safety in
flight.
We did not return to the spot which had proved
so calamitous to our unhappy family, but removed
to a place which was supposed to be less exposed
to danger. I had now no companion. The loss
of my little sister preyed upon my spirits. She
was continually the subject of my thoughts. I
often sat for hours together absorbed in visionary
speculations, founded upon the possibility of my
sister's escape from death. As is the case with
all dreamers, I did not examine the evidence for
the purpose of learning the truth, nor did I permit
the certainty of the catastrophe which had
befallen
her to interfere with my theories; but
assuming the premises which were necessary, I
proceeded to erect an airy superstructure, and to
luxuriate in the enjoyment of the baseless fabric
of a vision. I exercised my ingenuity in
imagining
a variety of modes in which she might have
escaped from her captors, fancied for her some
present state of existence under the protection of
kind benefactors, and realised the joy of her
sudden
and unexpected restoration. Sometimes I
supposed her to be living in captivity, and fancied
myself leading an armed party to her rescue
I went through all the stratagems and perils
of border warfaresignalised myself by a series
of acts of almost miraculous daringdelivered
my beloved sister from bondage, and filled the
heart of my bereaved mother with joy and pride.
When I slept, the same fancies were ever present.
I strolled about with my sister, embarrassed by
the endeavour to reconcile the appearances of my
dream with the facts indelibly engraved upon my
memory. Sometimes she sat by me, with her
hand clasped in mine, and narrated a series of
adventures, which she had passed through since
our parting; but more frequently she seemed to
laugh at my credulity, and pronounced our
misfortunes
to have been all a dream. Often did I
awake in tears.
As I grew older, my tenderness began to give
way to sterner feelings. Accustomed to fear the
Indians from infancy, I began at last to hate them
with intense malignity. I had never heard them
spoken of but as enemies, to extirpate whom was
a duty. I had been taught to consider the slaying
of an Indian as an act of praiseworthy public
spirit. As my sorrow for the sufferings of those
who were dear to me began to harden into
indignation
,
6*
the desire of revenge was kindled in my
bosom. This feeling was rapidly developed,
because
it was the only one connected with my
reveries which I could trace out to any practical
result. I could not bring my sister to life, nor
dispel the cloud of grief from the face of my
widowed mother: but I could strike the savage, I
could burn his dwelling, and desolate his fireside,
as he had desolated mine. This passion soon
gained a predominating mastery over my mind
as a rank weed shoots up and overshadows those
around it, the desire of revenge struck deep its
roots, grew rapidly into vigour, and smothered
the better emotions of my heart.
I procured a gun, and began to roam the forest.
In this country boys are permitted, at an early
age, to mingle in the sports of men, and my
propensity
for hunting did not excite any particular
remark. The hunters sometimes took me with
them; but more often I wandered about alone. I
soon learned to shoot with precision, and became
expert in many of the devices of the
backwoodsman
.
When I was about twelve years old, a village
was laid out in the neighbourhood in which we
then resided. The country was settling rapidly;
several wealthy families from Virginia were
among the emigrants; the frontier had been
further west, and with it had rolled the tide of
war. Society began to be organised, and many
of the luxuries of social life were introduced.
Among other improvements was a school,
conducted
by a person of some erudition, who brought
with him a good many books, and was looked
upon as a prodigy of knowledge.
I was sent to school; entered upon my studies
with eagerness, and made rapid advances in
learning
.
With a mind naturally inquisitive, and
accustomed
to rely upon itself, I had no difficulty in
mastering any task which was given me, and soon
became fond of reading. My teacher had in his
possession a number of volumes of history, which
I perused with avidity. A few classics, which
fell into my hands, I read over and over, with the
delight of a newly awakened admiration. I
commenced
the study of the Latin language, and
gained a slight acquaintance with the mythology
and history of the ancients. In three years, my
character was much changed; my mind was
enlarged
,
my affections softened, and the tone of my
morals considerably ameliorated. I still loved my
gun, and indulged my propensity for wandering in
the forest; while my hatred of the Indians, and
that thirst for vengeance over which I had so long
brooded, were by no means blunted by the perusal
of those histories, in which the recitals of military
daring form a prominent part, and martial
accomplishments
are held up as exemplary virtues
worthy of the highest admiration.
I was little more than fifteen years of age, when
a number of the poorer families in the
neighbourhood
formed a party for the purpose of removing
to the settlements upon the Mississippi, in Illinois
a new country, which just then began to be
spoken of. My uncle and mother determined to
accompany them. I know not what infatuation
induced them to brave again the perils of the
wilderness, after all their fatal experience. It is
probable that their only inducement was that love
of new lands, of fresh wild scenery, and of the
unconstrained habits of border life, which forms a
ruling passion with the people of the backwoods,
and which no chastening from the hand of
adversity
can eradicate.
The only settlements of the Americans in
Illinois
,
at that time, were in the neighbourhood of
the French villages, which were scattered along
the American Bottom, on the Mississippi, from
Kaskaskia to the vicinity of St. Louis. We
embarked in two large boats; and, after floating
quietly down the Ohio to the Mississippi, began
to ascend that wonderful river, proceeding slowly
against its powerful current. Sometimes a fair
wind invited us to hoist our sails, and enabled us
for a while to move forward without labour; but
usually our boats were pushed with poles, by the
most severe manual exertion. To get forward at
all in opposition to the current, it was necessary
to creep along close to the shore. But there
were places where it became impossible to make
any headway even by this method: where the
bank was perpendicular, the water too deep to
allow the use of poles, and the headlong stream
swept foaming against the shore. In such
emergencies
it was impossible to proceed, except by
means of the
cordelle
, a strong cable attached to
the boat, by which the boatmen, walking on the
shore, dragged it past these dangerous places.
The shores, on both sides, were inhabited by
Indians, and our labours were rendered the more
burthensome, by the necessity of keeping up a
continual watch to prevent surprise.
One day we reached a place where the river is
closely hemmed in by rock on either side, and the
stream, confined within a more narrow space than
it usually occupies, rushes with great impetuosity
through the strait. It is one of the most difficult
passes on the river for ascending boats. Here, of
course, neither oars nor poles could be of any
avail, and arrangements were made for using the
cordelle
. My uncle and mother were in the
foremost
boatI had happened to be, for the moment,
in the other, which, by some accident, was
detained
,
so as to fall a short distance into the rear.
The leading boat passed round a little point of
land, which concealed it from our view, and
immediately afterwards we heard the reports of
several rifles. The Indians had formed an
ambuscade
at the point where they knew the crew
must land to use the cable, and had fallen upon
them at a moment when the difficulties of the
navigation absorbed their attention so entirely,
that they had forgotten their usual precautions,
and were not prepared either to fight or fly. On
hearing the alarm we endeavoured to hasten to
their assistance, aided by a breeze which filled
our sail, and bore us rapidly along. But we were
too late; and, on turning the point, beheld the
other boat moored fast to the shore, and in
possession
of a hellish band of savage warriors, who
were dashing furiously about on the deck and on
the bank, uttering the most hideous yells. We
came near enough to see the bodies of our friends
stretched lifeless on the ground, or struggling in
the agonies of deathsurrounded by the monsters,
who were still beating them with clubs, and
gratifying
their demoniac thirst for blood in gashing
with their knives the already mutilated corpses.
Never did I behold a scene of such horror:
language
has no power to describe it, nor the mind
capacity to obliterate its impressions. Men, women,
and children, were alike the victims of an
indiscriminating
carnage. The hell-hounds were
literally
tearing them in pieces,exulting, shouting,
smearing themselves with blood, and trampling on
the remains of their wretched victims.
On our approach, they prepared for a new
triumph; for their numbers so greatly exceeded
our own as to render victory certain. We had
advanced so near as to be within the range of a
heavy fire which they poured in, and the foaming
current seemed to be dashing us upon the rocks
on which they stoodwhen our steersman, a cool
experienced man, suddenly threw the head of the
boat across the river, in the opposite direction,
and causing the sail to be trimmed suitably, shot
rapidly away from the scene of the massacre. A
shout of rage and disappointment burst from our
crew, who were thoughtlessly preparing to revenge
their friends. It was well that a more prudent
head directed our motions. The dead were
beyond
the reach of our aid, and the infuriated
savages, mad with victory, greatly outnumbered
ourselves. We found safety on the opposite shore,
where we remained in painful suspense until the
murderers retired, when we repaired to the
melancholy
spot, and rendered, in silent agony, the
last sad rites to the remains of the fallen. Not
one of all that crew had escaped. I recognised,
with difficulty, the mangled bodies of my mother
and my uncle; and kneeling beside the remains
of my parent, swore eternal vengeance against her
murderersagainst that race who had poisoned
the cup of her existence,and, not content with
robbing her of all that made life dear, and of life
itself, had insulted her inanimate remains.
Enough of this. I cannot express the feelings
of a son under such circumstancesthe only son
of a widowed motherwho had been almost her
sole companion, had shared her adversity,
witnessed
her afflictions, and appreciated her
maternal
fondness. I pass them over.
I began to lead a new life. I found myself at
Kaskaskia, a stranger. I had not a relative living,
and in this place I had no acquaintances. But my
story gained me much sympathy; I was kindly
receivedevery door was open to me, and every
heart seemed to feel that I had claims upon my
countrymen.
No degree of kindness, however, could soothe
my excited feelings. The determination to avenge
my mother's death,to be revenged for the loss
of a father, a sister, and an uncle, was unalterably
formed, and thirst for the blood of the savage was
become an uncontrollable passion. I wandered
about in the woods and over the prairies
spending
my whole time in hunting, in increasing my
skill in the use of the rifle, and in rendering more
perfect my proficiency in the various devices of
the hunter. In my wanderings I became
acquainted
with a Frenchman, who lived almost
entirely in the forest. He was a small, slender,
quiet man, past the meridian of life. Taciturn
and inoffensive, he subsisted by hunting and
fishing
,
and had little communion with his own species.
He was never engaged in war, or in any kind of
altercation. Equally friendly with the whites and
the Indians, he visited the villages and the camps
of both, and was well received, although
occasionally
suspected by each of acting as a spy for the
other. This suspicion was founded on the
singularity
of his character, in which a great degree of
ignorance and childish simplicity was combined
with a remarkable shrewdness in matters
connected
with his own vocation. The latter was
very naturally supposed to arise from native
sagacity
,
and the former to be the result of profound
dissimulation. What the truth might be, I never
knew; but, to me, Peter seemed to be the most
unsophisticated of human beings. How it
happened
that I gained his confidence, does not now
occur to me; for he was unsocial in his habits
and although, when he visited the French villages,
he cheerfully partook of the hospitality of his
countrymen, conversed freely, and was a delighted
spectator of their festivities, he soon wandered off,
and was not seen again for weeks, or even months.
To this singular being I attached myself, and
became the companion of his voluntary banishment
from society. We retired far from the
settlements
,
avoiding equally the hunting grounds of
7
the Indians and the haunts of the white people.
Sometimes we encamped at a secluded spot on the
margin of a river, and spent our time in fishing.
Then we wandered away to the pastures of the
deer, living upon venison, and drying the skins of
our game. Again, we sought the retreats of the
beaver, and, setting our traps, reposed quietly in
the neighbouring coverts to witness the success of
our arts. Occasionally we crept upon the elk or
the buffalo, and engaged, with the hunter's ardour,
in the pursuit of these noble animals; and
sometimes
we circumvented the cunning of the wild
cat, or planned the destruction of the wolf or the
panther. To add variety to our meals, we
plundered
the hoard of the wild bee; and Peter soon
taught me to trace the industrious insect through
the air, from the flowery prairie, to his distant
home in the forest. When our supply of furs
became considerable, we collected them from their
different places of deposit at some point on the
river, and, embarking in a canoe, floated down to
the nearest village, where we exchanged them for
powder, lead, and other necessaries.
But I did not spend all my time in hunting and
fishing. Naturally observant, the little education
I had received had quickened my mental powers,
and rendered me keenly inquisitive into all the
arcana of nature. I noticed every thing around
me;the appearances of the clouds, and the
changes of the weatherthe foliage of the trees,
and the growth of the multitudinous vegetation of
the wildernessthe habits of animals, and the
various notes of the inhabitants of the forest,
but especially all the appearances of natureall
the varieties of sunlight and shadeall the
diversities
in the aspect of the natural scenery, from
midnight to noon, attracted my attention. Peter,
although not a naturalist, was an admirable teacher
in these studies. Accustomed to observe nature
from his infancy, he had become acquainted with
the secrets of the great volume, which all profess
to admire and but few understand. He could
anticipate
the changes of the weather. He knew
when the moon would rise, and when the deer
would be stirring. He could select, with ready
tact, the most suitable pool for fishing, and could
tell the hour at which the fish would bite. His
ear was acute in distinguishing sounds: if a wolf
stole past in the dark, he could detect the fall of
his stealthy footstep in the rustling of the leaf or
the cracking of the twigs; and when the owl
hooted at midnight, he knew whether that scream
denoted the presence of an intruder, or was the
ordinary note with which the solitary bird solaced
his hour of recreation. There were few
appearances
,
and few sounds, which Peter could not
explain. He knew the points of the campass
and the landmarks of the country, and could find
his way in the dark as well as in the daylight,
and under a clouded atmosphere as easily as in
the blaze of noon.
Under such tuition, I soon became also an
expert
woodsman. With an enterprising mind, a
frame naturally vigorous, and habits formed from
infancy upon the frontier, I had little to learn. I
only needed experience, and this I now gained in
the school of practice. The backwoodsman
acquires
great skill in the use of the rifle, because he
employs that weapon not merely in sport, but in the
pursuit of a serious occupation. It was particularly
so in those early times. If he made war, it was
usually at his own cost; if he hunted, it was to
procure
a livelihood. In his long marches through the
woods, when he is absent several days, or perhaps
weeks, from home, he can carry but little
ammunition
,
and has no means of renewing his supply
when it becomes expended. Powder and lead are
scarce and costly in these secluded
neighbourhoods
.
He is therefore cautious not to throw
away a charge, and seldom fires at random. He
creeps upon his enemy, or his game, gains every
available advantage, measures his distance, and
takes his aim, with great deliberation and
accuracy
.
In any attainment, it is not practice
merely which secures perfection, but it is the
habit of careful practice, of always doing well that
which is to be done, and of aiming continually at
improvement. Such is the habit of our hunters,
who seldom discharge their rifles unnecessarily,
and who feel their own characters, and that of
their guns, at stake in every shot which they fire.
There was one subject, however, which
occupied
my mind especiallyone master purpose,
to which every feeling of my heart, and every
employment of my life, was subservient. My
thirst for revenge was unbounded. It filled up
my whole soul. I thought of little else than
schemes for the destruction of the savage. I was
maturing a stupendous plan of vengeance, and
bringing all the resources of my mind to bear
upon this one subject. The feet of men are swift
to shed blood. I improved rapidly in the arts of
destruction. I practised all the deceptive
stratagems
,
by which the hunter conceals himself from
an enemy, or baffles the instinct of the brute. I
could lie for hours so still, that a person, within a
few feet of me, would not have suspected that a
living creature was near him; and concealed
myself
so successfully, that even the Indian would
not have discovered me, unless he stepped by
accident
on my body. I could swim, and dive, and
lie all day in the water, with my head hidden
among the rushes, watching for prey. I learned
especially that patience, that forbearance, that
entire mastery over my appetites, fears, and
passions
,
which enables the Indian to submit to any
7*
privation, and to delay the impending blow until
all his plans are ripe, however alluring may be
the temptation for premature action.
I concealed my design from all, even from my
companion, Peter, while I was every day getting
from him the information requisite to advance
my purpose. I ascertained the names of the
surrounding
tribes, their dispositions in respect to
the whites, and the location of their villages. I
obtained the names of their most celebrated
warriors, and particularly of such as were
distinguished
by deeds of violence against my
countrymen
.
But the information to which I listened
with the most thrilling interest, and treasured in
my inmost heart, related to the massacre of my
mother. I learned from the Frenchmen, that the
party which perpetrated that bloody deed,
consisted
of a number of desperate individuals from
different villages, led by a lawless chief, who still
occasionally assembled the band for similar
out-rages
.
I treasured with pertinacious care the
names of those Indians, and the distinctive marks
by which they might be known. More than once,
when I heard that they were hunting in our
neighbourhood
,
I left my companion, silently tracked
their footsteps day after day, laid concealed by
the path along which they passed, or crept
secretly upon their camp; until by close
observation
I made myself acquainted with their persons.
All this was the more difficult, because this band,
aware of the indignation which that unprovoked
murder had excited, avoided the white people, and
were constantly on their guard against surprise.
But what vigilance can guard against the
watchful
cunning of revengerevenge for the
cold-blooded
butchery of a mother, a sister, and a
father, and the disruption of every tie which binds
a young and generous heart to existence!
At length the long sought opportunity presented
itself. In the fall of the year succeeding that of
the massacre, I discovered that the hated band
were hunting on the margin of the Mississippi,
and were in the custom of retiring for safety,
every night, to an island in that riverfirst
making their fire, and arranging their camp on
the shore of the main land, as if with the
intention
of spending the night there, and then secretly
stealing away to the island under the cover of
darkness.
I went to the nearest settlementwhere my
story was well known, and had awakened a
generous
sympathyand laying aside my usual reserve,
boldly announced my plan, and asked for a band
of volunteers to assist in its execution. Such a
call was, at that period, seldom made in vain.
Warlike in their habits, and inveterately hostile
to the savages, the people of the frontier were
always ready for excursions of this character.
On this occasion the excitement was the more
easily kindled, because others had been bereaved
of relatives and friends, in the same catastrophe
which deprived me of my last parent, and all were
indignant at that outrage. The plan was well
matured, and rapidly executed. A company was
raised, equal in number to the Indians, all picked
men, and completely equipped. At midnight,
we assembled secretly on the bank of the river,
far above the island, and embarking in canoes,
floated quietly down. The night was cloudy, and
so perfectly dark, as to render it impossible that
we should be discovered from either shore. The
stream bore us along, and the noiseless paddle
accelerated and directed the motion of the canoe,
without creating the slightest sound which could
awaken alarm. We landed on the island without
confusion, and pursued the meanders of the shore
until we found the canoes of the enemy. These
we cut adrift, and pursuing a dim path, came to
the camp where the savages were lying asleep,
around the embers of a fire,all but a sentinel,
who, half awake, sat upon a log. Each man
selected his object, in accordance with a
preconcerted
plantook a deliberate aim, and fired;
and then drawing our tomahawks, we rushed in,
and grappled the astonished savages as they
sprung to their feet. So complete was the
surprise
,
that they had not time to grasp their arms
before the tomahawk was busy among them. A
few seized the nearest weapon, and fought with
desperation. But the conflict was soon over:
not one of that fated band escaped to tell of their
defeat. Morning dawned over a scene reposing
in beautiful and majestic quiet; its rosy light
streaming over the variegated foliage, and
glancing
from the eddies and ripples of the turbid river
and there we sat, a grim and bloody company,
brooding over the gashed and mutilated bodies of
the slain, while a few scouts were busily
exploring
the island, to ascertain whether any of the
enemy were yet lurking in the bushes. Not one
was found; and we departed in triumph,in that
silent and subdued triumph which the sight of the
slain inspires in the bosom of the generous victor,
but yet with the emotions of satisfaction which
men feel, who believe that they have performed a
duty.
I had supposed, previous to this event, that the
gratification of my revenge would give peace to
my bosom; but this is a passion which grows
stronger by indulgence; and no sooner had I
tasted the sweets of vengeance, than I began to
feel an insatiable thirst for the blood of the savage.
Resuming my secluded habits, but without
rejoining
my former companion, I now lived entirely in
the woods, occupied with my own thoughts, and
pursuing, systematically, a plan of warfare against
that hated race whom I regarded with invincible
animosity. I followed the footsteps of their
hunting
parties, eagerly watching for an opportunity
to cut off any straggler who might wander away
from the others. For whole days I would lie
concealed
by the paths which they travelled, or near
a spring which they frequented; and if a single
Indian presented himself, I shot him down without
remorse, as I would have slain a wolf, or crushed
a rattlesnake. Sometimes I met a single warrior
openly, and we fought manfully, hand to hand:
that I was successful in those conflicts, is proved
by the fact that I am alivefor those single
combats
are usually fatal to one of the parties. But
more frequently I sought to engage them under
every advantage which might ensure success, not
feeling the obligation of any point of honour
which obliged me to meet an Indian on fair terms.
It happened, of course, that the advantage was
sometimes on their side; occasionally, I fell in,
accidentally, with several of their warriors, or was
tracked and pursued by a partyand then I
eluded them by cunning, or escaped by superior
swiftness of foot. They soon learned to know me
as their enemy, and scoured the woods in search
of me, with an eagerness equal to my own; but
while they sought my life by every artifice known
to savage warfare, few of them were willing to
meet me single-handed; for it is well understood,
that where the white man is trained to this species
of hostility, he is superior to the Indian, because
his physical powers are greater, and his courage
of a higher and more generous tone.
At length, tired of the monotony of the life I
led, and sated with carnage, I retired from the
woods, and betook myself to farming, living a
quiet and industrious life, and only resuming my
former habits to join a hunting party, or to assist
with others in the defence of the frontiers, in case
of an alarm. Once in a great while, however,
after a longer interval of quiet than usual, I took
my rifle, and strolled off to the woods to kill an
Indian, as another man would seek recreation in
hunting a deer or a panther.
It seems unnatural that a man should
pursue
a life that may appear so ferocious and even
unprincipled. But you must not forget that I had
been raised upon the frontier; that I had been
accustomed from infancy to hear the Indian
spoken of as an enemyas a cowardly,
malevolent
,
and cruel savage, who stole upon the
unprotected
,
in the hour of repose, and murdered
without
respect to age or sex; that many atrocities
had been perpetrated within my own knowledge,
or related, to me by those who had seen them;
and that I had suffered more than others by this
detested race. Those who know the relations of
mutual aggression, and continual alarm, which
existed between the pioneers and the Indians, in
the first settlement of the country, can easily
imagine that the hatred they felt towards each
other was intense and permanent; and that an
individual, who considered himself more deeply
injured than the rest, might naturally have
supposed
himself justifiable in seeking a more than
ordinary measure of retaliation.
I come now to a circumstance which changed
the tone of my feelings, and the whole colour of
my life. One day, towards the close of summer,
I had gone out bee-hunting. Our practice was to
find the bee-trees, at our leisure, during the
summer
,
and mark them with a tomahawk; each
hunter used his own mark, and respected those of
others; and at the proper season, we went out
with some axe-men, and proper vessels, cut down
the trees, and collected the honey. I had set out
early, and spent the day in roaming over a wild
unfrequented tract, in search of trees. To find
them, I watched the bees, observing, as they left
the flowers, clogged with honey, the course they
flewor I set bee-bait, usually a little salt and
water, in an open vessel, which these insects sip
greedily, and then marked the direction of their
flight. The bee, in returning home, always flies
in a direct line; and the experienced hunter,
having
observed the course, can follow it so
accurately
,
that he seldom fails to find the tree. This
he is enabled to do, partly by knowing the
kind of trees to examine, and partly by the
acuteness of his eye and ear, which enables him,
when near the place, to see the insects
hovering
about it, or to hear the hum of those busy
labourers.
I delighted in this employment. I loved to sit
in the edge of the prairie, and gaze upon its
undulating
surface, to see the waving of the tall
grass as the wind swept over it, to mark the
various colours of the flowers, to follow the
laborious
bee in her active flight along the plain, to
behold the celerity and skill with which she
gathered her harvest of sweets from this immense
garden, and to trace her through the air as she
darted away, laden with spoil, to her forest home.
I loved the quiet of this solitary sport. The
admirer of nature always reaps instruction in
gazing
upon her scenes of native luxuriance. The
wisdom of Providence is so infinite, the ingenuity
displayed in all the arcana of the animal and
vegetable creation is so diversified, that every day
thus spent discloses new facts, and suggests a
novel train of reflection. In the few years I had
spent at school, I had read enough to excite
curiosity, and to invigorate the powers of thought;
and so indelibly were those studies impressed upon
my memory, that the classic images of the
ancient writers arose continually in my mind, and
8
furnished pleasing illustrations of those natural
appearances by which I was surrounded.
On that day, my mind, thus calmed by an
agreeable
train of association, had wandered back to
the period of childhood, and I thought of the sister
who had been my companion, and whose death I
had so amply revenged. I tried to recall her
features
,
and the sports in which we had engaged
together. I speculated on what she might have
become, had the ruthless hand of the savage
spared her to grow up to maturity. She would
now have attained the bloom of womanhood, and
her softness would have restrained those fierce
passions, the long indulgence of which had
hardened
my heart, and thrown a gloom over my
mind. She would perhaps have been a wife and
a mother; my affections would have become
entwined
with those of other beings, and, instead of
being a solitary man, standing alone in the world,
like the blasted and wind-shaken tree of the
prairie, I should have grown up surrounded by
hearts allied to my own, and have struck down my
roots into the soil, and interlocked my branches
with those of my kindred.
I had begun, very recently, to doubt the
propriety
of cherishing those feelings of implacable
resentment, which I had indulged through my
whole life, of brooding over the melancholy
disasters
of my youth, and of pursuing that systematic
plan of destruction, which kept my hand
continually
imbued in blood, and my mind agitated
by the tempest of passion. Not that I questioned
for a moment my right to destroy the savage:
that was a principle too deeply ingrained in my
nature to be eradicatedthe dreadful maxim of
revenge was pricked upon my heart with the point
of a sharp instrument, and the characters stood
there indelibly recorded. Filial piety sanctioned
the promptings of nature; and I believed that in
killing a savage I performed my duty as a man,
and served my country as a citizen. But I had
begun to discover the injurious effects of my mode
of life upon my own character and happiness. It
had rendered me moody and unsocial. It kept
me estranged from society, encouraged a habit of
self-torture, and perpetuated a chain of indignant
and sorrowful reflections. I saw that others
forgave
injury, and forgot bereavement; the cloud
passed over them, like the storm of the summer
day, black and terrible in its fury, but brief in its
continuance, and the sunshine of peace beamed
out again upon themwhile I had disdained
consolation
,
had fled the kindness of fellow-creatures,
and had repelled the healing balm which
Providence
pours into the wounds of the afflicted.
Occupied by such thoughts, the day wore away,
the sun was sinking in the west, and I entered a
thick wood, for the purpose of making my camp
for the night, on the margin of a small river that
meandered through it. Habitually cautious, I
approached
the place with noiseless steps, when I
perceived, on the bank of the stream, the
hunting-lodge
of an Indiana slight shelter, made by
throwing a few mats over some poles which were
stuck in the ground. I examined the priming of
my rifle, loosened my knife in its sheath, changed
a little my direction, so as to advance against the
wind, and crept stealthily upon the unguarded
hunter. He was stretched on the ground, lazily
sleeping away the afternoon, and was not armed
nor paintedhaving evidently sought this quiet
spot, with his family, for the purpose of supporting
them by fishing. His wife, whose back was
towards
me, was busily engaged in some domestic
employment; a child, perfectly naked, was
wallowing
in the sand, and another, an infant, was
lashed to a board which leaned against a tree near
the mother. All were silent. I crept up with
the noiseless motion of a disembodied spirit,
intending
to despatch the hunter as he lay inert
upon the ground. I had never yet spared a
warrior of that race; and, as my contempt for
them prevented me from feeling any pride in such
exploits, I exulted in the prospect of an easy
victory. All the reasoning of that day faded at
once from my mind; but the recollections of my
childhood, which had been called up, gave a
freshness
to my desire for revenge. I had never aimed
a blow against a woman or a child; they were
sacred from any violence at my hand. But when
I saw that Indian father, with his wife and his two
children, the coincidence in the number and ages
of the family reminded me of the fireside of my
father, as it must have been when desolated by his
death; and I felt a malignant delight in the idea
of invading this family as mine had been invaded,
and blasting their peace by crushing their
protector
,
there
, on that very spot, in the presence of his
innocent and helpless dependents. He was
completely
in my power: I could shoot him from the
spot where I stood. There was no chance for his
escape. But I approached still nearer. We were
separated but a few paces, and I stood behind the
trunk of a large tree, which completely concealed
me. Once he expanded his nostrils, as if the scent
of a white man had reached himand once he
turned his ear towards the ground, as if the sound
of a footstep vibrated upon it; but his indolence
prevailed over his vigilance.
I was about to raise my rifle, for the purpose of
firing, when the woman turned her face towards
me and stood erect. I had before remarked that
her stature was taller than that of the squaws, who
are usually short, and that her hair, which hung
plaited in one thick roll down her back, was not
black,and I now saw that she was not of Indian
8*
descent. Although browned by long exposure to
the weather, her features and complexion were
those of my own countrywomen. But what struck
me most, and almost deprived me of my
self-possession
,
was her likeness to my deceased mother.
Had it not been for the difference of age, I should
have been persuaded that my parent stood before
me. The height, the figure, the complexion, the
expression of countenance, were all so similar,
that, notwithstanding the Indian costume in which
the female before me was clad, she was the exact
representation of my mother, as I recollected her
in my early yearsnot as I remembered her in
after times, when broken down by widowhood and
suffering.
A thought rushed across my mind. The age
of that young woman corresponded with the years
to which my sister would have attained, had she
lived. What a gush of feeling overwhelmed and
almost burst my heart, as this suspicion arose
what delight, what indignation! Could it be
possible
that my sister had survived, and that I found
her thusthe wife of a savage, the mother of a
spurious offspring of that degraded race! My
arm sunk, the gun rested on the ground, and I
leaned against the tree. I stood for a long while
watching the group with intense interest
pursuing
the female especially with an eye of eager
curiosity. In what slight circumstances do we
discover resemblance! When she moved, there
was the air of my mother; if she spoke to her
children, there was the voice; if she smiled, there
was my mother's smile. My parent had been
handsomer than most women, and this young
female
,though
her features were hardened by toil
and weather, though the wildness of the Indian
glance was in her eye, and the vacancy of
ignorance
was in her countenance,was yet beautiful,
and like my mother!
Convinced that I saw my sister, conflicting
emotions took possession of my mind, and I
became
irresolute of purpose. At one moment I
felt more determined than ever to slay the Indian,
whose alliance with my only relative I considered
a new insult, and a deeper injury than all others;
then I melted into tenderness as I gazed on her.
I looked at her children, and recoiled at the idea
of the unnatural union which had brought them
into existenceI looked at herself, and felt the
stirrings of a brother's affection.
At last I determined to resolve my doubts; and,
subduing every appearance of emotion, I emerged
from my concealment and walked slowly towards
the lodge. On discovering me, the woman,
without
betraying her surprise, uttered a low
admonition
to her husband, who arose to receive me,
watchful, yet assured by the pacific manner of my
approach. I seated myself on a logthe Indian
followed my example, with an appearance of
perfect
indifference, while his vigilant eye wandered
covertly to my gun, and then to the lodge where
his own was deposited. The woman, with a
similar
expression of apathy in her countenance, threw
her glance hastily into the forest, and listened, as
if to discover whether other footsteps were
approaching
.
There was a silence for some minutes
all parties were equally jealous, but all assumed
the same careless air of indifference. At last the
Indian, who spoke English tolerably well, said,
Is the white man hungry?
I replied, No.
Does the white man require a cup of water?
I am not thirsty.
Is the white hunter seeking for a place to
sleep? There is my lodge, and the night is
coming.
I am not tired, and I never rest in a wigwam;
when I sleep, the earth is my bed and the heavens
my covering; I am not a fox, to hide myself in a
hole.
The white stranger is wise, said the Indian
with a mock gravity.
I come, said I, with the words of peace in
my mouthI wish to hold council with a friend.
It is not usual for friends to talk together,
when one of them holds a gun in his hand.
I took the hint, and laid down my rifle.
Let us smoke, said I, I have something of
great importance to say.
The Indian made a sign to his wife, who went
into the lodge and brought a pipe. It was lighted;
each smoked a few whiffs in silence, and passed it
gravely to the other.
I now enquired into the lineage of the female,
who had so much interested me, but found both
herself and her husband very unwilling to
communicate
any intelligence on the subject. They
affected to misunderstand my questions, and gave
vague and cold replies. Determined to unveil the
mystery, I threw off all reserve, told them I had
lost a sister, and repeated some of the
circumstances
of her capture. They listened attentively,
and the woman became interested. They admitted
that she had been stolen from the whites when a
child, but at first disclaimed all knowledge of any
of the facts. At length the woman, giving way to
her curiosity, which became excited, began to
repeat
some reminiscences which she said remained
dimly impressed on her mind. She thought she
remembered a little boy that used to play with
her, and repeated some circumstances which I
well recollected. She distinctly remembered that
she was playing with her little brother near a
small stream, in a valley, when the Indians seized
her and carried her away. Other facts were
related, which had been gathered from the
Indians
who composed the partysuch as the
burning
of the house, and the capture and escape of
the motherand it was rendered certain that I
had found my long lost sister! The recognition
was mutual; all parties being satisfied that we
were indeed the children of the same parents.
This conversation lasted until night, when I
declined
an invitation to sleep in the lodge, and set
out in a direction towards home; but no sooner
was I out of sight of the Indian camp, than I made
a circuit through the woods, and having reached
a spot directly opposite to the course on which I
started, prepared to rest until morning. Such
was my habitual caution, and such my distrust of
an Indian, even though married to my sister.
Early in the morning I sought their camp.
They were not surprised to see mehaving
understood
,
and no doubt applauded, the caution which
induced me to lodge apart from them. We
break-fasted
together; and my sister conversed with me
more freely than before. The Indians had treated
her kindly, and she was satisfied with her
condition
.
When I asked her if she was happy, she
cast an enquiring glance at her husband, and
shook her head, as if she did not understand the
question. I desired to know if her husband
treated her kindly, when she replied, that he
was a good hunter, and supplied her well with
food,that he seldom got drunk, and had never
beaten her but once, when, she had no doubt, she
deserved it; to which the husband added, that she
behaved so well as to require but little correction.
As the restraint, caused by my presence, began to
wear away, and I was left to converse with her
more freely, I invited her to forsake her savage
companion, to place herself under my protection,
and to resume the habits of civilised life. She
received my proposition coldly, and declined it
with a slight smile of contempt.
The whole interview was painful and
embarrassing
.
I could not look at the Indian husband
of my sister without aversion, and her children,
with their wild dark eyes, and savage features,
were to me objects of inexpressible loathing.
Between my sister and myself there were no
points of sympathy, no common attachments,
nothing to bind us by any tie of affection or
esteem, or to render the society of either
agreeable
to the other. The bond of consanguinity
becomes a feeble and tuneless chord, when it
ceases to unite hearts which throb in unison; like
the loosened and detached string of a musical
instrument, it has no melody in itself, but only
yields its delightful notes when attuned in
harmony
with the other various affections of the
heart. There had been a time, when the name of
sister
was music to my ear, when it was
surrounded
with tender and romantic associations,
and when it called up those mingled emotions of
love, respect, and gallantry, with which we regard
a cherished female relative. But I had seen her,
and the illusion was destroyed. Instead of the
lovely woman, endued with the appropriate graces
of her sex, I found her in the garb of the
wilderness
,
the voluntary companion of a savage, the
mother of squalid imps, who were destined to a
life of rapine; instead of a gentle and rational
being, I saw her coarse, sunburned, and ignorant
without sensibility, without feminine pride, and
with scarcely a perception of the moral
distinctions
between right and wrong. I left her. We
parted as we had met, in coldness and suspicion.
She gave me no invitation to repeat my visit, and
I had secretly resolved never to see her again.
In sorrow did I begin to retrace my steps
towards my own dwelling. Slowly, and under a
sense of deep humiliation, did I wander back to
the habitations of my own people. My heart was
changed. A shadow had fallen upon my spirit,
which gave a new hue to all my feelings. I could
feel that I was an altered man.
I reached the edge of the prairie, and seated
myself upon an elevated spot, under the shade of a
large tree. The wide lawn was spread before me,
glowing with the beams of the noon-day sun. A
gentle breeze fanned my temples that were
throbbing
with the excitement of deep emotion. The
angry passions of my heart were all hushed. The
storm of the soul had ceased to rage. Revenge
was obliterated. The blight of disappointment
had fallen upon me, and withered all the currents
of feeling. The past was a dreama chaos.
New-born feelings struggled for existence. I
pronounced
my sister's name, and burst into tears.
How grateful it is to weep when the heart is
oppressed! How soothing is that gush of
tenderness
,
which, as it pours itself out, seems to relieve
the bursting fountains of sensibility, and to draw
off a flood of bitterness from the soul!
A more calm and a more wholesome train of
reflection succeeded. I had long cherished a
vision, which one moment had destroyed. In the
place of an infant sister who was lost to me, I had
created the image of an ideal being, who became
invested with all the loveliness which an ardent
fancy could depictand giving the rein to my
imagination, I had alternately revenged her death,
or had indulged the fond anticipation of meeting
her again, not only in the bloom of womanhood,
but in the possession of those virtues and
attractions
which give dignity and beauty to the female
character. She had been the companion of my
childish sports; and while I cherished an intense
fondness for my early playmate, could I doubt that
her heart, if still in existence, throbbed with a
responsive feeling? I had seen her, and the illusion
9
was dispelled. The murderers of our mother
and our father had taken her to their bosoms, and
her destiny was linked with theirs. She was the
wife and mother of savages.
Yes
my sister
,she, for whom I would have
willingly offered up my life, and whose image had
so long been treasured in my memory, was
contented
,
perhaps
happy
, in the embraces of a
savage, at the very time when I was lying in
ambush by the war-path, or painfully following
the trace of the painted warrior, to revenge her
supposed wrongs. And she had witnessed from
childhood those atrocious rites, the very mention
of which causes the white man's blood to curdle
with horror, and had grown familiar with scenes
of torture and murder,with the slaughter of the
defenceless prisoner, and the shriek of the dying
victim. She had assisted in decking her warrior
husband for the battle field, and received him to
her arms, while the guilty flush of the midnight
massacre was still upon his cheek. She had
heard him recount his exploits. She had listened
to the boastful repetition of his warlike deeds,
wherein he spake of the stealthy march towards
the habitations of the white manof the darkness
that hung around the settler's cabinof the silence
and repose withinof the sudden onsetof the
anguish of that little family, aroused from slumber
by the flames curling over their heads, and the
yells of savages around themof the children
clinging to their mother, and the wife slaughtered
upon her husband's bosomwith all the revolting
particulars of those demoniac scenes of carnage.
She had been an attentive and an approving
auditor
,
for her husband was the narrator and the
hero, and her children were destined to acquire
reputation by emulating his achievements.
It was enough to have met her in that hated
garbto have seen her sallow cheek, her wary
eye, and her countenance veiled in the insipid
ignorance of an uncivilised womanto have found
her the drudge of an Indian hunterto have
learned that she had forgotten her brother, and
become estranged from the people of her blood
but the conviction that she was the willing
companion
of murderers, the wife of a trained assassin,
weighed down my heart with a pang of unutterable
anguish.
But if they were murderers, what was I?
I was startled. I looked around; for it seemed
as if a voice had addressed me. But there was
no one nighno form was to be seen, and not a
footstep rustled the grass. It was conscience that
asked that question. It was the inward moving
of my own spirit. There was nothing around me
to suggest it. I looked abroad upon the plain,
and all was silent, and beautiful, and bright. The
sun was shining in unclouded lustre over the
spacious lawn, the flowers bloomed in gaudy
splendour, the bee was busy, and the bird sang.
The face of nature was reposing in serene beauty,
and every living thing was cheerful, except
myself
.
And why was I unhappy? A blight had fallen
upon my youth, and every tie that bound me to
my race was severed. True: but others had
been thus bereaved, without becoming thus
incurably
miserable. They had formed new ties, and
become re-united to humanity by other affections,
while I had refused to be comforted. They had
submitted to the will of God, while I had followed
the devices of my own heart.
These reflections were painful, and I tried to
resume my former train of thought. But
conscience
had spoken, and no man can hush its
voice. We may wander long in error, the
perverted
mind may grope for years in guilt or in
mistake, but there is a time when that faithful
monitor within, which is ever true, will speak.
That small still voice, which cannot be suppressed,
again and again repeated the appalling question:
If they are murderers, what are you?
The difference, I replied, is that between the
aggressor and the injured party. They burned
the home of my childhood, and murdered all my
kindred. I have revenged the wrong. They
made war upon my country, ravaged its borders,
and slew its people. I have struck them in
retaliation
.
But had
they
suffered no injury? Was it true
that they were the first agressors? I had never
examined this question. Revenge is a poor
casuist
;
and, for the first time in my life, I began to
think it possible, that mutual aggressions had
placed both parties in the wrong, and that either
might justly complain of the aggressions of the
other.
That which gave me the most acute pain, and
which was the immediate cause of the
self-accusatory
train of reflection into which I had fallen,
was the conviction that nearly my whole life had
been passed in delusion. I had imagined the
death of a sister who was livingI had punished,
as her destroyers, those who had treated her with
kindnessI had spent years in a retaliating
warfare
,
which, so far as she was concerned, was
unjust. I had watched, and fought, and suffered
incredible hardships, for one who neither needed
my interference, claimed my protection, nor was
capable of feeling any gratitude for the sacrifices
which I had made. If, in respect to her, I had
been thus far deluded, might I not have been in
error in regard to other parts of my scheme?
Admitting that it was justifiable to revenge the
murder of my parents, had I not exceeded the
equitable measure of retaliation? It is one of the
9*
strongest arguments against the principle of
revenge
,
that it is directed by no rule, and bounded
by no limit. The aggrieved party is the judge of
his own wrong, and the executioner of his own
sentence; and the measure of recompense is
seldom
in proportion to the degree of offence.
When once the heart is disturbed by suspicions
of its own rectitude, and the work of repentance is
commenced, there is no longer any neutral ground
upon which it is satisfied to rest. It must smother
the suggestions of conscience, or carry them out
to complete conviction. Adopting the latter
course, I went mournfully home, resolved to study
my own heart. Resorting to that sublime code of
morals, some of whose precepts had been
impressed
upon my infant mind by the careful
solicitude
of a mother, and testing my conduct by its
unerring rules, I learned to look back with horror
upon the bloody path which I had trod through
life; and I determined, by the usefulness of my
future years, to endeavour to make some
atonement
for my former guilty career of crime and
passion.
The garb I now wear, and the employment in
which you find me, sufficiently explain the result
of my reflections, and the extent of my
reformation
.
THE FRENCH VILLAGE
On the borders of the Mississippi may be seen
the remains of an old French village, which once
boasted a numerous population of as happy and as
thoughtless souls as over danced to a violin. If
content is wealth, as philosophers would fain
persuade
us, they were opulent; but they would have
been reckoned miserably poor by those who
estimate
worldly riches by the more popular standard.
Their houses were scattered in disorder, like the
tents of a wandering tribe, along the margin of a
deep bayou, and not far from its confluence with
the river, between which and the town was a strip
of rich alluvion, covered with a gigantic growth
of forest trees. Beyond the bayou was a swamp,
which, during the summer heats, was nearly dry,
but in the rainy season presented a vast lake of
several miles in extent. The whole of this morass
was thickly set with cypress, whose interwoven
branches, and close foliage, excluded the sun, and
rendered this as gloomy a spot as the most
melancholy
poet ever dreamt of. And yet it was not
tenantlessand there were seasons when its dark
recesses were enlivened by notes peculiar to itself.
Here the young Indian, not yet entrusted to wield
the tomahawk, might be seen paddling his light
canoe among the tall weeds, darting his arrows at
the paroquets that chattered among the boughs,
and screaming and laughing with delight as he
stripped their gaudy plumage. Here myriads of
musquitoes filled the air with an incessant hum,
and thousands of frogs attuned their voices in
harmonious
concert, as if endeavouring to rival the
sprightly fiddles of their neighbours; and the owl,
peeping out from the hollow of a blasted tree,
screeched forth his wailing note, as if moved by
the terrific energy of grief. From this gloomy
spot, clouds of miasm rolled over the village,
spreading volumes of bile and dyspepsia abroad
upon the land; and sometimes countless
multitudes
of musquitoes, issuing from the humid
desert, assailed the devoted village with
inconceivable
fury, threatening to draw from its
inhabitants
every drop of French blood which yet
circulated in their veins. But these evils by no
means dismayed, or even interrupted the gaiety of
this happy people. When the musquitoes came,
the monsieurs lighted their pipes, and kept up not
only a brisk fire, but a dense smoke, against the
assailants; and when the fever threatened, the
priest, who was also the doctor, flourished his
lancet, the fiddler flourished his bow, and the
happy villagers flourished their heels, and sang,
and laughed, and fairly cheated death, disease,
and the doctor, of patient and of prey.
Beyond the town, on the other side, was an
extensive prairiea vast unbroken plain of rich
green, embellished with innumerable flowers of
every tint, and whose beautiful surface presented
no other variety than here and there a huge
moundthe venerable monument of departed ages
or a solitary tree of stinted growth, shattered
by the blast, and pining alone in the gay desert.
The prospect was bounded by a range of tall
bluffs, which overlooked the prairiecovered at
some points with groves of timber, and at others
exhibiting their naked sides, or high, bald peaks,
to the eye of the beholder. Herds of deer might
be seen here at sunrise, slyly retiring to their
coverts
,
after rioting away the night on the rich
pasturage. Here the lowing kine lived, if not in
clover, at least in something equally nutritious;
and here might be seen immense droves of French
ponies, roaming untamed, the common stock of
the village, ready to be reduced to servitude by
any lady or gentleman who chose to take the
trouble.
With their Indian neighbours the inhabitants
had maintained a cordial intercourse, which had
never yet been interrupted by a single act of
aggression
on either side. It is worthy of remark,
that the French have invariably been more
successful
in securing the confidence and affection of
the Indian tribes than any other nation. Others
have had leagues with them, which, for a time,
have been faithfully observed; but the French
alone have won them to the familiar intercourse
of social life, lived with them in the mutual
interchange
of kindness; and, by treating them as
friends and equals, gained their entire confidence.
This result, which has been attributed to the
sagacious
policy of their government, is perhaps more
owing to the conciliatory manners of that amiable
people, and the absence among them of that
insatiable
avarice, that boundless ambition, that
reckless
prodigality of human life, that unprincipled
disregard of public and solemn leagues, which, in
the conquests of the British and the Spaniards,
have marked their footsteps with misery, and
blood, and desolation.
This little colony was composed, partly, of
emigrants
from France, and partly of nativesnot
Indiansbut
bona fide
French, born in America;
but preserving their language, their manners, and
their agility in dancing, although several
generations
had passed away since their first settlement.
Here they lived perfectly happy, and well they
mightfor they enjoyed, to the full extent, those
three blessings on which our declaration of
independence
has laid so much stresslife, liberty,
and the pursuit of happiness. Their lives, it is
true, were sometimes threatened by the miasm
aforesaid; but this was soon ascertained to be an
imaginary danger. For whether it was owing to
their temperance, or their cheerfulness, or their
activity, or to their being acclimated, or to the
want of attraction between French people and
fever, or to all these togethercertain it is, that
they were blessed with a degree of health only
enjoyed by the most favoured nations. As to
liberty, the wild Indian scarcely possessed more;
for, although the grand monarque had not more
loyal subjects in his wide domains, he had never
condescended to honour them with a single act of
oppression, unless the occasional visits of the
commandant
could be so called; who sometimes, when
levying supplies, called upon the village for its
portion, which they always contributed with many
protestations of gratitude for the honour conferred
on them. And as for happiness, they pursued
nothing
else. Inverting the usual order, to enjoy
life was their daily business, to provide for its
wants an occasional labour, sweetened by its brief
continuance and its abundant fruit. They had a
large body of land around the village, held in
parcels
by individuals, to whom it was granted by the
crown. Most of this was allowed to remain in
open pasturage; but a considerable tract, including
the lands of a number of individuals, was inclosed
in a single fence, and called the common field,
in which all worked harmoniously, though each
cultivated his own acres. They were not an
agricultural
people, further than the rearing of a few
esculents for the table made them such; relying
chiefly on their large herds, and on the produce
of the chase, for support. With the Indians they
drove an amicable, though not extensive, trade
for furs and peltry; giving them in exchange
merchandise
and trinkets, which they procured from
their countrymen at St. Louis. To the latter
place they annually carried their skins, bringing
back a fresh supply of goods for barter, together
with such articles as their own wants required;
not forgetting a large portion of finery for the
ladies, a plentiful supply of rosin and catgut for
the fiddler, and liberal presents for his reverence,
the priest.
If this village had no other recommendation, it
is endeared to my recollection as the birth-place
and residence of Monsieur Baptiste Menou, who
was one of its principal inhabitants when I first
visited it. He was a bachelor of forty, a tall,
lank, hard-featured personage, as straight as a
ramrod, and almost as thin, with stiff, black hair,
sunken cheeks, and a complexion a tinge darker
than that of the aborigines. His person was
remarkably
erect, his countenance grave, his gait
deliberate; and when to all this be added an
enormous
pair of sable whiskers, it will be admitted
that Mons. Baptiste was no insignificant person.
He had many estimable qualities of mind and
person, which endeared him to his friends, whose
respect was increased by the fact of his having
been a soldier and a traveller. In his youth he
had followed the French commandant in two
campaigns
;
and not a comrade in the ranks was better
dressed, or cleaner shaved, on parade than
Baptiste
,
who fought, besides, with the characteristic
bravery of the nation to which he owed his lineage.
He acknowledged, however, that war was not as
pleasant a business as is generally supposed.
Accustomed
to a life totally free from constraint, the
discipline of the camp ill accorded with his
desultory
habits. He complained of being obliged to
eat, and drink, and sleep, at the call of the drum.
Burnishing a gun, and brushing a coat, and
polishing
shoes, were duties beneath a gentleman; and,
after all, Baptiste saw but little honour in tracking
the wily Indians through endless swamps.
Besides
,
he began to have some scruples as to the
propriety of cutting the throats of the respectable
gentry whom he had been in the habit of
considering
as the original and lawful possessors of the
10
soil. He therefore proposed to resign, and was
surprised when his commander informed him that
he was enlisted for a term, which was not yet
expired. He bowed, shrugged his shoulders, and
submitted to his fate. He had too much honour
to desert, and was too loyal, and too polite, to
murmur; but he, forthwith, made a solemn vow
to his patron saint, never again to get into a scrape
from which he could not retreat whenever it suited
his convenience. It was thought that he owed
his celibacy, in some measure, to this vow. He
had since accompanied the friendly Indians on
several hunting expeditions, towards the sources
of the Mississippi, and had made a trading voyage
to New Orleans. Thus accomplished, he had
been more than once called upon by the
commandant
to act as a guide, or an interpreter
honours which failed not to elicit suitable marks
of respect from his fellow villagers, but which had
not inflated the honest heart of Baptiste with any
unbecoming pride; on the contrary, there was
not a more modest man in the village.
In his habits, he was the most regular of men.
He might be seen at any hour of the day, either
sauntering through the village, or seated in front
of his own door, smoking a large pipe formed of a
piece of buck-horn, curiously hollowed out, and
lined with tin; to which was affixed a short stem
of cane from the neighbouring swamp. This pipe
was his inseparable companion; and he evinced
towards it a constancy which would have
immortalized
his name, had it been displayed in a better
cause. When he walked abroad, it was to stroll
leisurely from door to door, chatting familiarly
with his neighbours, patting the white-haired
children on the head, and continuing his lounge
until he had peregrinated the village. His
gravity
was not a mysterious carriage of the body
to conceal the defects of the mind, but a
constitutional
seriousness of aspect, which covered as
happy and as humane a spirit as ever existed. It
was simply a want of sympathy between his
muscles
and his brains; the former utterly refusing to
express any agreeable sensation which might haply
titillate the organs of the latter. Honest Baptiste
loved a joke, and uttered many and good ones;
but his rigid features refused to smile even at his
own wita circumstance which I am the more
particular in mentioning, as it is not common.
He had an orphan niece, whom he had reared
from childhood to maturity,a lovely girl, of
whose beautiful complexion a poet might say, that
its roses were cushioned upon ermine. A sweeter
flower bloomed not upon the prairie, than Gabrielle
Menou. But as she was never afflicted with weak
nerves, dyspepsia, or consumption, and had but
one avowed lover, whom she treated with uniform
kindness, and married with the consent of all
parties
,
she has no claim to be considered as the
heroine of this history. That station will be
cheerfully awarded, by every sensible reader, to
the more important personage who will be
presently
introduced.
Across the street, immediately opposite to Mons.
Baptiste, lived Mademoiselle Jeanette Duval, a lady
who resembled him in some respects, but in many
others was his very antipode. Like him, she was
cheerful, and happy, and singlebut unlike him,
she was brisk, and fat, and plump. Monsieur was
the very pink of gravity; and Mademoiselle was
blessed with a goodly portion thereof,but hers
was specific gravity. Her hair was dark, but her
heart was light; and her eyes, though black, were
as brilliant a pair of orbs as ever beamed upon the
dreary solitude of a bachelor's heart. Jeanette's
heels were as light as her heart, and her tongue
as active as her heels; so that, notwithstanding
her rotundity, she was as brisk a Frenchwoman
as ever frisked through the mazes of a cotillion.
To sum her perfections, her complexion was of a
darker olive than the genial sun of France confers
on her brunettes, and her skin was as smooth and
shining as polished mahogany. Her whole
household
consisted of herself and a female negro
servant
.
A spacious garden, which surrounded her
house, a pony, and a herd of cattle, constituted, in
addition to her personal charms, all the wealth of
this amiable spinster. But with these she was
rich, as they supplied her table without adding
much to her cares. Her quadrupeds, according
to the example set by their superiors, pursued
their own happiness, without let or molestation,
wherever they could find itwaxing fat or lean,
as nature was more or less bountiful in supplying
their wants; and when they strayed too far, or
when her agricultural labours became too arduous
for the feminine strength of herself and her sable
assistant, every monsieur of the village was proud
of an occasion to serve Mam'selle. And well they
might be; for she was the most notable lady in
the village, the life of every party, the soul of
every frolic. She participated in every festive
meeting, and every sad solemnity. Not a
neighbour
could get up a dance, or get down a dose of
bark, without her assistance. If the ball grew
dull, Mam'selle bounced on the floor, and infused
new spirit into the weary dancers. If the
conversation
flagged, Jeanette, who occupied a kind of
neutral ground between the young and the old, the
married and the single, chatted with all, and
loosened
all tongues. If the girls wished to stroll in
the woods, or romp on the prairie, Mam'selle was
taken along to keep off the wolves and the rude
young men; and, in respect to the latter, she
faithfully performed her office by attracting them
around her own person. Then she was the best
10*
neighbour and the kindest soul! She made the
richest soup, the clearest coffee, and the neatest
pastry in the village; and, in virtue of her
confectionary
,
was the prime favourite of all the
children. Her hospitality was not confined to
her own domicil, but found its way, in the shape
of sundry savoury viands, to every table in the
vicinity. In the sick chamber she was the most
assiduous nurse, her step was the lightest, and her
voice the most cheerfulso that the priest must
inevitably have become jealous of her skill, had it
not been for divers plates of rich soup, and bottles
of cordial, with which she conciliated his favour,
and purchased absolution for these and other
offences
.
Baptiste and Jeanette were the best of
neighbours
.
He always rose at the dawn, and, after
lighting his pipe, sallied forth into the open air,
where Jeanette usually made her appearance at
the same time; for there was an emulation of long
standing between them, which should be the
earliest
riser.
Bon jour! Mam'selle Jeanette, was his daily
salutation.
Ah! bon jour! bon jour! Mons. Menou, was
her daily reply.
Then, as he gradually approximated the little
paling which surrounded her door, he hoped
Mam'selle
was well this morning; and she reiterated
the kind enquiry, but with increased emphasis.
Then Monsieur enquired after Mam'selle's pony,
and Mam'selle's cow, and her garden, and every
thing appertaining to her, real, personal, and
mixed; and she displayed a corresponding
interest
in all concerns of her kind neighbour. These
discussions were mutually beneficial. If
Mam'selle's
cattle ailed, or if her pony was guilty of
any impropriety, who so able to advise her as
Mons. Baptiste? and if his plants drooped, or his
poultry died, who so skilful in such matters as
Mam'selle Jeanette? Sometimes Baptiste forgot
his pipe, in the superior interest of the tte
tte, and must needs step in to light it at
Jeanette's
fire, which caused the gossips of the village
to say, that he purposely let his pipe go out, in
order that he might himself go in. But he denied
this; and, indeed, before offering to enter the
dwelling of Mam'selle on such occasions, he
usually
solicited permission to light his pipe at
Jeanette's
sparkling eyesa compliment at which,
although it had been repeated some scores of
times, Mam'selle never failed to laugh and curtsey
with great good humour and good breeding.
It cannot be supposed that a bachelor of so much
discernment could long remain insensible to the
galaxy of charms which centred in the person of
Mam'selle Jeanette; and, accordingly, it was
currently
reported that a courtship, of some ten years
standing, had been slyly conducted on his part,
and as cunningly eluded on hers. It was not
averred that Baptiste had actually gone the
fearful
length of offering his hand, or that Jeanette
had been so imprudent as to discourage, far less
reject, a lover of such respectable pretensions.
But there was thought to exist a strong hankering
on the part of the gentleman, which the lady had
managed so skilfully as to keep his mind in a kind
of equilibrium, like that of the patient animal
between
the two bundles of hayso that he would
sometimes halt in the street, midway between the
two cottages, and cast furtive glances, first at the
one, and then at the other, as if weighing the
balance of comfort; while the increased volumes
of smoke, which issued from his mouth, seemed
to argue that the fire of his love had other fuel
than tobacco, and was literally consuming the
inward
man. The wary spinster was always on the
alert on such occasions, manuvring like a
skilful
general according to circumstances. If honest
Baptiste, after such a consultation, turned on his
heel, and retired to his former cautious position at
his own door, Mam'selle rallied all her attractions,
and by a sudden demonstration drew him again
into the field; but if he marched with an
embarrassed
air towards her gate, she retired into her
castle, or kept shy, and, by able evolutions, avoided
every thing which might bring matters to an issue.
Thus the courtship continued longer than the siege
of Troy, and Jeanette maintained her freedom,
while Baptiste, with a magnanimity superior to
that of Agamemnon, kept his temper, and smoked
his pipe in good humour with Jeanette and all the
world.
Such was the situation of affairs when I first
visited this village, about the time of the cession
of Louisiana to the United States. The news of
that event had just reached this sequestered spot,
and was but indifferently relished. Independently
of the national attachment which all men feel, and
the French so justly, the inhabitants of this region
had reason to prefer, to all others, the government
which had afforded them protection without
constraining
their freedom, or subjecting them to any
burthens; and with the kindest feelings towards
the Americans, they would willingly have
dispensed
with any nearer connection than that
which already existed. They, however, said little
on the subject; and that little was expressive of
their cheerful acquiescence in the honour done
them by the American people, in buying the
country
,
which the emperor had done them the honour
to sell.
It was on the first day of the Carnival that I
arrived in the village, about sunset, seeking shelter
only for the night, and intending to proceed on my
journey in the morning. The notes of the violin,
and the groups of gaily attired people who thronged
the street, attracted my attention, and induced me
to enquire the occasion of this merriment. My
host informed me that a king ball was to be
given at the house of a neighbour, adding the
agreeable intimation, that strangers were always
expected to attend without invitation. Young and
ardent, little persuasion was required to induce me
to change my dress, and hasten to the scene of
festivity. The moment I entered the room, I felt
that I was welcome. Not a single look of
surprise
,
not a glance of more than ordinary
attention
,
denoted me as a stranger or an unexpected
guest. The gentlemen nearest the door bowed as
they opened a passage for me through the crowd,
in which for a time I mingled, apparently
unnoticed
.
At length a young gentleman, adorned
with a large nosegay, approached me, invited
me to join the dancers, and, after enquiring my
name, introduced me to several females, among
whom I had no difficulty in selecting a graceful
partner. I was passionately fond of dancing, so
that, readily imbibing the joyous spirit of those
around me, I advanced rapidly in their estimation.
The native ease and elegance of the females, reared
in the wilderness and unhacknied in the forms of
society, surprised and delighted me as much as
the amiable frankness of all classes. By and by
the dancing ceased, and four young ladies of
exquisite
beauty, who had appeared during the
evening
to assume more consequence than the others,
stood alone on the floor. For a moment their
arch glances wandered over the company who
stood silently around, when one of them,
advancing
to a young gentleman, led him into the circle,
and, taking a large bouquet from her own bosom,
pinned it upon the left breast of his coat, and
pronounced
him KING! The gentleman kissed his
fair elector, and led her to a seat. Two others
were selected almost at the same moment. The
fourth lady hesitated for an instant, then advancing
to the spot where I stood, presented me her hand,
led me forward, and placed the symbol on my
breast, before I could recover from the surprise
into which the incident had thrown me. I
regained
my presence of mind, however, in time to
salute my lovely consort; and never did king
enjoy, with more delight, the first fruits of his
elevationfor the beautiful Gabrielle, with whom
I had just danced, and who had so unexpectedly
raised me, as it were, to the purple, was the
freshest
and fairest flower in this gay assemblage.
This ceremony was soon explained to me. On
the first day of the Carnival, four self-appointed
kings, having selected their queens, give a ball, at
their own proper costs, to the whole village. In
the course of that evening the queens select, in
the manner described, the kings for the ensuing
day, who choose their queens, in turn, by
presenting
the nosegay and the kiss. This is repeated
every evening in the week;the kings, for the
time being, giving the ball at their own expense,
and all the inhabitants attending without
invitation
.
On the morning after each ball, the kings
of the preceding evening make small presents to
their late queens, and their temporary alliance is
dissolved. Thus commenced my acquaintance
with Gabrielle Menou, who, if she cost me a few
sleepless nights, amply repaid me in the many
happy hours for which I was indebted to her
friendship.
I remained several weeks at this hospitable
village
.
Few evenings passed without a dance, at
which all were assembled, young and old; the
mothers vying in agility with their daughters,
and the old men setting examples of gallantry to
the young. I accompanied their young men to
the Indian towns, and was hospitably entertained.
I followed them to the chase, and witnessed the
fall of many a noble buck. In their light canoes
I glided over the turbid waters of the Mississippi,
or through the labyrinths of the morass, in pursuit
of water fowl. I visited the mounds, where the
bones of thousands of warriors were mouldering,
overgrown with prairie violets and thousands of
nameless flowers. I saw the mocasin snake
basking
in the sun, the elk feeding on the prairie; and
returned to mingle in the amusements of a circle,
where, if there was not Parisian elegance, there
was more than Parisian cordiality.
Several years passed away before I again visited
this country. The jurisdiction of the American
government was now extended over this immense
region, and its beneficial effects were beginning to
be widely disseminated. The roads were crowded
with the teams, and herds, and families of
emigrants
,
hastening to the land of promise.
Steamboats
navigated every stream, the axe was heard
in every forest, and the plough broke the sod
whose verdure had covered the prairie for ages.
It was sunset when I reached the margin of the
prairie on which the village is situated. My horse,
wearied with a long day's travel, sprung forward
with new vigour when his hoof struck the smooth,
firm road which led across the plain. It was a
narrow path, winding among the tall grass, now
tinged with the mellow hues of autumn. I gazed
with delight over the beautiful surface. The
mounds and the solitary trees were there, just
as I had left them, and they were familiar to my
eye as the objects of yesterday. It was eight
miles across the prairie, and I had not passed
half the distance when night set in. I strained
my eyes to catch a glimpse of the village, but
two large mounds, and a clump of trees which
intervened, defeated my purpose. I thought of
11
Gabrielle, and Jeanette, and Baptiste, and the
priestthe fiddles, dances, and French ponies;
and fancied every minute an hour, and every foot
a mile, which separated me from scenes and
persons
so deeply impressed on my imagination.
At length I passed the mounds, and beheld the
lights twinkling in the village, now about two
miles off, like a brilliant constellation in the
horizon
.
The lights seemed very numerousI thought
they moved, and at last discovered that they were
rapidly passing about. What can be going on
in the village? thought Ithen a strain of music
met my earthey are going to dance, said I,
striking my spurs into my jaded nag, and I shall
see all my friends together. But as I drew near
a volume of sounds burst upon me, such as defied
all conjecture. Fiddles, flutes and tambourines,
drums, cow-horns, tin trumpets, and kettles,
mingled
their discordant notes with a strange
accompaniment
of laughter, shouts, and singing. This
singular concert proceeded from a mob of men
and boys who paraded through the streets,
preceded
by one who blew an immense tin horn, and
ever and anon shouted, Cha-ri-va-ry! Charivary!
to which the mob responded, Charivary! I
now recollected to have heard of a custom which
prevails among the American French, of
serenading
,
at the marriage of a widow or widower, with
such a concert as I now witnessed; and I rode
towards the crowd, who had halted before a
well-known
door, to ascertain who were the happy
parties.
Charivary! shouted the leader.
Pour qui? said another voice.
Pour Mons. Baptiste Menou, il est mari?
Avec qui?
Avec Mam'selle Jeanette DuvalCharivary!
Charivary! shouted the whole company, and
a torrent of music poured from the full bandtin
kettles, cow-horns and all.
The door of the little cabin, whose hospitable
threshold I had so often crossed, now opened, and
Baptiste made his appearancethe identical, lank,
sallow, erect personage, with whom I had parted
several years before, with the same pipe in his
mouth. His visage was as long and as melancholy
as ever, except that there was a slight tinge of
triumph in its expression, and a bashful casting
down of the eyereminding one of a conqueror,
proud but modest in his glory. He gazed with an
embarrassed air at the serenaders, bowed
repeatedly
,
as if conscious that he was the hero of the
night, and then exclaimed
For what you make this charivary?
Charivary! shouted the mob; and the tin
trumpets gave an exquisite flourish.
Gentlemen! expostulated the bridegroom,
for why you make this charivary for me? I
have never been marry beforeand Mam'selle
Jeanette has never been marry before!
Roll went the drum!cow-horns, kettles, tin
trumpets, and fiddles, poured forth volumes of
sound, and the mob shouted in unison.
Gentlemen! pardonnez-moi supplicated the
distressed Baptiste. If I understan dis custom,
which have long prevail vid us, it is vat I say
ven a gentilman, who has been marry before, shall
marry de second timeor ven a lady have de
misfortune to loose her husban, and be so happy
to marry some odder gentilman, den we make de
charivarybut 'tis not so wid Mam'selle Duval
and me. Upon my honour we have never been
marry before dis time!
Why, Baptiste, said one, you certainly have
been married, and have a daughter grown.
Oh, excuse me, sir! Madame St. Marie is
my niece; I have never been so happy to be marry,
until Mam'selle Duval have do me dis honneur.
Well, well! it's all one. If you have not been
married, you ought to have been, long ago:and
might have been, if you had said the word.
Ah, gentilmen, you mistake.
No, no! there's no mistake about it.
Mam'selle
Jeanette would have had you ten years ago,
if you had asked her.
You flatter too much, said Baptiste,
shrugging
his shoulders;and finding there was no
means of avoiding the charivary, he, with great
good humour, accepted the serenade, and,
according
to custom, invited the whole party into his
house.
I retired to my former quarters, at the house of
an old settlera little, shrivelled, facetious
Frenchman
,
whom I found in his red flannel night-cap,
smoking his pipe, and seated like Jupiter in the
midst of clouds of his own creating.
Merry doings in the village! said I, after we
had shaken hands.
Eh, bien! Mons. Baptiste is marry to
Mam'selle
Jeanette.
I see the boys are making merry on the
occasion
.
Ah, sacre! de dem boy! they have play hell
to night.
Indeed! how so?
For make dis charivarydat is how so, my
friend. Dis come for have d' Americain
government
to rule de countrie. Parbleu! they make
charivary for de old maid and de old bachelor!
I now found that some of the new settlers, who
had witnessed this ludicrous ceremony without
exactly understanding its application, had been
foremost in promoting the present irregular
exhibition
,
in conjunction with a few degenerate French,
whose love of fun outstripped their veneration for
their ancient usages. The old inhabitants,
although
11*
they joined in the laugh, were nevertheless
not a little scandalised at the innovation. Indeed,
they had good reason to be alarmed; for their
ancient customs, like their mud-walled cottages,
were crumbling to ruins around them, and every
day destroyed some vestige of former years.
Upon enquiry, I found that many causes of
discontent
had combined to embitter the lot of my
simple-hearted friends. Their ancient allies, the
Indians, had sold their hunting grounds, and their
removal deprived the village of its only branch of
commerce. Surveyors were busily employed in
measuring off the whole country, with the avowed
intention, on the part of the government, of
converting
into private property those beautiful regions
which had heretofore been free to all who trod
the soil or breathed the air. Portions of it were
already thus occupied. Farms and villages were
spreading over the country with alarming rapidity,
deforming the face of nature, and scaring the elk
and the buffalo from their long frequented ranges.
Yankees and Kentuckians were pouring in,
bringing
with them the selfish distinctions and
destructive
spirit of society. Settlements were planted
in the immediate vicinity of the village; and the
ancient heritage of the ponies was invaded by the
ignoble beasts of the interlopers. Certain
pregnant
indications of civil degeneration were alive
in the land. A county had been established, with
a judge, a clerk, and a sheriff; a court-house and
jail were about to be built; two lawyers had
already made a lodgment at the county site; and
a number of justices of the peace, and constables,
were dispersed throughout a small neighbourhood
of not more than fifty miles in extent. A brace
of physicians had floated in with the stream of
population, and several other persons of the same
cloth were seen passing about, brandishing their
lancets in the most hostile manner. The French
argued very reasonably from all these premises
that a people who brought their own doctors
expected
to be sick, and that those who commenced
operations in a new country, by providing so many
engines and officers of justice, must certainly intend
to be very wicked and litigious. But when the
new comers went the fearful length of enrolling
them in the militia; when the sheriff, arrayed in
all the terrors of his office, rode into the village,
and summoned them to attend the court as jurors;
when they heard the judge enumerate to the grand
jury the long list of offences which fell within their
cognizance;these good folks shook their heads,
and declared that this was no longer a country for
them.
From that time the village began to depopulate.
Some of its inhabitants followed the footsteps of
the Indians, and continue, to this day, to trade
between them and the whitesforming a kind of
link between civilised and savage men. A larger
portion, headed by the priest, floated down the
Mississippi, to seek congenial society among the
sugar plantations of their countrymen in the south.
They found a pleasant spot on the margin of a
large bayou, whose placid stream was enlivened
by droves of alligators, sporting their innocent
gambols on its surface. Swamps, extending in
every direction, protected them from further
intrusion
.
Here a new village arose, and a young
generation of French was born, as happy and as
careless as that which is passing away.
Baptiste alone adhered to the soil of his fathers,
and Jeanette, in obedience to her marriage vow,
cleaved to Baptiste. He sometimes talked of
following
his clan, but when the hour came he could
never summon fortitude to pull up his stakes. He
had passed so many happy years of single
blessedness
in his own cabin, and had been so long
accustomed
to view that of Jeanette with a wistful eye,
that they had become necessary to his happiness.
Like other idle bachelors, he had had his
day-dreams
,
pointing to future enjoyment. He had
been, for years, planning the junction of his
domains
with those of his fair neighbour; had
arranged how the fences were to intersect, the
fields to be enlarged, and the whole to be managed
by the thrifty economy of his partner. All these
plans were now about to be realised; and he wisely
concluded that he could smoke his pipe, and talk
to Jeanette, as comfortably here as elsewhere;
and as he had not danced for many years, and
Jeanette was growing rather too corpulent for
that exercise, he reasoned that even the
deprivation
of the fiddles and king balls could be borne.
Jeanette loved comfort too; but having, besides,
a sharp eye for the main chance, was governed
by a deeper policy. By a prudent appropriation
of her own savings, and those of her husband, she
purchased from the emigrants many of the fairest
acres in the village, and thus secured an ample
property.
A large log house has since been erected in the
space between the cottages of Baptiste and
Jeanette
,
which form wings to the main building, and
are carefully preserved in remembrance of old
times. All the neighbouring houses have fallen
down, and a few heaps of rubbish, surrounded by
corn fields, show where they stood. All is changed,
except the two proprietors, who live here in ease
and plenty, exhibiting, in their old age, the same
amiable character, which, in early life, won for
them the respect and love of their neighbours and
of each other.
THE SPY.
A TALE OF THE REVOLUTION.
Although the title which we have chosen for
this volume, would seem to confine us, in the
selection of our scenes, to an imaginary line
which forms the boundary of our settled
population
,
yet, in fact, the limit which it imposes refers
rather to time than place, for ours is a moving
frontier, which is continually upon the advance.
What is now the
border
, has but recently
assumed
that character, and if we trace back the
history of our country to its earliest period, in
search of the stirring scenes attendant upon a
state of war, we shall find ourselves rapidly
travelling
towards the shores of the Atlantic. There
has been a point in the history of every state in
the Union, when a portion of its territory was a
wilderness, and a part, at least of its settlements,
subjected to invasion; and there have been more
recent and longer periods, when every state
contained
extensive districts which were thinly
settled
,
and but little frequented by strangers, and
where all the vicissitudes and adventures of the
border life were experienced by the inhabitants.
It is this circumstance which renders the whole of
our broad empire so rich in materials for the
novelistfor every part of it has been the seat of
war, or the scene of border conflict, and there is
scarcely a spot where some tradition of a romantic
character may not be gathered. I hope,
therefore
,
that the following legend will not be
considered
as inappropriately grouped with the others
which form this little collection.
In a secluded neighbourhood, on the banks of
the romantic Susquehanna, stands a large
old-fashioned
brick house, which, at a period previous
to the revolutionary war, was a very important
mansion, but has now a mean and dilapidated
appearance. It was, when erected, the only
respectable
building in the whole region of country
in which it stands, and was thought to be a noble
specimen of architectural skill and magnificence.
It was surrounded by a very large plantation,
appropriated
chiefly to the culture of tobacco and
corn, and studded in every direction with little
cabins inhabited by negroes. A fine garden, an
extensive orchard, and a meadow, in which a
number of high-bred horses sported their graceful
limbs, showed the proprietor to be a gentleman of
easy fortune.
He was indeed, as I learned from tradition, a
very wealthy and excellent old gentleman. His
portrait, which I used to gaze at with admiration
in my childhood, still hangs in the ancient hall,
and sufficiently denotes the character of the
original
.
It is that of an elderly robust man, with a
fine high forehead, and a mild, though firm
expression
of countenance. One would pronounce
him to have been an unsophisticated man, who
had mingled but little with the world, but whose
natural understanding was strong. He was a
grave, taciturn person, of even temper, and of
benevolent and hospitable feelings. His eye was
remarkably finea large blue orb, full of mildness
and lovebut with a quiet self-command about it,
and a dash of something which said that the owner
was accustomed to be obeyed. He was dressed
in a snuff-coloured suit, of goodly dimensions; the
coat single-breasted, and without a collar, and the
wrists ornamented with hand-ruffles.
The portrait of the good lady, which hung by
that of her lord, exhibited a stately and very
beautiful woman, dressed in all the formal finery
of that age. Her complexion was delicately fair,
her mouth exquisitely sweet, and her eye proud
but whether that pride arose from the
consciousness
of her own beauty, or of her dominion over
the handsome gentleman whose name she bore, I
cannot, at this distance of time, pretend to
determine
.
It is whispered, however, that although
Mr. B.for this designation will serve our
present
purposeruled his dependents with absolute
authority, and influenced the affairs of the
neighbourhood
,
yet Mrs. B. usually carried her points.
I shall not attempt to describe the lady's dress, as
I am unlearned in those matters. If Mrs. Hale,
or Mrs. Child, or Mrs. Sigourney, or Mrs. Hentz,
or Miss Leslie, or Miss Sedgewick, or Miss Gould,
or any other of the hundred and one Mistresses or
Misses of our country, who
Grace this latter age with noble deeds
in the way of authorship, had the handling of this
delicate subject, it might be treated with ability,
and the fair writer would luxuriate among the
folds and ruffles of that curious specimen of the
ancient costume; suffice it, however, to say that
the venerable matron in question wore the hoop,
the stays, the close sleeves, and the high
head-dress
ornamented with trinkets, which were
common
,
among well-born dames, in those aristocratic
times. There was altogether, in addition to her
surpassing beauty, an air of pride, a lady-like
elegance
,
and a matronly dignity, about this lady,
which showed that she thought, and had a right
to think, well of herself; and which gave her a
12
well founded claim to the obedience of her
husband
,
and all others who might choose to submit
to her sway.
But to our story. It was during the most
stormy period of the revolution, and Squire B.
for he was a magistrateand Mrs. B. were both
stanch whigs. Net young whigs, nor modern
whigsbut the good old republican rebellious
whigs of the revolution. They had given two
gallant sons to their country, who were then
fighting
under the banners of Washington; and were
training up the remainder of a large progeny in
the hatred of tyranny, and the love of
independence
.
The neighbourhood in which they lived
was obscure, and thinly settled; there was no
public
house of any description within many miles;
and genteel strangers, who happened to pass along
towards night-fall, were generally, on enquiring
for lodgings, directed to the house of Squire B.,
where they were always sure of a cordial reception,
and a gratuitous and most hospitable
entertainment
.
So far from considering such a call as
an intrusion, this worthy couple deemed it a great
compliment; and would have thought themselves
slighted, had a reputable stranger visited the
neighbourhood without making their house his
home. And a most agreeable home it was to a
weary wayfarer. There was kindness without
bustle, and profusion without any affectation of
display. The self-invited guest was treated as an
honoured friend, and an invitation to remain
another
and another day, was usually accorded to
him. Indeed, when one of these chance guests
happened to be more agreeable than ordinary, the
hospitable Marylander never allowed him to depart
in less than a week, nor then without a present of
a bridle, a saddle, or perhaps a horse.
It was, as we remarked before, during a perilous
time of the revolution, when the hearts of our
patriot
ancestors were filled with doubt and anxiety,
that a solitary traveller rode up one evening to the
door of Mr. B. Several negro boys ran to meet
him; one opened the gate, another took his horse
by the bridle, and a third prepared to seize upon
his saddlebags. The stranger hesitated, looked
cautiously around, and enquired timidly for Mr. B.
Ole massa in de house, readen he book;
answered
one of the young Africans.
Do you think I can get permission to spend
the night here?
Oh yes, massa, for sartin. All de quality
stops here.
The stranger still paused, and then alighted
slowly, and paused again, as if conscious of the
awkwardness of intruding without invitation into
the house of one to whom he was entirely
unknown
.
The appearance of the portly owner of
the mansion, who now presented himself at the
door, seemed to increase his embarrasment, and
he began, rather bashfully, to make the
explanations
which appeared to be necessary.
I have ridden far to-day, said he, I am
tired, and my horse almost broken downI am
told there is no tavern in the neighbourhoodand
was directed herebut I fear I intrude.
Glad to see you, interrupted Mr. B. come,
sir, walk inthe boys will take care of your
horseyou are quite welcome; do ye hear, boys,
rub down that nag, and feed him wellno
apologies
are necessary, sirmake my house your
home, while you stay in the countrycome, sir,
walk inand so the old gentleman talked on
until he had got his guest fairly housed, stripped
of his overcoat and spurs, and seated by the fire,
on one side of which sat the lady of the house,
enthroned
in suitable state, in a high-backed arm
chair, while her consort placed himself in a
cushioned seat in the other corner. A group of
handsome daughters were clustered round the
worthy dame, like the bright satellites of a
brighter planetseated on low stools, that they
might learn to sit upright without leaning, and
sewing away industriously under the supervision
of the experienced matron. In the back ground,
immediately behind the ladies of the family, sat a
number of neatly dressed negro girls, carding,
knitting, and sewingin the process of being
trained up in the way that they should go, in
order that, when old, they should not depart from
it. These were intended for household domestics,
or for personal attendants upon the young ladies,
and were carefully taught all the thrifty arts of
female industry. Not the least remarkable
circumstance
which was calculated to attract the eye
of a stranger, was the scrupulous neatness of the
apartment, the stainless purity of the uncarpeted
floor, which was as polished, and shining, and
almost
as slippery, as ice, with other evidences
which attested the vigilant administration of an
admirable system of internal police.
The arrival of an unexpected guest caused no
disturbance in the well regulated household of
Mrs. B., whose ample board was always spread
with such a profusion of eatables, that the addition
of a company of grenadiers, to her already
numerous
family, would hardly have been an
inconvenience
.
But there were certain little hospitalities
requisite for the honour of the house, and to teach
the traveller that he was welcome; the good lady,
therefore, very formally laid aside her knitting
and retired, while a servant added several logs to
the fire. Mr. B. produced a pipe, in which he
sometimes indulged, and having filled it with
tobacco, presented it to the stranger, who, being a
contemner of the poisonous weed, declined
smoking
;
and the host, for want of something to say,
12*
lighted it for himself. A negro girl now entered
with a basket of apples, fresh from the orchard,
for it was October, and this fine fruit was in its
perfection; and presently the lady of the mansion
made her appearance, followed by a servant
bearing
upon a waiter a curiously ornamented silver
bowl, filled with toddy, made by her own fair
handsfor no other less dignified personage than
herself was ever permitted to discharge this most
sacred of all the functions of hospitality. Squire
B., as was the invariable custom, approached the
bowl, and having stirred the delicious beverage
with a spoon, tasted it, in order that he might
have an opportunity of complimenting his good
dame, as he called her, and of remarking, with a
wink, that it was made strong to suit the ladies.
Then taking the bowl in both hands, he presented
it first, with a formal bow, to his lady-wife, who
touched her fair lips to the brim, then to each of
his daughters, beginning with the oldest, who
successively kissed the bowl, as Goldsmith
hath it, and lastly to the guest, who did ample
honour to its refreshing contents. Such was the
ceremony invariably observed by this worthy
couple, towards their most cherished friends, and
as invariably extended to the stranger who sought
a shelter at their fireside. Such were the
primitive
and courteous habits of our venerable
forefathers
and
foremothers
, in those days when there
were no temperance societies, and when a cordial
reception always included a social cup. They had
no newspapers, nor periodicals, neither albums, nor
scrap-books, nor any of the modern devices for
destroying
the monotony of an idle hour; and the
bowl must have been found an able auxiliary in
dispelling the dullness of a country fireside.
In the meanwhile, the female part of the
company
were endeavouring to read something of the
stranger's character in his countenance; and as
they were too well-bred to stare him in the face,
adopted the feminine expedient of stealing a
glance occasionally, when his attention was turned
another way. In this hasty perusal they found
more to excite, than to satisfy, their curiosity; for
the person before them possessed a set of features,
in which different emotions were so strangely
blended, as to baffle the penetration of such
inexperienced
observers. He was so young as to
render it doubtful whether he had more than
merely reached the years of manhood. He was
tall and raw-boned; his large ill-shaped limbs
were loosely hung together, and his manners were
awkward. His face was singularly ugly, being a
collection of angular prominences, in which the
chin, nose, cheek-bones, and forehead, seemed
each to be ambitious of obtruding beyond the
other. But it was an intelligent face, with lines
of thought and observation too strongly drawn
upon it to be mistaken. There was, however,
about the muscles of the mouth, and the corners of
the eye, a lurking expression of humour, which
showed itself, particularly when a local phrase, or
a word susceptible of a different meaning from
that in which it was intended to be used, dropped
in his hearing. Under an assumed gravity, and
an affected air of unconcern, there was a
watchfulness
which could not be wholly concealed, though
it betrayed itself only in his eye, which rolled
suspiciously
about, like that of a cur, who, having,
contrary to a standing rule of the house, intruded
into the parlour, gazes in every face to learn if he
is welcome, and watches every movement as if
under a sense of danger. Every attempt to draw
him into conversation upon subjects connected
with the politics or news of the day, was fruitless;
he seemed to be entirely ignorant, or stupidly
careless, in relation to the principles and the
events of the great controversy which agitated the
colonies. On other subjects, of less dangerous
import, he spoke well and freely, uttering his
opinions in brief, pointed, and sententious remarks,
sometimes dropping a sly joke, but always
relapsing
immediately into his gravity; and shortly after
a plentiful supper, he begged permission to retire,
which was cheerfully accorded by those who began
to be weary of vain efforts to entertain one, who
seemed determined to commune only with himself.
The next morning the stranger's stiff and jaded
horse was pronounced to be unfit to travel, and he
cheerfully accepted an invitation to spend the
remainder
of the day with his kind entertainers;
and when, on the following day, his host again
pressed him to remain, he again acquiesced.
During
all this time he had but little intercourse with
the family. Mrs. B. was provoked at his
taciturnity
,
the young ladies were out of patience with
his want of gallantry, and the worthy squire was
puzzled what to make of him. The man was
quiet and inoffensive, but had not disclosed either
his name, his business, or his destination. He
sallied forth on each morning, and spent the whole
day in roaming about the woods, or along the
picturesque
borders of the Susquehanna; and when
the negroes happened to encounter him, he was
usually perched on a log, or lying at his length on
the brow of a hill, with a pencil and paper in his
hand. These employments, so different from those
of their young masters, struck the honest blacks
with astonishment; and they failed not to report
what they had seen in the kitchen, from which,
the tale, with suitable exaggerations, soon found
its way to the hall, where the whole family agreed
in opinion that their guest was a most
incomprehensible
and mysterious person.
When, therefore, on the third morning, he
announced
his intention to depart, no polite obstacle
was thrown in his way; the worthy squire
contenting
himself with thanking his guest for the
honour of his visit, and urging him to call again
whenever he should revisit the country. He took
leave with his characteristic awkwardness, and
was no sooner out of hearing than the whole
family united in pronouncing him a disagreeable,
unsocial, ill-dressed, incomprehensible, ugly,
ill-mannered
person, who had no pretensions to the
character of a gentleman. An hour was spent in
this discussion, when a servant girl came grinning
into the hall with a pair of shabby, black-looking
saddlebags in her hand, which the stranger had
left in his chamber. Mrs. B. took them in her
hands, wiped her spectacles, and examined them
carefully, while her husband proposed to send a
boy on horseback to restore the property to its
owner. But Mrs. B. continued to gaze uneasily
at the saddlebags, turning them over, and pressing
them, to ascertain the character of the contents.
Mr. B., said she, at length, as sure as you
live, there are papers in these saddlebags.
Well, what then? said the squire composedly.
You are a magistrate, and this man is a
suspicious
character.
What have I to do with his character, my
dear?
You are a justice of the peace, a whig, and a
friend to your countrythis man is perhaps a spy,
or a bearer of despatches, and it is your duty to
open these saddlebags.
The squire seemed startled, but shook his head.
Well, my dear, pursued the lady, you
always think you know bestbut how can you
tell that there is not another Arnold plot among
these papers? You know, Mr. B., that you hold
a responsible office.
I know, too, that I am a gentleman.
We all know that, my dear.
And did you ever know a gentleman to rob
the baggage of his guest?
The lady looked disconcerted, for the last was a
home argument; her pride was even greater than
that of her husband, and her regard for the rites
of hospitality equal to his.
But what could a man be doing with papers in
his saddlebags, unless he was a spy, or some
incendiary
agent of the royal cause? The fellow
had a hang-dog look, the saddlebags were
suspicious
in their appearance, and the papers had a
dishonest rustle. There was treason in all his
actions, and tyranny in every tone of his voice.
Even the negroes had noticed that he was a bad
horseman, which was a sure sign of an
English-man
,and
that he was mounted on a wretched
nag, which was evidence enough that the animal
was not his own, or else that he was not a
gentleman
.
The lady turned these matters in her mind, as
she tossed the saddlebags about in her hands.
You may depend upon it, my dear, said she,
that this is a more serious matter than you have
any idea of.
Very likely, replied the worthy man.
What
shall
we do? she exclaimed.
Let one of the boys gallop after the gentleman
with his saddlebags, replied the husband,
composedly
.
I am surprised at you, Mr. B. You know
not what treason may be in them.
If the devil was in them, or Arnold himself,
replied the squire, with more than usual
vehemence
,
he might stay there for me. The
gentleman
asked the hospitality of my roof, he came
as a friend, and it shall not be said that I treated
him as an enemy.
Then, Mr. B., if you have no objection, I will
open them myself.
None in the world, my dear, if you will take
the shame upon yourself.
The worthy lady dropped the penknife with
which she was preparing to rip open the seams of
the unlucky saddlebags, and asked, Do you
really think it would be wrong?
Decidedly so, replied the husband.
At this juncture, the negro girl, who had been
prying about the leathern receptacle, discovered
that the padlock was unfastened, and pointed out
the fact to her mistress, who exclaimed,
Nay, then, I will see the inside! And as no
lock is to be broken, nor any breach committed,
we may serve our country, and, at the same time,
save the honour of our house.
In a moment, the contents of the travelling
convenience
were spread on the floor. From one end
was produced a scanty wardrobe, consisting of but
few articles; from the other, several handfuls of
manuscript. The eyes of the worthy lady
glistened
as the suspicious papers came to light, and
her handsome cheek, on which the pencil of time
had not yet drawn a wrinkle, was flushed with
patriotism and curiosity.
Now you see, Mr. B., she exclaimed, with a
kind of
wife-ish
exultation, you see it is well to
listen to advice sometimes. Here's a pretty
discovery
,
truly!
She now proceeded to open one of the
manuscripts
,
which was folded and stitched into the
form of a small book, and read aloud,
one
hundred and nineteenth psalm
,dear me,
what's all this?
The beautiful and pathetic
passage which I have selected, my Christian
friends, for your edification
Why it's a
sermon
!
The devil can quote scripture, you know, my
dear, said the squire, sarcastically,perhaps,
13
as your hand is in, you had better examine a little
further.
The remainder of the papers seemed to be of a
similar character; and the worthy couple were
fully satisfied of the clerical vocation of their late
visiter, when the lady inquisitor picked up a loose
sheet containing a copy of verses.
A hymn, no doubt, quoth the lady, which
the worthy man has composed in his solitary
rambles
.
Read it for our edification, returned the
squire.
Do, mamma! cried all the girls at once.
So the old lady began:
Hail, beauteous shade! secure from eye profane,
Where chaste Diana, with her vestal train
Here the door opened, and, to the utter
confusion
of the whole company, the stranger stood
before them. It was a scene for a painter. There
sat the lady of the mansion, on a low chair, with
the unlucky saddlebags at her feet, and the
contents
thereof piled up in her lap. Three beautiful
girls leaned on the back of her chair, looking
eagerly over her shoulder. The head of the
family, who sat on the opposite side of the fire,
had taken the pipe from his mouth, dropped his
elbows upon his knees, and was gazing and
listening
with as much interest as any of the circle;
while a half dozen young blacks, with eyes and
mouth open, surveyed the scene with surprise. In
the open door stood the stranger, quite as much
embarrassed as any of the party, who, on
discovering
him, gazed at each other in mute dismay.
The dismal looks of the host and hostess, when
thus caught in the fact, were really pitiable.
They were a virtuous, honourable couple; above
fear, but keenly sensitive of shame. The lady
was of gentle blood and nurture, and was proud of
herself, her husband, and her family. The
gentleman
,
though he despised, and never practised
the little affectations and stratagems of pride,
valued himself on his gentility, and on never
doing any act beneath the dignity of a gentleman.
This truly respectable pair had travelled through
life together, and neither of them had ever before
had cause to blush for the act of the other; and
now, when they stood detected in the disgraceful
fact of opening the private papers of a guest, they
were covered with confusion. Squire B. was the
first to recover his composure; nor did he, like
our great progenitor, attempt to excuse his own
fault by saying it was the woman. On the
contrary, being a plain spoken man, and a lover of
truth, he at once disclosed the whole of the reasons
which led to this ludicrous procedure, only
placing
himself in the position which had, in fact, been
occupied by his wife. He alluded to the perilous
state of the country, to the fact that treason had
more than once threatened its liberties, to his own
duty as a magistrate, and to the suspicious conduct
of the strangerConsidering all these things,
continued he, our guest will not think it strange,
that we have pryed a little more curiously into his
private concerns, than would, under other
circumstances
,
have become our wonted respect for the
rites of hospitality.
And yet, resumed the old man, I am grieved
particularly that a clergyman should have been
treated uncivilly in my housefor the squire
and his dame were pillars of the church, and
revered the clergy.
The stranger, happy in recovering his property,
most cheerfully admitted that his kind entertainers
had acted for the best.
And now, said the squire, to complete our
reconciliation, I insist on your spending a week or
two with us. On Sunday next you shall preach
in our church, and in the meanwhile there are
several couples to be married, who have been
waiting until they could procure the services of a
minister.
This invitation the stranger civilly but
peremptorily
declined, and taking a hasty leave, retreated
to his horse.
Mr. B. accompanied him across the little lawn
in front of the house, and the stranger, before he
mounted, addressed him thus:We are now
alone, sir, and some explanation is due to you. I
am not, as you at first supposed, a spy, but a
native
born American, as true to my country as any
patriot who fights her battles. Neither am I a
clergyman, though I confess, to my shame, that I
have assumed that character. I am a student,
preparing for the profession of law, but the
country
wants men in her armies; and although I have
removed from town to town, and from one
neighbourhood
to another, I cannot escape the
importunity
of recruiting officers, or the ridicule of my
friends, for not devoting these sturdy limbs of mine
to the common cause.
Really, young man, I cannot see why you wish
to evade military duty in such times as these.
The gifts of Providence are various, said the
young man; Washington was born a soldier,
and I was borna coward!
The elder gentleman drew back as if he had
seen a rattlesnake in his path.
It is a melancholy truth, resumed the young
man; I have had a liberal education, my talents
are thought to be respectable, and I am gifted
with a fund of humour which enables me to mimic
whatever I see, and to convulse the gravest
company
with laughter. Yet I am not happy; for
the fear of bodily harm is continually before my
eyes. I have an instinctive dread of death; the
13*
report of a cannon causes me to shudder; war is
my abhorrence; I covet fame; but the idea of
having a knife drawn across my throat, or a rusty
bayonet thrust through my body, curdles every
drop of blood in my veins.
This is an uncommon case.
It is uncommon, and therefore I bear it with
composure; courage is so ordinary a quality, that
it is no disgrace to want it. Cowardice is an
extraordinary gift, bestowed on susceptible minds,
courage is a quality which man shares with the
bull-dog and the tiger. I was born a timid
creature
,
and no reasoning can cure my sensibility of
danger, and my abhorrence of death. I shrink at
the idea of pain, and suffer anguish in the
contemplation
of personal exposure.
But why assume the character of a preacher?
Partly because I am willing to serve my
country
,
according to the nature of my gifts; but
chiefly, to be exempt from military duty, and safe
from danger. My garb protects me from my
enemies, as well as from my friendsfrom that
side which would make me a hero, as well as from
the others who would hang me up like a dog. To
avoid being a soldier, I have become a saint. I
go from camp to camp, and preach up rebellion to
our troops. I can declaim with fervour about
liberty, for I love it; and I can exhort others to
fight bravely, for none can talk so big as a coward.
But what if you fall in with the enemy?
To them I preach peace and good will towards
all menwith a secret prayer that they will
practise
it especially towards myself. I carry a few
orthodox sermons with me, such as you have seen,
that suit any emergency. Those I make use of
when my auditors belong to the royal party; and,
if I do them no good, I am sure that I am doing
my country no evil. My patriotic efforts are all
extemporaneous. My ambition does not point to
martyrdom, any more than to military glory, and
I carry no seditious manuscripts. The recent
course of liberal studies, through which I have
passed, has imbued my mind with arguments in
favour of patriotism and military glory. I take
my text from the scripture, my sermon from the
classics. He who would disseminate the gospel of
peace, or promote the happiness of man, must
imbibe
wisdom from the oracles of God; but for him
whose purpose is to promote bloodshed and
perpetuate
war, the elegant productions of enlightened
Greece, and cultivated Rome, afford a copious
stream of reasoning and illustration.
The young man extended his hand to his host,
thanked him heartily for his hospitable treatment,
mounted his horse, and rode slowly awayleaving
the whole family amused and puzzled with the
events of this singular visit.
THE CAPUCHIN.
[There is a tradition preserved among the French of a
celebrated missionary of their nation, who was one of the
earliest of the explorers of the Mississippi and its
tributaries
,
and who died at some spot which is now unknown.
We have endeavoured to preserve some of the
circumstances
,
which are related as having attended his death, in
the following lines.]
There is a wild and lonely dell,
Far in the wooded west,
Where never summer's sunbeam fell
To break its long lone rest;
Where never blast of winter swept,
To ruffle, or to chill,
The calm pellucid lake, that slept
O'erhung with rock an hill.
A woodland scene by hills enclosed,
By rocky barriers curbed,
Where shade and silence have reposed
For ages undisturbed,
Unless when some dark Indian maid,
Or prophet old and grey,
Have hied them to the solemn shade
To weep alone, or pray.
For holy rite and gentle love
Are still so near akin,
They ever choose the sweetest grove
To pay their homage in.
One morn the boatman's bugle note
Was heard within the dell,
And o'er the blue wave seemed to float
Like some unearthly swell.
The boatman's song, the plash of oar,
The gush of parting wave,
Are faintly heard along the shore,
And echoed from each cave.
A skiff appears, by rowers stout
Urged swiftly o'er the tide;
An aged man sat wrapt in thought,
Who seemed the helm to guide.
He was a holy capuchin,
Thin locks were on his brow;
His eye, that bright and bold had been,
With age was darkened now.
From distant lands, beyond the sea,
The hoary pilgrim came
To combat base idolatry,
And spread the Holy Name.
From tribe to tribe the good man went,
The sacred cross he bore;
And savage men, on slaughter bent,
Would listen and adore.
But worn with age, his mission done,
Earth had for him no tie,
He had no further wish, save one
To hie him home and die.
Good father, let us not delay
Within this gloomy dell;
'Tis here that savage legends say
Their sinless spirits dwell.
In every cool sequestered cave
Of this romantic shore,
The spirits of the fair and brave
Unite, to part no more.
Invisible, the light canoe
They paddle o'er the lake,
Or track the deer in the morning dew,
Among the tangled brake.
'Tis said their forms, by moonlight seen,
Float gently on the air;
But mortal eye has seldom been
The fearful sight could bear.
Then, holy father, venture not
To linger in the dell;
It is a pure and blessed spot,
Where only spirits dwell.
The hallowed foot of prophet seer,
Or pure and spotless maid,
May only dare to wander here
When night has spread her shade!
Dispel, my son, thy groundless fear,
And let thy heart be bold;
For see, upon my breast I bear
The consecrated gold.
The blessed cross! that long hath been
Companion of my path
Preserved me in the tempest's din,
Or stayed the heathen's wrath
Shall guard us still from threatened harm,
What form soe'er it take:
The hurricane, the savage arm,
Or spirit of the lake.
But, father, shall we never cease
Through savage wilds to roam?
My heart is yearning for the peace
That smiles for us at home.
We've traced the river of the west,
From sea to fountain head,
And sailed o'er broad Superior's breast,
By wild adventure led.
We've slept beneath the cypress' shade,
Where noisome reptiles lay;
We've chased the panther to his bed,
And heard the grim wolf bay.
And now for sunny France we sigh,
For quiet, and for home;
Then bid us pass the valley by
Where only spirits roam.
Repine not, son! old age is slow,
And feeble feet are mine;
This moment to my home I go,
And thou shalt go to thine.
But ere I quit this vale of death,
For realms more bright and fair,
On yon green shore my feeble breath
Shall rise to Heaven in prayer.
Then high on yonder headland's brow
The holy altar raise;
Uprear the cross and let us bow,
With humble heart, in praise.
Thus said, the cross was soon uprear'd
On that lone heathen shore,
Where never Christian voice was heard
In prayer to God before.
The old man knelthis head was bare,
His arms crossed on his breast;
He prayed, but none could hear the prayer
His withered lips expressed.
He ceasedthey raised the holy man,
Then gazed in silent dread;
Chill through each vein the life-blood ran
The pilgrim's soul was fled!
In silence prayed each voyager,
Their beads they counted o'er,
Then made a hasty sepulchre
Upon that fatal shore.
Beside the altar where he knelt,
And where the Lord released
His spirit from its pilgrimage,
They laid the holy priest.
In fear, in haste, a brief adieu
The wondering boatmen take,
Then rapidly their course pursue
Across the haunted lake.
In after years, when bolder men
The vale of spirits sought,
O'er many a wild and wooded glen
They roamed, but found it not.
We only know that such a priest
There was, and thus he fell;
But where his saintly relics rest,
No living man can tell.
The red man, when he tells the tale,
Speaks of the wrath that fell
On him that dared an altar raise,
In the Indian's spirit-dell.
14
THE SILVER MINE.
A TALE OF MISSOURI.
[For the facts detailed in this story, the author is
indebted
to a very ingenious friend, now deceased. He has
done little else to it than to correct the phraseology so as
to render it suitable for publication.]
Some twelve or thirteen years ago, when the
good land on the northern frontier of Missouri
was beginning to be found out, and the village of
Palmyra had been recently
located
on the extreme
verge of the settlements of the white men, uncle
Moses, who had built his cabin hard by, went into
that promising village one day, in hopes of finding
a letter from his cousin David, then at Louisville,
and to whom he had written to come to Missouri.
Three hours' pleasant ride brought him
to town
.
He soon found Major Obadiah , who had
been lately appointed postmaster, and who had
such an aversion to confinement, that he
appropriated
his hat to all the purposes of a post-office
an arrangement by which he complied with the
law, requiring him to take special care of all
letters and papers committed to his keeping, and
the instructions directing him to be always found
in
his office, and, at the same time, enjoyed such
locomotive freedom, as permitted him to go
hunting
or fishing, at his pleasure. He was thus
ready at all times, wherever he might be, to
answer
any call on his department, promptly.
The major, seating himself on the grass,
emptied
his hat of its contents, and requested uncle
Moses to assist him in hunting for his letter:
whenever you come to any that looks dirty and
greasy, like these, said he, just throw them in
that pile; they are all
dead
letters, and I intend
to send them off to head quarters, the very next
time the post rider comes, for I can't afford to
tote
them any longer, encumbering up
the office
for
nothing. Uncle Moses thought that they were at
head
quarters already, but made no remark, and
quietly putting on his spectacles, gave his
assistance
as required.
After a quarter of an hour's careful
examination
,
it was agreed by both, that there was no
letter
in the office
for uncle Moses.
But stop, said the postmaster, as uncle Moses
was preparing to mount his horse, you are a
trading character, come let me sell you a lot of
goods at wholesale. Willy Wan, the owner, has
gone to St. Louis to lay in a fresh supply, and has
left me to keep store for him 'til he returns. He
had almost sold out, and I hate to be cramped up
in a house all day, so I have packed up the whole
stock in these two bundleshauling them out of
his coat pockets.
Uncle Moses looked over them without ever
cracking a smile, for it was a grave business. He
wiped his spectacles, to examine the whole
assortment
.
Here, examine themcalicoes, ribbons, laces,
&c. all as good as newno mistakeI'll take ten
dollars in
coon skins
for the whole invoice, which
is less than cost, rather than
tote
them any longer.
Uncle Moses was, in truth, a trading character.
He belonged to a numerous and respectable class
in our country, who are, by courtesy, called
farmers
;
but who, in fact, spend their whole lives in
buying and selling. He was
raised
in North
Carolina, and had regularly emigrated westwardly,
once in every three or four years, until he had
passed through Tennessee, Kentucky, and Illinois,
to the frontier of Missouri. Nothing ever made
him so happy as an offer to buy his farm. The
worthy man would snap his fingers, ask a little
more than was offered, and at last take what he
could get, pack up his moveables at an hour's
notice, and push out further back. He was a
famous hand at finding good land; and was sure
to get a mill-seat, a stone quarry, or a fine spring,
which made his tract the best in the country, and
himself the happiest man in the world. He
worked hard and made good improvements; but
no sooner was his cabin built, his fences made,
and his family comfortably settled, than he was
sure to find that the neighbours were getting too
thick around him, the
outlet
for his cattle was
circumscribed
,
and there was a better country
somewhere
else. He was not a discontented manfar
from it. There never was a better tempered old
soul than uncle Moses. But he liked money,
loved to be moving, and, above all things, gloried
in a good trade. He would buy any thing that
was offered
cheap
, and sell any thing for which he
could get the value. He never travelled without
exchanging his horse, nor visited a neighbour
without
proposing a speculation.
Of course, the Major's offer of a lot of
store
goods
, for less than cost, struck him favourably,
and he offered three dozen racoon skins for the
whole. Take them, said the Majorit is
too littlebut if Wan does'nt like the trade, I'll
pay the balance myself.
Now, said the postmaster, let us go down
to the river, where Hunt, and
the balance of the
boys
, are fishing. We have been holding an
election here for the last two days, and as nobody
came in to vote to-day, we all concluded to go
fishing.
14*
But what election is it?
Why, to elect delegates to form our state
constitution.
I have heard of it, but had forgot it. I am
entitled to a vote.
Certainly you are. Hunt and I are two of
the judges. He has taken the poll-books along
with himcome along, we will take your vote at
the riverjust as good as if it was done in town
I hate formalities, and this three days' election
every body could as well do all their voting in
one.
Down they went to the river; the judges and
clerks were called together, and recorded the first
vote that ever uncle Moses gave in Missouri, on
the bank of
North river
, a little below where
Massie's mill now stands. I like to be particular
about matters of importance.
The parties were soon distributed in quietness
along the shore, angling for the finny tribe, which
sported, unconscious of danger, in the limpid
element
.
Every tongue was silent, and all eyes
resting on the lines, when Sam Smoke made his
appearance, cracking his way through the bushes.
Mose! come this way, said he. Uncle Moses,
discovering something momentous in his air, met
him at a respectful distance. Now, Moses,
said the odd old genius, I know, very well, you
have some notion of
entering
*
*
Buying from the government.
Wolf Harbour. I
have
located
that place myself long ago; but I
don't believe you know it. I will now let you into
a secret that you have been some time hunting for,
if you will not enter the land about Wolf Harbour
before I get my money from Kentucky. The
quarter section, including the big spring, is all I
wantthe balance is not worth enteringand if I
can get that, I shall have all the elbow room I
want.
But what is the secret? said uncle Moses,
anxiously.
You have been hunting for a silver mine
hav'n't you?
I have; do you know where it is?
No, I do not; but I have left an Indian in a
swing
that I have just completed for the major's
amusement. He will swing himself until my
return
.
He has a piece of the ore, and will show
us the place where he found it, for a gallon of
whiskey. Now, say I shall have Wolf Harbour,
and you may have the silver mine.
Agreed, said uncle Moses, and for fear
somebody else should take a fancy to it, if you
will go home with me, I will loan you the money
to pay for it.
No, I am much obliged to you, said Sam,
all I want, is the
chance
, after my money
comes.
Uncle Moses found the Indian, as was expected,
and took him home with him, where he found his
cousin David, just arrived from Kentucky. Ah!
Davy, my boy, I am glad to see you. I have
found, or rather I am about to find, the silver
mine that I wrote to you about. See here! this
is as pure silver ore as ever was seen. This
yellow fellow knows where it is, and is to show it
to me in the morning.
That's very well, said David, but do you
know you will find this fellow here in the
morning
?
No doubt of it. I know too much of the
Indian not to know how to manage him. I will
give him a taste out of that keg, and let him
understand
that there is more, and you could not
whip him away.
Early the next morning, our miners had every
thing ready for the expedition. The best horse
was packed with the tools, and provisions enough
for several days. The Indian guide was directed
to lead the way. He hesitated for a moment, as if
deliberating upon the course, and then, having
fixed it in his mind, set off on a
bee line
towards
the hidden treasure. Uncle Moses and David led
the pack-horse, and plodded on foot at a half trot;
for that is the gait of an Indian, when he has a
journey before him. After about two hours' rough
travelling through the woods and thickets, the
miners were saluted with an Ah! ho! ah! from
the Indian, who had stopped on the side of a hill a
little in advance. Plentee bel-le good chomac,
said he, holding up a piece of the precious ore,
glistening in his hand. By the wars, Davy,
exclaimed uncle Moses, as he walked up and
surveyed
the spot, this is a pretty good prospect
this looks well, to be surea right smart chance
of metal, I declare!
The horse was soon unpacked, coats off, and
every thing ready for deeper research. Davy
took the pick and shovel, and commenced
removing
the ground which seemed to cover the vein.
Uncle Moses sauntered about to examine the line
trees, and discover the number of the section;
and the guide, having fulfilled his part of the
bargain
,
was left in full possession of the jug, and in
a few minutes, was as happy as if he had millions
in store.
Uncle Moses returned in a short time, having
traced the lines of the tract, and found David as
wet with sweat, as if he had been in the river.
Stop, David, said uncle Moses, you will kill
yourself if you go on at this rategive me the
shovel, and rest awhileyou have blistered your
hands already. This was literally true, and is
usually the case with the first essay in mining;
the fascination is so great, that the young miner,
continually imagining himself almost in sight of
boundless wealth, delves on harder and harder,
and exhausts his strength, while his hopes yet
remain
fresh. Uncle Moses proceeded more
systematically
,
and, in about two hours, uncovered
the bright vein. What a glorious sight met their
eyes! How were their hearts gladdened by the
brilliant success of their enterprise! They paused,
and silently contemplated the shining mass, which
lay in a perpendicular stratum, several inches in
thickness, and extended along the whole length of
the opening. Again they resumed their labours,
traced the vein into the side of the hill, and
satisfied themselves, that, according to uncle
Moses'
estimateand he was not slow at a
calculation
there
was, at least, fifty thousand dollars'
worth of pure silver then within their grasp.
That is enough to make us both rich, said
David.
Why, it is better than nothing, replied the
old speculator, gravely, and with all the
importance
of one who felt the inward dignity of a nabob;
yes, it is better than making corn, or trading in
store goodsfifty thousand dollars is a clever little
sum. But it is nothing to what is coming
nothing
to the balance that lies in the bowels of the
earth.
Having rested a little from their labour, the
dinner-bag was produced, and they sat down to a
cold luncheon, which Davy pronounced to be the
sweetest morsel he ever ate in his life. I don't
doubt it, replied uncle Moses; this is one of
the real enjoyments of this world. And now,
David, since I have made your fortune, I hope
you may so manage it as never to lose your relish
for the substantials, by indulging too much in the
luxuries of life.
Never fear that, said David; I have been
raised to industryI intend to go to the
legislature
.
It takes less head than any thing else that
I know of, and I never heard of a member losing
his appetite for meat or liquor. But who have we
here?
If it aint that old Hibbard and his hungry
gang of tall boys, exclaimed uncle Moses; he
has been hunting for this very mine for several
months. They have been watching usthey have
a canoe at the river, and will try to be at St. Louis
first to
enter
the land. You are a light rider,
Davy, and there is my horseI gave a hundred
and fifty dollars for himbetter stuff was never
wrapped in a surcinglefix the saddle, mount him,
and put off.
Davy was soon ready. Uncle Moses slipped a
roll of bank notes in his hand, and the junior
partner
in the silver mine wrapped them carefully in
a handkerchief, which he bound round his body
conducting the whole operation with an apparent
carelessness, to deceive those who were looking on.
There is the money, whispered uncle Moses,
and two hundred dollars over, to buy horses if
needful. Ride slowly off, as if you were going
home, and when out of sight take a
dead aim
for
St. Louis. Don't lose any time looking for roads
a road is of no account, no how, when a man is
in a hurry. Don't spare horse flesh. We can
afford to use up a few nags in securing a silver
mine. If any body asks your business, you know
what to sayit's nothing to nobody. Buy the
land before you sleep. I'll camp here till you
return, and keep these wolves off.
David obeyed orders, and was soon on a high
prairie of parallel ridges extending southward.
He involuntarily stopped and gazed with wonder
and delight on the first specimen which his optics
had ever beheld, on so large a scale, of Nature's
meadows. He was naturally of a sanguine
temperament
and lively imagination, and enjoyed the
scene with a higher relish, from its sudden and
unexpected appearance. It beats all, thought
he; I'd give a thousand dollars, (an hour before
he would have said
a dollar
,) to know who cleared
up all this land. The day has been, when
thousands
of acres of tobacco have been raised on these
old fields
but who raised it? When I get the
silver mine I'll find it out. Yes, I'll hire a half a
dozen Yankee schoolmasters by the job, and pay
them in
pigs
of cast silver. The importance of
his journey, however, soon compelled him to
collect
his scattered wits, and exert them in
determining
his course. His geographical knowledge
of this country was very limited, as he had passed
up the Mississippi in a keel boat, and knew nothing
of the interior. But he was aware that his course
ought to be nearly south, and that, as the country
was thinly settled, he would in all probability have
to pass most of the distance without a road or trace
of any kind.
He followed the direction of one of the ridges
of the prairie, and travelled rapidly, until his
progress
was suddenly arrested by a deep stream,
about a hundred yards in width, margined on each
side with a heavy growth of tall timber. This
must be Salt River, said he. It was too deep to
ford, and the only alternative was to swima feat
he would sooner have attempted at some place
where assistance might be had in case of accident.
But knowing that the defeat of his enterprise, and
certain loss of his expected wealth, awaited him if
he did not cross, he screwed up his resolution, and
determined to pass or drown in the attempt. His
money was placed in his hat, and he plunged in;
his horse was of powerful muscle, and bore him
safely to the opposite shore.
The sun was gilding the west as he emerged
15
into another beautiful prairie, carpeted with the
matchless verdure of the season, which extended
further than his vision could reach. The evening
was calm and pleasant; a soft breeze only moving
to fan the sweet perfume of the various flowers
which spotted the plain. Not a cloud was to be
seen. The lark, whistling on the rosin-weed, or
a solitary hawk, circling through the air, now
poised aloft, and now darting, with the swiftness of
an arrow, on the half concealed sparrow below,
were the only moving objects on which to rest the
eye of the traveller. The scene was solitary as
it was grand, and naturally led our weary
adventurer
into a contemplative mood. He thought of
the many instances he had known of the
misapplication
of the gifts of fortune, and determined, in
his own mind, as he was now heir, apparently, to
a princely estate, that he would use it in such
a manner as to afford the most solid advantages to
himself and his country. He resolved to found
schools for the education of all classes, to make
roads, and to build bridgesespecially one over
Salt River. He had a mortal antipathy to the
aristocracy of wealth, and vowed that he would
level the rich down to an equality with the poor;
or, if that should be impracticable, he would level
the poor
up
to the standing of the rich. His
fondness
for the fair sex induced him to wish to confer
happiness on as many of them as possible; but as
it was impracticable, under the present
organization
of society, to confer supreme bliss on more
than
one
, he determined to make one happy
woman, at least, without delay.
At length, night began to drop her curtain
around him, and to stud the skies with her
twinkling
lamps. The dew rested on the tall grass,
and, as the tops of the latter were sometimes
higher than his horse's back, his own clothes soon
dripped large drops of water. Still he pushed on,
until the weary animal, by often stopping to nip
the green herbage, admonished him that food and
rest are necessary to brute creatures, however
non-essential they may be to the proprietors of
silver mines. But it was not until drowsiness
had so overpowered him that he was several
times on the point of losing his balance, that he
determined to rest for the night. He then
dismounted
,
tied his horse's feet together with the
reins of the bridle, supped on some cold venison
and corn bread, that uncle Moses had put into his
saddlebags, and crawling into a matted hazel
thicket, nestled among the leaves, and slept soundly
until morning.
With the first blush of the dawn, David was
again on his way, somewhat refreshed. But the
wolves having robbed his saddlebags of the
remaining
provisions, he had nothing wherewith
to break his fast. He jogged on at a pretty rapid
gait, however, fully determined to compensate his
appetite hereafter, in the most ample manner, for
the privation it was now suffering. Poor devils,
that have neither house nor land, said he, may
travel upon empty stomachs, and
camp out
in the
bushes at night, but that will not be my case. I
intend to have old bacon all the year round; and
let them eat venison who can get nothing
better
.
About the middle of the afternoon, he stopped
at the first cabin he had seen, and enquired of a
homespun lady, who appeared at the door, if he
could get something for himself and horse to eat.
After asking him a dozen questions about where
he was fromwhere he was goinghow the
election had gonewhether he thought the
convention
would make this a free or slave state
where he staid last nightand if he
war'nt mighty
tired?she at last told him to light. She
soon had every thing ready, and invited him to
set up and help himself, remarking that it
was not very good fare, no how, but if she had
known of his coming, she would have had
something
better.
From this place, he found a road leading to St.
Charles, where he expected to cross the Missouri.
Sleepy and weary, every rod seemed now a mile,
and he had not gone far from the cabin, when he
stopped a traveller, that he met, to enquire the
distance to St. Charles; thirty miles, was the
reply.
After proceeding half a mile further, he fell
in with another, who told him it was fifteen
milesa boy, to whom he put the same question,
replied that it was a
good little bit
and a
farmer, a little further on, informed him that the
exact distance was twenty-one miles from the
big oak at the foot of his lane.
It was dark, when he concluded, for the last
time, that he must certainly be within a short
distance of the river; and, at length, meeting a
negro on the brink of a hill, was assured that it
was not no distance at all. He was soon in the
village of St. Charles, and had no difficulty in
finding
the ferryman, who refused, positively, to carry
him across the river that night. David had too
much at stake to be thus delayed. He stormed
threatened to cut off the ears of the boatman
swore he would kick the mud-walled house from
over the head of the unaccommodating
Frenchman
and,
finally, talked about regulating the
whole town.
Monsieur Kentuck, said the ferryman, vat
make you so dem hangry? are you in von great
big horry?
I am on business of importancemore depends
on it than your paltry gumbo town is worthso,
15*
stir yourself, or I'll be shot if I don't make a
fuss.
Very much horry, eh? replied the
Frenchman
a
dark, swarthy fellow, with straight, black
hair, and an eye which began to flash with an
amiable
expression, resembling that of an enraged
wild-cat. 'Spose den you vait for your horry
overmean time, you cut off
ma hear
for keep
yoursef warm!
Davy, finding he was on the wrong scent, changed
his tone, said he had no wish to affront
any
gentleman
,
and enquired, in a soothing tone,
if money
could procure him a passage.
Ah, Monsieur, now you talk like von
gentiman
'spose
you pay me five dollar, may be you
cross de Missouri'spose you no pay me dat, you
may go sleep on dis side, sacre!
Davy accepted the terms: the
ferry boat
,
consisting
of two canoes covered with a platform, was
hauled up, the horse carefully placed in the middle,
and the
savage river
, which roared and bubbled
around them, was soon passed. The ferryman
pointed out the road, and in a few hours our
impatient
Kentuckian was at the door of the receiver
of public monies in St. Louis, shouting manfully,
Who keeps house? Colonel S., the receiver,
from an upper window, told him that he could not
enter
the land, nor the land office, that night; it
was positively contrary to all ruleand Davy,
much chagrined, was obliged to sneak off to a
hotel. In the morning he hied by times to the
land office, and found, to his mortification, that
the whole section was covered by a New Madrid
claim! Excited now to desperation, he declared
that he would work the silver mine,
any how
, in
spite of big guns and little menhe did'nt
vally
the government a centnot heit was
no account,
no how
then he jumped up, struck his heels
together
,
and said he was a horse, a steam-boat, an
earthquakeand that he and uncle Mose, with a
hundred Kentuckians, could take Gibraltar!
Hanging his hat on one side of his head, he
strutted out of the office, endeavouring to control
his rage, and half inclined to gratify it, by
whipping
the first man he should meet. Finally,
however
,
he concluded to send an express to uncle
Moses, and set out for Kentucky himself, to raise
volunteers enough to set the land officers at
defiance
,
nullify the government, and work the silver
mine,
vi et armis
. Meeting with Mons. Donja, an
old acquaintance who was a silversmith, he
exultingly
produced a specimen of the precious ore, and
asked his opinion of it.
Vat you call dis? said the dealer in bright
metals.
Pure silver orethe real stuff.
You mistake, sair; dat is no silvare, but be
ver good brimstone!
Brimstone, the devil! shouted the enraged
adventurer.
Ah, oui, replied the mechanic, with a shrug,
very good brimstone for diable; suppose you go
in my shop, you shall be satisfy.
Davy went, and was soon convinced, by being
almost suffocated with the fumes of sulphur.
This was the climax of disappointment; but
David was blessed with a sanguine temperament,
and, although easily irritated, had the faculty of
as easily abandoning a favourite scheme, in favour
of some new project; and, after giving a long
whistle, he strolled back to the hotel with an air
of so much unconcern, that no one would have
dreamed that any sinister event had befallen him.
It all comes of trusting too much to uncle Mose,
thought he; the old man used to be as true on
the scent of money as an old 'coon dog on a pest
trailbut he is barking up the wrong tree this
time.
He now ordered his horse. Sorry to inform
you, replied the landlord, very sorry, sirbut,
your horse is dead.
Dead!
Dead as a house log.
Misfortunes never come single, said David;
and quietly throwing his saddle over his shoulder,
he walked off, singing, from Hudibras or some
other celebrated poet,
He that's rich may ride astraddle,
But he that's poor must tote his saddle.
THE DARK MAID OF ILLINOIS.
The French, who first explored the wild shores
and prolific plains that margin the Mississippi
river, and extend along its tributary streams,
believed
that they had found a terrestrial paradise.
Never before was such a desert of flowers
presented
to the astonished eye of mannever before
was there exhibited an expanse so wide, so fertile,
so splendidly adorned. If the beauty of this region
delighted them, its immensity filled them with
astonishment, and awakened the most extravagant
expectations. Their warm and sprightly
imaginations
were easily excited to lively admiration,
by scenes so grand, so lovely, and so wild, as those
presented in this boundless wilderness of woods
and flowers. The great length of the magnificent
rivers filled them with amazement; while the
reputed wealth, and fancied productions of the
country, awakened both avarice and curiosity.
We can scarcely realise the sensations with
which they must have wandered over a country
so different from any they had ever seen, and have
contemplated a landscape so unexpectedly majestic
and attractive. The freshness and verdure of new
lands, unspoiled and unimpoverished by the hand
of cultivation, is in itself delightful. It is pleasing
to see the works of nature in their original
character
,
as they came from the creative hand; and
that pleasure was here greatly enhanced by the
infinite variety, and magnificent extent, of the
romantic scenery. The plains seemed as
boundless
as they were beautiful, and the splendid groves,
which diversified the surface of these exquisitely
graceful lawns, invested them with a peculiar air
of rural elegance.
Delighted with this extensive and fertile region,
they roamed far and wide over its boundless
prairies
,
and pushed their little barks into every
navigable
stream. Their inoffensive manners procured
them a favourable reception; their cheerfulness
and suavity conciliated even the savage warrior,
whose suspicious nature discovered no cause of
alarm in the visits of these gay strangers. Divided
into small parties, having different objects in view,
they pursued their several designs without
collision
and with little concert. One sought fame,
another searched for mines of gold as opulent as
those which had enriched the Spaniards in a more
southern part of the same continent. One aspired
simply to the honour of discovering new lands,
another came to collect rare and nondescript
specimens
of natural curiosities; one travelled to see
man in a state of nature, another brought the
gospel to the heathen; while, perhaps, a great
number roved carelessly among these interesting
scenes, indulging an idle curiosity or a mere love
of adventure, and seeking no higher gratification
than that which the novelty and excitement of the
present moment afforded.
Whatever might be their respective views, they
were certainly, in one respect, the most successful
of adventurers. They traversed these wide plains
with impunity. They penetrated far into the
interior
of the trackless wilderness. Their canoes
were seen tracing the meanders of the longest
rivers; and these fearless explorers had already
found their way into the heart of this immense
continent, while other Europeans obtained, with
difficulty, a footing upon the sea coast.
Among the earliest who thus came was Pierre
Blondo, who, having served a regular
apprenticeship
to an eminent barber at Paris, had recently
commenced the world on his own account, in the
character of valet to an excellent Dominican priest,
who was about to visit America. The proverb,
like master like man, had little application to
this pairfor never were two human beings more
unlike than they. The worthy Dominican was a
gentlemanly and priest-like personage, and Pierre
a very unassuming plebeian. The master was
learned and benevolent,grave, austere, and
self-denying
;
the valet was a jolly, rattling madcap,
who, as he never hesitated to grant a favour or a
civility to any human being who asked or needed
it, thought it right to be equally obliging to
himself
;
and neither mortified his own flesh nor his
neighbour's feelings. The priest mourned over
the depravity of the human race, and especially
deprecated the frivolous habits of his countrymen;
the valet not only believed this to be the best of
all possible worlds, but prided himself particularly
in being a native of a country which produces the
best fiddlers, cooks, and barbers, on the habitable
globe. In short, the master was a priest and the
man a hair-dresser; they both loved and
endeavoured
to improve their species; but the one dealt
with the inner, the other with the outer man;
one sought to enlighten the dark abyss of the
ignorant heart, while the other sedulously scraped
the superfluities of the visage. Father Francis
was a mysterious, silent, ascetic man; Pierre was
as mercurial and as merry a lad as ever flourished
a pair of scissors.
However they might differ in other respects,
there was one particular in which Father Francis
and his man, Pierre, exactly agreed; namely, in
16
an ardent desire to explore the streams, the forests,
and the prairies of Louisiana. They were allured,
it is true, by very different motives. The priest
came to spread the gospel among the heathen, to
arrest their vices, and to explode their human
sacrifices; the valet travelled to see the lion with
one horn, the fountain of rejuvenescence, the
white-breasted
swans, and the dark-skinned girls of
Illinois
.
Pierre's researches into American history
had been considerable, and his opportunities for
acquiring a knowledge of the new world singularly
felicitous. He had shaved gentlemen who had been
therehad scraped the very cheeks which were
embrowned by the sun of the western Indies, and
had held, with secret delight, betwixt his thumb
and finger, the identical nostrils that had inhaled
the delicious odours of Florida, the land of flowers.
He had listened with admiration to their
wonderful
stories, some of which almost staggered his
credulity. He did not doubt the existence of gold
mines, in which the pure metal was found in solid
massesthe only objection to which was, that
they were too large for transportation,nor of
that wonderful pool, in which, if an old man bathed,
he lost the decrepitude of age, and regained the
bloom of childhood. These things seemed proper
enough, and were vouched for by gentlemen who
could not be mistaken; yet it seemed to him
marvellous
,
that the birds should be snowy white, and
the ladies black; that the men should be beardless,
and the lions have horns; and that gold-dust,
grapes, and oranges, should grow and glitter in
a wilderness, where there were none but wolves
and wild men to gather them.
It is proper to state here, in order to prevent
any misunderstanding in a matter of so much
importance
,
that, although Pierre was a barber, he
was by no means an insignificant person. He was
of honest parentagethe son of a very reputable
peasant, who lived decently, and brought up his
offspring in habits of industry. He had a fine
figure and a very prepossessing countenance.
His eye was good, his teeth white, and his smile
agreeable. He was, in short, a gentlemanon a
small scale, and a most excellent personin his
way.
During the passage, Pierre became a favourite
with his fellow voyagers. He played the flute,
sang merry songs, shaved the sailors gratis, and
on Sundays brushed up the captain as fine as a
grenadier. He felt so happy himself, that he
could not be easy without trying to make every
body happy around him. At odd times, when he
was unemployed, he amused himself in fancying
the adventures that awaited him, the fine sights he
should see, and the heaps upon heaps of gold and
jewels that he should pick up in the new world.
He thought himself a second Columbus, and had
no doubt that high honours would be conferred
upon him on his returnthe king would make
him a count or a marquis; and M. Corneille, who
was then in the meridian of his fame, would write
a play, and tell his exploits in poetry. The prime
minister would probably offer him his daughter in
marriageand a cloud passed over the brow of
the merry Frenchman as he reflected that it would
be proper to make the lady miserable, by refusing
the honour of the alliance. I shall certainly be
very much obliged to him, said Pierre, as he sat
musing on the forecastle, gazing at a long stream
of moonlight that sparkled on the undulating waves;
very much obliged: and I shall never be wanting
in gratitude to a nobleman who shall do me so
much honour,but I must decline it; for there is
pretty little Annette, that I have promised to marry,
and who shall never have reason to weep for my
inconstancy. Annette is a very pretty girl, and
she loves me dearly. I really think she would
break her heart if I should not marry her. Poor
girl! she thinks there is no body in the world
equal to Pierreand I have no reason to dispute
her judgment. She is neither rich nor noble, but
what of that? When I am master of a gold mine,
and a marquis of France, I can elevate her to my
own rank; and I will hang strings of pearl, and
ornaments of solid gold, about her pretty neck,
and her slender waist, in such profusion, that the
meanness of her birth will be forgotten in the
glitter
of her attire. Thus did Pierre enjoy the
luxury of hope, and revel in anticipation upon the
bright prospects that beamed upon his delighted
fancy. The vessel flew rapidly over the waves;
and, after a prosperous voyage, the new world
spread its illimitable shores, its gigantic
mountains
,
and its wooded vales, before the enraptured
eyes of the weary voyagers.
Pierre was in the new world. It was very
much unlike the old one. Yet its great superiority
did not strike him so forcibly as he had expected.
The St. Lawrence was a noble river; its shores
were green, and the trees were larger than any
he had seen in France; but the sunny clime, and
the rich vineyards of his native land were not
there, nor was there the least sign of a gold mine,
or a pearl fishery. Our adventurer, however, was
of a sanguine temperament, and determined to
suspend his judgment, and hope on for a season.
Shortly after their arrival at Montreal, an
expedition
was concerted to the newly discovered
region
of the Upper Mississippi, and Father Francis
made his arrangements to accompany the party.
Pierre, who, in the long voyage across the
Atlantic
,
comparatively agreeable as it was, had become
wearied of the confinement and privations incident
to this mode of travelling, looked at the little boats
launched on the St. Lawrence, for the
transportation
16*
of the party, with some distrust, and evinced
a considerable deal of reluctance against
embarking
in a new adventure. In Montreal he had
found some of the luxuries which he enjoyed at
home, and had been deprived of on shipboard.
There were barbers and cooks, to shave and feed
people; and, new as the city was, there was a
monastery and a ball room, in the first of which,
he could be seated in a snug confessional, when
he went to confess his sins to the priest, and in
the other he could dance without knocking his
head against a spar, or running the risk of
jumping
overboard. Other considerations, however,
weighed against his indolence and love of pleasure.
He longed to discover the fountain of
rejuvenescence
,
to bathe in its renovating waters, and
secure the miraculous gift of perpetual youth.
He panted for the dignity and advantage of being
sole proprietor of a gold mine, and returning to
merry France with a ship load of treasure,for
the honour of nobility, the pleasure of refusing the
prime minister's daughter, and the pride of
making
Annette a peeress. Incited by hopes so
brilliant
,
and so remarkably reasonable, the spirit of
adventure was re-animated in his bosom, and he
embarked with newly invigorated alacrity.
They ascended, with much toil, the rapid
current
of the noble Lawrence, meandering among its
thousand isles, and gazing with delight on its
rocky and luxuriant shores. They coasted the
grand and beautiful lakes of the north, enraptured
with the freshness and variety of the scenery; and
surveyed with amazement, the great cataract,
which has been the wonder of succeeding
generations
.
Every night they encamped upon the
banks, and the forest rang with the cheerful
sounds of merriment. Sometimes they met the
Indians, who gazed upon them as superior beings,
and either fled in terror, or endeavoured to
conciliate
them by kindness and hospitality. It was
thus that the Europeans were usually received by
the natives of this continent, before little jealousies,
and occasional aggressions, were fomented, by
hasty retaliation, into lasting hatred. Happy
would it have been for our country, and for human
nature, had the civilised adventurers to the new
world conducted themselves in such a manner as
to have deepened, and indelibly engraved upon the
savage mind, the feelings of profound respect
which their first appearance excited.
When they reached the southern end of Lake
Michigan, the waters were high, and they floated
over the inundated lands, pushing their boats
among the trees of the forest, and over the rank
herbage of the low prairies of that region, until
they found the current, which had set towards the
north, began to flow off in the opposite direction,
and floated them into a small stream, running
towards the south. Here they halted for some
days to hunt, and repair their boats; and when
they reached the Illinois, a large, but placid river,
one of the noblest tributaries of the Mississippi,
the flood had subsided, and the waters were
flowing
quietly within their natural channel, through
the silent forest.
With what emotions of wonder must those
adventurous
travellers have gazed upon these wild
scenes! How singular must have been their
sensations
,
when they reflected on their distance
from the civilised world, and thought of the
immensity
of that immeasurable waste that was
spread around them. They had never imagined,
far less witnessed, a desert so blooming or so
extensive. There was a magnificence of beauty
in its prolific vegetation and gorgeous verdure,
and a grandeur in the idea of the boundless extent
of this splendid wilderness, that must have excited
the imagination to speculations of intense interest.
Pierre seemed to awaken to a new existence
when the boats entered upon this beautiful river;
and he felt a thrill of pleasure as he surveyed the
placid stream and its lovely shores. The river,
deep, unobstructed, and clear as crystal, flows
with a current so gentle as to be almost
imperceptible
,
while the overhanging trees protect it from
the winds, keeping it as still and inviolate as the
fountain that sleeps in its native cave. The
stately swan sailed upon the mirror that reflected
her downy plumage, and the gaudy paroquet, rich
in green and golden hues, sported among the tall
trees. The tangled grape vines hung in heavy
masses from the boughs, and the wild fruit trees
dipped their limbs in the water. Here and there
the tall bluffs jutted in upon the river, impressing
their gracefully curved outlines upon the clear
blue ground of the sky, and throwing their long
dark shadows upon the water; but most usually, a
rich border of noble forest trees, springing from a
low shore, hung in graceful beauty over the
stream. Sometimes they saw herds of buffalo,
wading in the tide, sometimes the lazy bear,
wallowing
in the mire, and, occasionally, the slender
deer, standing in the timid attitude of attention;
while every secluded inlet, or shaded cove, was
filled with screaming wild fowl, of an infinite
variety of plumage.
The travellers arrived, at length, at an Indian
village, where they were entertained with great
hospitality. The chief, surrounded by his wise
men, and his warriors, painted in gay colours, and
decked with feathers, symbolical of peace, received
them with public demonstrations of respect; and a
great company, of different ages, and both sexes,
was assembled to gaze at them, and to do them
honour. The hump of the buffalo, the head of
the elk, and the marrowy tail of the beaver, were
dressed for them, with all the skill of aboriginal
gourmandism; they were feasted, besides, upon
bear's oil, jerked venison, hominy, and delicately
roasted puppies; and the juicy steams of these
delicious viands, unvitiated by the villanous
artificial
mixtures of European cookery, were
pleasantly
blended with the balmy odours of the
forest. Father Francis, among other monastic
attainments, had acquired a very competent
knowledge of the art of good eating, and did
ample justice to the generous fare which spread
the board of his savage entertainers; but being a
reformer of morals, he determined to show his
gratitude by delivering before his new friends a
homily against intemperance; resolving, at the
same time, to improve so favourable an
opportunity
of suggesting the propriety of seasoning such
gross meats with a few wholesome condiments;
for, to his taste, the devouring of flesh without
salt, pepper, or sauce, was mere cannibalism.
Pierre was a reformer, too, and he made up his
mind to improve the gastronomic science of his
country, whenever he should become a marquis,
by adding the buffalo's tongue and hump, and the
elk's head, to the luxuries of a Parisian bill of fare.
The cooking of puppies he thought an unchristian
and dangerous innovation, which might lead to the
destruction of some of the most harmless animals
in creation, while the addition which it brought to
the list of solid edibles, was not worthy of much
commendation.
Having feasted the adventurers, the Indians
presented them with feathers, belts, moccasins,
and dressed skins; and the chief, in the profusion
of his generosity, offered to Father Francis fifteen
beautiful young girls, but the good man, as any
prudent man would have done, wisely declined the
acceptance of a present that might prove so
troublesome
.
Pierre thought he would have ordered
things differently: he winked, shrugged, hinted,
and at last ventured to beg that he might take one
of them, at least, to Paris with him, as a curiosity;
but the inexorable priest advised him to carry a
swan, a paroquet, a pet buffalo, or a rattlesnake,
in preference. Finally, when that worthy and
highly honoured ecclesiastic had been feasted
to repletion, and loaded to weariness with
deferential
civilities, a soft couch of buffalo robes
was spread for him, and a number of young girls
stood round him, as he reposed, fanning him with
the snowy wings of the swan, and driving away
the musquitoes with bunches of gaudy feathers.
Pierre thought this a very grand ceremony, and
quite comfortable withal; and determined, that,
whenever he should become proprietor of a gold
mine, he would enjoy the luxury of slumber with
similar attendance.
It would be a question worthy the attention of
the curious in matters relating to the philosophy
of the human mind, whether that love of foreigners
which has ever distinguished the American people,
and made them the sport of every idle traveller
who has chanced to linger on our shores, was not
derived from the aborigines. The vanity of
showing
off a travelled lion at our parties is
certainly
not original. If it be not an inherent
passion
in the human breast, it has, at least, prevailed
throughout many ages. The desire to behold the
exotic production of a distant climeto entertain
one who has roamed through latitudes different
from our own, and had hair breadth `scapes, has
long been a distinguishing trait in the domestic
manners of our countrymen; and we are happy
to be able to trace the propensity back to a period
anterior to our existence as a nation. For we do
not set it down among our virtues. Hospitality
may have much to do with keeping it alive, and a
generous love of knowledge may afford it some
nourishment. But we fear that, after all, it rests
upon a solid substratum of vanity, and is cherished
by the oozings of an inquisitive curiosity. The
Illini, however, fared much better in the result of
their attentions to distinguished strangers, than we
who have succeeded and imitated them. They
received the French, with confiding kindness, into
the bosom of their society, and fed them upon the
fat of their land; and the worthy visiters of that
primitive people recorded their hospitality in terms
of grateful acknowledgment. We have pursued
a similar course of conduct towards other
Europeans
,
and have been sadly traduced and ridiculed
for our pains.
Father Francis took an early occasion to say a
word in season to the savages on the great business
of his mission. They heard him with grave
respect
,
and promised to take the matter into
consideration
;
but, as their intercourse was conducted
entirely by signs, it is not likely that they were
greatly edified. He showed them a telescope, a
mariner's compass, and a watch, and endeavoured
to explain their several properties; they listened
with attention, offered food to the watch, which
they supposed to be a living animal, looked with
fear at the telescope, and picked the old man's
pocket, while he was lecturing upon natural
philosophy
.
Upon the whole, the savages showed
great capabilities for the pursuits of civilised life.
Pierre, in the meanwhile, remained an inactive
spectator of these proceedings. The Indians,
with their usual tact, discovered that he occupied
a subordinate place in the mission, which released
them from the necessity of paying public honours.
But his fine figure, his elastic step, and his open
countenance, won their regard, and obtained for
him the most cordial attention. Though he was
not, as they supposed, a chief, or a prophet, they
17
imagined that he was a young brave of promise,
and perhaps of distinction, in his tribe.
The next morning, the young warriors dispersed
themselves in the neighbouring groves, to paint
their bodies and decorate their heads. This is
one of the most important employments of an
Indian's life. No beau, nor dandy, nor exquisite,
in any part of the world, expends more time in the
laborious duties of the toilet, than is consumed by
the savage in decorating his person. Pierre went
among them, bowing and smiling, in his usual
obliging manner, with his razors, combs, scissors,
and pomatums; and, after exhibiting specimens of
his skill upon himself, prevailed upon some of his
new acquaintances to place themselves under his
hands. He was not only a complete adept in his
own art, but a man of genius, who could adapt its
principles to the circumstances of a new case;
and, directed by the slight observations he had
been enabled to make, painted up some of the
savages, after their own fashion, with peculiar
elegance, and to their entire satisfaction. They
were delighted with his clever and obliging talents.
He exhibited his lancet and tooth-drawers, and
explained their use by significant gestures; and
the Indians, supposing them to be delicate
instruments
for torturing prisoners of war, patted him
on the head as a valuable auxiliary. He produced
a pair of foils, and, while he convinced them that
he was a great warrior, caused an infinite deal of
merriment by the contrast of his own dexterity
with the awkwardness of those who were
prevailed
upon to oppose him. A pocket mirror, and
some trinkets, which he displayed, won their
admiration
,
and they soon determined, that, although
Father Francis might be highest in rank, Pierre
was by far the greatest man, and most valuable
acquaintance. Such are the triumphs of genius!
Pierre had ventured upon a delicate experiment,
in which ninety-nine of the most consummately
skilled artists might have failed, where one would
have been successful.
There is a tide in the affairs of men,
Which, taken at the flood, leads on to fortune;
he had touched a fortunate spring, and found the
talisman which commanded a brilliant destiny.
In the fulness of his heart he opened a small
package of looking-glasses, which he had brought
for traffic, and distributed them gratuitously
among the warriors, presenting the largest and
most elegant to the chief, who was so much
delighted
,
that he instantly, with princely liberality,
offered him his daughter in marriage. Happy
Pierre! he was that day the proudest of men, and
the most blissful of barbers.
Pierre had serious scruples whether he should
accept this generous offer; not that he considered
it above his meritson the contrary, he gave the
chief great credit for having had the acuteness to
discover his genius, and the magnanimity to know
how to appreciate it. It was a proposal worthy
of both the parties concerned. But it touched his
honour, while it flattered his pride. He had not
forgotten his obligations to Annettethe merry
dark-eyed girl who had given him the first
offering
of her young affections. Poor little Annette,
what would she think of it, if he should marry
another lady. He was sure she would never
stand it. The blight of disappointment would
fall upon the warm heart that throbbed so
sincerely
for him. No, said he to himself, I
will be true to Annette, be the consequences what
they may; I have promised her my hand, and a
share in my gold mine; and nothing shall ever
induce me to act in a manner unbecoming a
French gentleman. Having formed this heroic
resolution, he put his hat on one side of his head,
and strutted through the village, with the
independent
air of a man who chooses to do as he
pleases, and the self-satisfied countenance of one
who has adopted a virtuous determination.
But Pierre knew little of the frailty of his own
heart. Few of us are aware of the backslidings
of which we may be guilty when there is a lady
in the case. He began to reflect, that the partner
so liberally tendered to his acceptance, was the
daughter of a king, and that such an alliance was
not to be picked up every day in the woods of the
new world. He might grow gray before another
sovereign would condescend to invite him into his
family; and, reasoning in his own mind, that the
proposed marriage would make him a prince, and
heir apparent, he began to entertain strong doubts
whether patriotism, and the honour of the French
nation, did not require him to sacrifice his
affections
to the glory and advantage of giving a king
to the Illini. Napoleon has since been called
upon to decide a similar question; and Pierre,
though not a great warrior, loved his country and
himself as well as Napoleon. He reflected
further
,
that the possession of the sovereign power
would be the readiest way to the discovery of the
fountain of rejuvenescence; the gold mines would
all be his own, and he could send Annette a
shipload
of the precious metal. Moreover, he had
already discovered, that in the new world it was
the custom for great men to have a plurality of
wivesa custom that seemed to him to be founded
in good senseand he saw no reason why he
should not comply with it, and, with the first
cargo of gold he should send to France, despatch
an invitation to Annette to share his prosperity
and the happiness of his tawny bride.
When our inclinations prompt us strongly to a
particular line of conduct, it is easy to find reasons
17*
enough to turn the scale. Indeed, it is most usual
to adopt a theory first, and then to seek out
arguments
to support it. Pierre could now find a host
of reasons urging him to instant wedlock with the
Illinois maiden. And not the least were the
advantages
which would accrue to Father Francis,
to the church, and to the cause of civilisation.
When he should become a prince, he could take
the venerable priest under his patronage,
encourage
the spread of the true faith, cause his subjects
to be civilised, and induce them to dress like
Christians
and feed like rational beings. He longed,
with all the zeal of a reformer, to see them powder
their hair, and abstain from the savage practice of
eating roasted puppies.
So he determined to marry the lady; and,
having
thus definitely settled the question, thought it
would be proper to take the advice of his spiritual
guide. Father Francis was shocked at the bare
mention of the affair. He admonished Pierre of
the sin of marrying a heathen, and of the
wickedness
of breaking his plighted faith; and assured
him, in advance, that such misconduct would bring
down upon him the severe displeasure of the
church. Pierre thanked him with the most
humble
appearance of conviction, and forthwith
proceeded
to gratify his own inclinationbelieving
that, in the affair of wedlock, he knew what was
for his own good quite as well as a holy monk,
who, to the best of his judgment, could know very
little about the matter.
On the following morning the marriage took
place, with no other ceremony than the delivery
of the bride into the hands of her future husband.
Pierre was as happy as bridegrooms usually are
for his companion was a slender, pretty girl, with
a mild black eye and an agreeable countenance.
They were conducted to a wigwam, and installed
at once into the offices of husband and wife, and
into the possession of their future mansion. The
females of the village assembled, and practised a
good many jokes at the expense of the young
couple; and Pierre, as well to get rid of these as
to improve the earliest opportunity of examining
into the mineral treasures of the country,
endeavoured
,
by signs, to invite his partner to a stroll
intimating, at the same time, that he would be
infinitely obliged to her if she would have the
politeness to show him a gold mine or two. The
girl signified her acquiescence, and presently stole
away through the forest, followed by the
enamoured
hair-dresser.
As soon as they were out of sight of the village,
Pierre offered her his arm, but the arch girl darted
away, laughing, and shaking her black tresses,
which streamed in the air behind her, as she
leaped over the logs and glided through the
thickets
.
Pierre liked her none the less for this
evidence
of coquetry, but gaily pursued his beautiful
bride, for whom he began to feel the highest
admiration. Her figure was exquisitely moulded,
and the exercise in which she was now engaged
displayed its gracefulness to the greatest
advantage
.
There was a novelty, too, in the adventure,
which pleased the gay-hearted Frenchman; and
away they ran, mutually amused and mutually
satisfied with each other.
Pierre was an active young fellow, and, for a
while, followed the beautiful savage with a
creditable
degree of speed; but, unaccustomed to the
obstacles which impeded the way, he soon became
fatigued. His companion slackened her pace when
she found him lingering behind; and, when the
thicket was more than usually intricate, kindly
guided him through the most practicable places,
always, however, keeping out of his reach; and
whenever he mended his pace, or showed an
inclination
to overtake her, she would dart away,
looking back over her shoulder, laughing, and
coquetting, and inviting him to follow. For a
time this was amusing enough, and quite to the
taste of the merry barber; but the afternoon was
hot, the perspiration flowed copiously, and he
began to doubt the expediency of having to catch
a wife, or win even a gold mine, by the sweat of
his browespecially in a new country.
Adventurers
to newly discovered regions expect to get
things easily; the fruits of labour may be found at
home.
On they went in this manner, until Pierre,
wearied
out, was about to give up the pursuit of his
light-heeled bride, when they reached a spot where
the ground gradually ascended, until, all at once,
they stood upon the edge of an elevated and
extensive
plain. Our traveller had heretofore obtained
partial glimpses of the prairies, but now saw one
of these vast plains, for the first time, in its breadth
and grandeur. Its surface was gently uneven;
and, as he happened to be placed on one of the
highest swells, he looked over a boundless expanse,
where not a single tree intercepted the prospect
or relieved the monotony. He strained his vision
forward, but the plain was boundlessmarking
the curved line of its profile on the far distant
horizon. The effect was rendered more striking
by the appearance of the setting sun, which had
sunk to the level of the farthest edge of the prairie,
and seemed like a globe of fire resting upon the
ground. Pierre looked around him with
admiration
.
The vast expansedestitute of trees,
covered with tall grass, now dried by the
summer's
heat, and extending, as it seemed to him,
to the western verge of the continentexcited his
special wonder. Little versed in geography, he
persuaded himself that he had reached the western
boundary of the world, and beheld the very spot
where the sun passed over the edge of the great
terrestrial plane. There was no mistake. He
had achieved an adventure worthy the greatest
captain of the age. His form dilated, and his eye
kindled, with a consciousness of his own
importance
.
Columbus had discovered a continent, but
he
had travelled to the extreme verge of the
earth's surface, beyond which nothing remained
to be discovered. Yes, he solemnly exclaimed,
there is the end of the world! How fortunate
am I to have approached it by daylight, and with
a guide; otherwise, I might have stepped over in
the dark, and have fallenI know not where!
The Indian girl had seated herself on the grass,
and was composedly waiting his pleasure, when he
discovered large masses of smoke rolling upward
in the west. He pointed towards this new
phenomenon
,
and endeavoured to obtain some
explanation
of its meaning; but the bride, if she understood
his enquiry, had no means of reply. There is a
language of looks which is sufficient for the
purposes
of love. The glance of approving affection
beams expressively from the eye, and finds its way
in silent eloquence to the heart. No doubt that
the pair, whose bridal day we have described, had
already learned, from each other's looks, the
confession
which they had no other common language
to convey; but the intercourse of signs can go no
further. It is perfectly inadequate to the
interpretation
of natural phenomena; and the Indian maid
was unable to explain that singular appearance
which so puzzled her lover. But discovering,
from the direction to which he pointed, that his
curiosity was strongly excited, the obliging girl
rose, and led the way towards the west. They
walked for more than an hour. Pierre insensibly
became grave and silent, and his sympathising
companion unconsciously fell into the same mood.
He had taken her hand, which she now yielded
without reluctance, and they moved slowly, side
by side, over the plainshe with a submissive
and demure air, and he alternately admiring his
beautiful bride, and throwing suspicious glances at
the novel scene around him. The sun had gone
down, the breeze had subsided, and the stillness of
death was hanging over the prairie. Pierre began
to have awful sensations. Though bold and
volatile
,
a something like fear crept over him, and he
would have turned back; but the pride of a French
gentleman, and a marquis in anticipation, prevented
him. He felt meanfor no man of spirit ever
becomes
seriously alarmed without feeling a sense
of degradation. There is something so unmanly
in fear, that, although no bosom is entirely proof
against it, we feel ashamed to acknowledge its
influence even to ourselves. Our hero looked
forward
in terror, yet was too proud to turn back.
Superstition was beginning to throw its misty
visions about his fancy. He had taken a step
contrary to the advice of his father confessor, and
was in open rebellion against the church; and he
began to fear that some evil spirit, under the guise
of an Indian maid, was seducing him away to
destruction. At all events, he determined not to
go much further.
The shades of night had begun to close, when
they again ascended one of those elevations which
swells so gradually that the traveller scarcely
remarks them until he reaches the summit, and
beholds, from a commanding eminence, a
boundless
landscape spread before him. The veil of
night, without concealing the scene, rendered it
indistinct; the undulations of the surface were no
longer perceptible; and the prairie seemed a
perfect
plain. One phenomenon astonished and
perplexed
him: before him the prairie was lighted up
with a dim but supernatural brilliancy, like that of
a distant fire, while behind was the blackness of
darkness. An air of solitude reigned over that
wild plain, and not a sound relieved the desolation
of the scene. A chill crept over him as he gazed
around, and not an object met his eye but that
dark maid, who stood in mute patience by his
side, as waiting his pleasure; but on whose
features
,
as displayed by the uncertain light that
glimmered on them, a smile of triumph seemed to
play. He looked again, and the horizon gleamed
brighter and brighter, until a fiery redness rose
above its dark outline, while heavy, slow moving,
masses of cloud curled upward above it. It was
evidently the intense reflection, and the
voluminous
smoke, of a vast fire. In another moment
the blaze itself appeared, first shooting up at one
spot, and then at another, and advancing, until
the whole line of horizon was clothed with flames,
that rolled around, and curled, and dashed upward,
like the angry waves of a burning ocean. The
simple Frenchman had never heard of the fires
that sweep over our wide prairies in the autumn,
nor did it enter into his head that a natural cause
could produce an effect so terrific. The whole
western horizon was clad in fire, and, as far as the
eye could see, to the right and left, was one vast
conflagration, having the appearance of angry
billows of a fiery liquid, dashing against each
other, and foaming, and throwing flakes of burning
spray into the air. There was a roaring sound
like that caused by the conflict of waves. A more
terrific sight could scarcely be conceived; nor
was it singular that an unpractised eye should
behold
in that scene a wide sea of flame, lashed into
fury by some internal commotion.
Pierre could gaze no longer. A sudden horror
thrilled his soul. His worse fears were realised
in the tremendous landscape. He saw before him
the lake of fire prepared for the devil and his
18
angels. The existence of such a place of
punishment
he had never doubted; but, heretofore, it
had been a mere dogma of faith, while now it
appeared
before him in its terrible reality. He
thought he could plainly distinguish gigantic black
forms dancing in the flames, throwing up their
long misshapen arms, and writhing their bodies
into fantastic shapes. Uttering a piercing shriek,
he turned and fled with the swiftness of an arrow.
Fear gave new vigour to the muscles which had
before been relaxed with fatigue, and his feet, so
lately heavy, now touched the ground with the light
and springy tread of the antelope. Yet, to
himself
,
his steps seemed to linger, as if his heels
were lead.
The Indian girl clapped her hands and laughed
aloud as she pursued him. That laugh, which, at
an earlier hour of this eventful day, had enlivened
his heart by its joyous tones, now filled him with
terror. It seemed the yell of a demonthe
triumphant
scream of hellish delight over the
down-fall
of his soul. The dark maid of Illinois, so
lately an object of love, became, to his
distempered
fancy, a minister of vengeancea fallen
angel sent to tempt him to destruction. A
supernatural
strength and swiftness gave wings to his
flight, as he bounded away with the speed of the
ostrich of the desert; but he seemed, to himself,
to crawl sluggishly, and, whenever he cast a
glance behind, that mysterious girl of the prairie
was laughing at his heels. He tried to invoke
the saints, but, alas! in the confusion of his mind,
he could not recollect the names of more than
half a dozen, nor determine which was the most
suitable one to be called upon in such an
anomalous
case. Arrived at the forest, he dashed
headlong
through its tangled thickets. Neither the
darkness, or any obstacle, checked his career; but
scrambling over fallen timber, tearing through
copse and briar, he held his way, bruised and
bleeding, through the forest. At last he reached
the village, staggered into a lodge which
happened
to be unoccupied, and sunk down insensible.
The sun was just rising above the eastern
horizon
when Pierre awoke. The Indian maid was
bending over him with looks of tender solicitude.
She had nursed him through the silent watches of
the night, had pillowed his head upon the soft
plumage
of the swan, and covered him with robes of
the finest fur. She had watched his dreamy sleep
through the long hours, when all others were
sleeping, and no eye witnessed her assiduous care
had bathed his throbbing temples with water
from the spring, and passed her slender fingers
through his ringlets, with the fondness of a young
and growing affection, until she had soothed the
unconscious object of her tenderness into a calm
repose. It was her first love, and she had given
her heart up to its influence with all the strength,
and all the weakness, of female passion. Under
other circumstances it might long have remained
concealed in her own bosom, and have gradually
become disclosed by the attentions of her lover, as
the flower opens slowly to the sun. But she had
been suddenly called to the discharge of the duties
of a wife; and woman, when appealed to by the
charities of life, gives full play to her affections,
pouring out the treasures of her love in liberal
profusion.
But her tenderness was thrown away upon the
slumbering bridegroom, whose unusual excitement,
both of body and mind, had been succeeded by a
profound lethargy. No sooner did he open his
eyes, than the dreadful images of the night became
again pictured upon his imagination. Even that
anxious girl, who had hung over him with
sleepless
solicitude, throughout the night, and still
watched, dejected, by his side, seemed to wear a
malignant aspect, and to triumph in his anguish.
He shrunk from the glance of her eye, as if its
mild lustre would have withered him. She laid
her hand upon his brow, and he writhed as if a
serpent had crawled over his visage. The hope
of escape suddenly presented itself to his mind.
He rose, and rushed wildly to the shore. The
boats were just leaving the bank; his companions
had been grieved at his marriage, and were
alarmed when they found he had left the village;
but Father Francis, a rigid moralist, and a stern
man, determined not to wait for him a moment,
and the little barks were already shoved into the
stream, when the haggard barber appeared, and
plunged into the water. As he climbed the side
of the nearest boat, he conjured his comrades, in
tones of agony, to fly. Imagining he had
discovered
some treachery in their new allies, they
obeyed; the oars were plied with vigour, and the
vessels of the white strangers rapidly disappeared
from the eyes of the astonished Illini, who were as
much perplexed by the abrupt departure, as they
had been by the unexpected visit of their eccentric
guests.
Pierre took to his bed, and remained an invalid
during the rest of the voyage. Nor did he set
his foot on shore again in the new world. One
glance at the lake of fire was enough for him, and
he did not, like Orpheus, look back at the infernal
regions from which he had escaped. The party
descended the Mississippi to the gulf of Mexico,
where, finding a ship destined for France, he took
leave of his companions, from whom he had
carefully
concealed the true cause of his alarm.
During
the passage across the Atlantic he recovered
his health, and, in some measure, his spirits; but
he never regained his thirst for adventure, his
ambition to be a marquis, or his desire to seek for
18*
gold. The fountain of rejuvenescence itself had
no charms to allure him back to the dangerous
wildernesses of the far west. On all these subjects
he remained silent as the grave. One would have
supposed that he had escaped the dominions of
Satan under a pledge of secresy.
A new misfortune awaited him at home, where,
to his infinite mortification, he found Annette
married
to a lank, snivelling pastry cook, dispensing
smiles, and pies, and sugar plums, from behind a
counter, and enjoying as much happiness as she
could have tasted in the rank to which he had
once destined her. It was not kind in her to have
jilted Pierre for a pastry cook, when he would not
have jilted her for any thing less than a princess.
Our hero had stuck to his integrity like a
gentleman
,
until strong temptation overmastered him,
while she had listened to the sugared compliments
of the confectioner, as soon as the back of her
generous lover was turned, and became mistress
of a cake shop, while he was laying plans to make
her a peeress of France, and a princess of Illinois.
Short sighted Annette! to value so slightly the
sincere passion of so munificent a lover! Pierre
received the news of her defection with the
composure
of a philosophershrugged his shoulders,
snapped his fingers, and resumed his humble
occupation
.
He was not the man to break his heart
for a trifle; and, after bearing with fortitude the
loss of a gold mine, a throne, and lovely princess,
the infidelity of a light-hearted maiden was not a
thing to grieve over. He lived a barber, and died
a bachelor. When the bloom of youth began to
fade from his cheek, and the acuteness of his
sensibilities
became a little bluntedwhen he saw
his rival, the confectioner, prospering and growing
fat, and the prospect of Annette's becoming a
widow, more and more remote, his reserve wore
away, and he began to relate his adventures to his
customers. He became quite celebratedas all
Europeans are, who have travelled in America
many flocked to his shop to hear his interesting
recitals, and the burning lake was added, by
common
fame, to the other wonders of the new world.
The Indian maid followed the white stranger to
the shore, and saw him depart, with grief. She
gazed at the receding boats until they turned an
angle of the river, where they vanished for ever
from her view, and then she sat down, and buried
her face in her hands. Her companions, in
sympathy
for her feelings, left her alone, and when all
eyes were withdrawn, she gave vent to her feelings,
and wept bitterly over her shame. She had been
betrothed in the face of the whole tribe, and had
been publicly deserted by her lover. He had fled
from her with every appearance of terror and
loathing. She was repudiated under
circumstances
of notoriety, which deeply wounded her pride;
while a tenderness, newly awakened, and evinced
to the full extent that maiden delicacy permitted,
was cruelly repaid by insult. Nor was the
acuteness
of these feelings at all blunted by the
suspicion
that she had been herself an accessory in
producing the melancholy result. Pierre had
followed
her to the prairie, in all the joyous hilarity
of an ardent loverhe had fled from her in fear,
and, although the cause of his terror was unknown,
she imputed it to something in her own person or
deportment. There is no anguish which a woman
feels so keenly as the pang of mortified affection
the conviction that her offered love is spurned
the virgin shame of having betrayed a preference
for one who does not requite itthe mortification
of attempting and failing to kindle the flame of
love. Woman can bear, and thousands have
borne, the pain of loving without being beloved,
when the secret remains hidden in her own bosom;
but when the husband, or the accepted lover,
repels
,
or coldly estimates, the warm and frank
avowal of a virtuous passion, he inflicts a wound
which no surgery can heal, he touches one of the
master springs of the heart, with a rudeness that
reaches its vitality and withers it for ever.
Woman
can bear pain, or misfortune, with a fortitude
that man may in vain attempt to emulate; but she
has a heart whose sensibilities require a delicate
observance;she submits to power with humility,
to oppression with patience, to the ordinary
calamities
of human nature with resignation
nothing
breaks her heart but insulted love.
For whole days did the Indian maid wander
through the solitary forest, ashamed to return to
the encampment of her tribe. When led back to
her father's lodge, she avoided the society of the
maiden throng, and fled from the young warriors
who would have courted her smiles. She ceased
to be numbered among the dark-eyed beauties of
her tribe; and but a few moons had passed away
since the visit of the white strangers from the land
of the rising sun, when a little hillock, on the
summit
of a lonely mound in the prairie, covered the
remains of the beautiful and love stricken
Maid of
Illinois
.
THE NEW MOON.
A TRADITION OF THE OMAWHAWS.
Far up the Missouri river, where the shores of
that turbid stream are bounded by interminable
prairies, the traveller sees the remains of a village
of the Omawhaw Indians. The former
inhabitants
,
obeying a law of their erratic nature, have
removed to some spot still more distant from the
habitations of the white men, and better supplied
with game. Nothing remains of them but those
vestiges which man, however poor or savage,
always leaves behind him, to attest, even in his
simplest state, his superiority over the brute of
the forest.
The ruin is extensive, but of recent date. The
naked poles, that once supported the frail lodges,
are still standing scattered over the plain, and the
blackened embers lie in heaps upon the deserted
fire-places. The area, which was once trodden
hard by human feet, is now covered with a
beautiful
carpet of short, luxuriant, blue-grassa
production
which ever springs up near the habitations
of man, flourishes round his ruined mansion long
after his departure, and clothes with verdure the
grave in which his body reposes. The
council-house
,
where the warriors met to recount their
victories, or to plan their hostile excursions, is
entirely destroyed, and its remains are only
distinguished
from those of the other lodges by their
larger size and central situation. Here too is still
seen, crumbling to decay, the post around which
the warriors danced,where the war-song has
often been sungwhere the buffalo-dance has
frequently
been witnessedand where perhaps, too,
many an unhappy prisoner has endured the most
dreadful tortures that ingenious hatred could invent.
The village was bounded, on one side, by the
Missouri, whose bold current, discoloured by the
earthy substances with which it loads itself in its
violent career, swept along the foot of the bluff on
which it stood;on another, by a deep lagoon, an
expanse of clear water fed by a creek, and filled
with aquatic plants, which shot up luxuriantly
from its oozy bottom. In front a wide prairie,
covered with its verdant and flowery carpet,
presented
a long undulating line of horizon to the eye.
The whole town was surrounded by a palisade,
now entirely destroyed, beyond which were the
corn fields, where the squaws practised their rude
agriculture, and which furnished a scanty
subsistence
to this improvident people during the gloom
of winter.
The spot has been some time deserted, though
hundreds of miles still intervene between it and
the most advanced settlement of the whites. For
the blight of the white man often precedes him,
and the Indian recoils instinctively, even before he
has actually suffered by contact with the race
which has oppressed his fathers. The shadow
of the white man falls before him, and the Indian,
chilled by his approach, sorrowfully abandons the
graves of his fathers, and seeks a new home in
some wilderness less accessible to the footstep of
the stranger.
The traveller pauses here to indulge that
pensive
train of thought, which is always awakened
by the sight of the deserted habitations of man.
How sacred is the spot which a human being has
consecrated by making it his
home!
With what
awe do we tread over the deserted threshold, and
gaze upon the dilapidated wall! The feeling is
the same in kind, however it may differ in degree,
whether we survey the crumbling ruins of a castle
or the miserable relics of a hamlet. The
imagination
loves to people the deserted scene, to picture
the deeds of its former inhabitants, and to revive
the employments of those who now slumber in the
tomb. The hearth-stone, which once glowed with
warmth, is cold, and the silence of death is
brooding
over that spot which was once the seat of
festivity. Here the warrior trod, in the pride of
manhood, arrayed in martial panoply, and bent on
schemes of plunder and revenge. Here stood the
orator and the hoary seer. Here were witnessed
the sports of youth, and the gossip of old age.
The maiden was here in the modest garb of
youthful
loveliness, listening with downcast eye to the
voice of adulation, or laughing away the hours
with the careless joy of youthful hilarity; the wife
was seen surrounded by the maternal cares, and
the quiet blandishments, of domestic life; and the
child sported in boisterous mirth. Yesit is the
same feeling;the wretched wigwam of the poor
Indian was as much his home as the villa of the
Roman senator; and, though the ruins of the one,
from their superior magnificence, may excite more
curiosity than those of the other, the shadow that
rests upon the heart, as we linger among either,
is equally induced by sympathy for the fallen
fortunes
of those who once flourished and are now no
more. Men are callous to the sufferings of the
living, but few tread with indifference over the
ashes of the dead, or view with insensibility the
relics of ancient days.
All are gone. Some are banished, and others,
as the scripture beautifully expresses it,
are not:
the graves of the dead may be faintly discerned in
19
the neglected fields, but the foot-prints of those
who have fled to other lands have long vanished
from the green sward and the neglected streets.
It was thus with Nineveh and Babylon; it was
thus with the desecrated seats of the Druids, and
with the strong castles of feudal Europe. The
story of what they once were lives in song and
history; romance has gathered a few fragments,
and entwined them with the fabulous creations of
genius; but the eye of the spectator, seeking the
traces of a vanished reality, finds only the ruins of
mouldered edifices, and the ashes of the
unconscious
dead.
However unsatisfactory may be our researches
in such scenes, we linger among them with
mournful
pleasure. There is something which is
remarkably
exciting in the contrast between the present
and the past. Nothing seizes the imagination so
suddenly, or so strongly, as a vivid exhibition of
death or desolation contrasted with possession, and
life, and loveliness. All, that once was, is gone
or is changed. We repose secure, surrounded by
solitude and peace, where the warrior once stood
at bay, and where danger beat against the
ramparts
as the waves dash against the rock-bound
shore. Where there was life, we stand in the
midst of death. The abodes of those who once
lived are deserted, and an awful silence prevails.
The reptile and the wild beast have taken
possession
of the spot formerly occupied by the social
circle. The weed and the briar cover the
dilapidated
hearth-stone, and conceal the long-forgotten
grave. As we gaze at these things, a feeling of
sympathy is awakened in favour of the departed
inhabitant;however unamiable his character
however fierce or wicked he may have been, the
blast of desolation has passed over him, and the
heart spontaneously yields its forgiveness to those
sins and errors that have been punished, and the
consequences of which sleep in the tomb with the
aggressor and the victim. And we think of
ourselves
,
and of those who are dear to us. We too
shall sleepour habitations shall be given to the
stranger, or be swept away by the hand of time;
and the places that knew us once shall know us no
longer, for ever.
We are growing serious. Let us return to the
village. It was, in days past, a pleasant spot, to
those who could find pleasure in the savage state.
The Omawhaws dwelt here for five months in the
year, employed in raising beans and corn for their
subsistence in the winter, and in dressing the
buffalo
skins which had been taken in the hunt of the
preceding season. During the rest of the year
they wandered over those wide plains where the
buffalo grazes, and the deer and elk are found;
spending the whole time in hunting and feasting
when the game was abundant, and in toil and
starvation when it was not plentiful.
They were often engaged in war. The Saukies,
a warlike tribe, were their enemies, and the fierce
Sioux bands often harassed them. But they
continued
for years to elude their foes, during the
hunting season, by vigilance, by rapid marches,
and painful retreats; and to defend the village
from assault, by their watchfulness in discovering
the approach of danger, or their courage in
repelling
it, during the short interval of repose allowed
them while their corn was growing.
Many miles below the town, at a very
conspicuous
point on the shore of the Missouri, is a
small mound which covers the remains of
Washinggahsaba
,
or the Blackbird, a celebrated chief,
who died some years ago at this spot on his way
home. According to his own wish he was interred
in a sitting posture, on his favourite horse, upon
the summit of a high bluff bank of the Missouri,
that he might continue to see the pale faces
ascending the river to trade with the Omawhaws.
A hillock of earth was raised over his remains, on
which food was regularly placed for several years
afterwards. But this rite has been discontinued.
We know not how long a spirit requires to be fed;
but it seems that there is a limit, beyond which it
is not necessary for the living to furnish aliment
to the deceased. A staff supporting a white flag,
that marked to the eye of the distant traveller the
site of this solitary grave, and called for a tribute
of respect to one whom his people delighted to
honour, is no longer in existence.
The Blackbird was a person of singular
capacity
,
and the greatest man of his tribe. He had
an intellect which obtained the mastery of other
minds, and gave him absolute power over those
around him. They honoured his talents, not his
virtues. Though a great, he was a repulsive,
man. He possessed an extraordinary genius,
which enabled him to sway the multitude, and
gain them over to his purposesbut not to win
their affections. They clung to him with devoted
fidelityfollowed, served, and obeyed, with a
superstitious
attachment, which bound them to his
personbut which was not love.
He ruled his tribe with arbitrary power, and
permitted none to share, or to dispute, his authority.
He had gained the reputation of a great medicine
man, who was supposed to wield a mysterious
influence over the lives of those around him, and
the nation stood in awe of him, as the supreme
arbiter of their fate. Whenever he prophesied
the death of an individual, the event ensued with
unerring certainty; and those who counteracted his
views, who disobeyed his counsel, or in any
manner
incurred his displeasure, were removed
agreeably
to his predictions, and, apparently, by the
19*
operation of his spells. Such a mysterious,
dreadful
power quelled the wild spirit of the Omawhaw,
who stood submissive, awed into silence, in the
presence of the despotic chief, and trembled, even
in his absence, if a rebellious thought
spontaneously
swelled his bosom. He was considered as
the friend of the Great Spirit; and it was thought
that the Omawhaws were particularly honoured,
in having such a personage placed at the helm of
their affairs. Many were the victims of his
ambition
.
Whenever his keen dark eye fell in
displeasure on an individual, and the blighting
prophecy was uttered,the victim, from that
instant, bore a charmed life;he sickened,
withered
away, and sunk rapidly to the grave. But
the power of the chief continued undiminished to
the last; and the whites alone believed that they
had discovered the dreadful secret of his influence
over life and minda secret, which even they
dared scarcely whisper to each other. Such is
arbitrary power,gained by long years of toil,
and held up by painful watchfulness, its harvest is
distrust and hatred. Who would be great on
such terms?
To the American traders, who were induced,
by the enterprising spirit of traffic, to visit that
remote region, the crafty chief was probably
indebted
for his power. It is supposed that they
secretly furnished him with the most subtle drugs,
which he used so artfully, that even they who
supplied them, and who thus courted his favour,
by a sacrifice of principle most incredibly
atrocious
,
remained uncertain whether he administered
them directly as poisons, or employed them in the
horrid operations of magic. Certain it is, that
although capricious towards all others, he
protected
and countenanced the traders with
unwavering
friendship. He was true to them, and to
the white people in general, under all changes of
fortune or of temper; and there is always reason
to suspect that a mutual kindness of long
continuance
,
between parties so politic and selfish, is
produced
only by reciprocal advantage. It is said,
that while he compelled the traders to yield up to
him, gratuitously, a portion of their goods, he
obliged his people to purchase the remainder at
double prices, so that the trader lost nothing by
his rapacity.
He delighted in the display of his power, and
seemed, on some occasions, to exert his authority
for no other purpose than to show that he
possessed
it. One day, during a great national hunt,
in which all the tribe engaged, and which was
conducted
with the discipline of a warlike expedition,
they arrived, fatigued and thirsty, at the bank of a
fine flowing stream. They had been travelling
over plains exposed to the sun, and destitute of
water, and the sight of a clear rivulet filled the
party with joy. But, although all were parched
with thirst, the chief, to their surprise, permitted
none to drink, but a white man, who happened to
be in company. He gave no reason for his
conduct
;
a cold peremptory mandate announced his
will, and a sullen, though implicit, obedience,
attested
the despotic nature of his command over
his submissive followers. The painted warriors,
fierce, and wild, and untamed, as they were,
neither hesitated nor murmured at an unjust
order, which, although it seemed the result of
caprice, was probably intended to try their
discipline
,
and to accustom them to obey without
question.
There was one that loved him, and towards
whom his stern features sometimes relaxed into a
smile of kindness. One of our most popular
writersa lady, whose own affections are so pure
and refined, as to enable her to describe, with
peculiar
grace and fidelity, the gentler emotions of
the hearthas lately drawn so true a picture of
the love of
a father for his daughter
, that I shall
not venture to dwell on this development of
affection
.
Even the callous savage felt it. He, who
had no tear nor smile for any other human being,
was softened into a feeling akin to love, towards
one gentle creature. He had a daughter, called
Menae, or
The New Moon
, who was the most
beautiful female of the tribe. The Indian women
are usually short, and ungraceful; but she had a
figure of which an European lady might have
been vain. She was taller and fairer than the
rest of the Omawhaw maidens, and towered above
them as her father did above the men. Her
complexion
was so light as to be nearly pure, and the
blush mantled in her cheek when she spoke. Her
figure was beautifully rounded, and her limbs of
exquisite proportion. But her superiority was
that of stature and womanly grace; she claimed
no observance as a tribute to rank, nor made any
ostentatious display of her beauty. Her
appropriate
and euphonous name was given, not merely
on account of the mild brilliancy of her charms,
but in reference also to the sweetness of
disposition
,
which rendered her an universal favourite,
and caused her to be received, at all times, and in
every company, with a complacency similar to
that with which we welcome the first appearance
of the luminary of the night.
Beauty always exerts an influence, for good or
evil, upon the female mind. No woman grows to
maturity unconscious of a possession, which, if
rightly used, is her richest treasure. It is that
which raises her above her own sex, and gives her
a transcendent mastery over the affections of man.
A beautiful woman possesses a power, which,
combined
with an amiable deportment, and directed by
honourable principle, is more efficient than wealth
or genius. No man was ever formed with a heart
so callous as to be insensible to its magic
influence
.
It is a talisman, as potent as the lamp of
Aladdin, in the hands of one who uses it with
modesty and virtue; but a deadly curse in the
possession of a weak or vicious woman.
The destiny of a beautiful girl is most usually
coloured by the possession of this fascinating
treasure. It has a controlling influence upon the
formation of her character, which elevates her
above, or sinks her below, her companions. The
heartless beauty, who lives for conquest, becomes
the most insensible of her sex. Neglecting the
appropriate graces, and solid accomplishments,
which throw so many pure and hallowed
fascinations
around the sweet companion of man, she
soon learns to feel the want, and to supply the
absence
,
of womanly attractions, by artificial
blandishments
.
Almost unconsciously she becomes
artful, and learns to live in a corrupted atmosphere
of deception. The time soon arrives when the
beautiful flower which attracted admiration
withers
and
the stem which bore it is found to be
that of a worthless weed.
But where the mind is sound, and the heart
pure, beauty elevates the character of a young
female. The admiration which she receives,
even in childhood, softens her affections, and
stimulates
her latent ambition. The glance, and the
tone of gallantry, with which she is addressed,
awakens the responsive sentiment which gives the
proper tone to her affections. She feels her
power, and assumes the dignity of her sex. A
womanly tenderness and grace is seen in all her
actions. Accustomed to admiration, her brain is
not turned by the idle breath of unmeaning
compliment
.
Confident in her powers of pleasing, she
rises above the little stratagems, and sordid
jealousies
,
of her sex, and scorns to use any
allurement
to extort those attentions to which she feels
herself entitled. Thus it is that beauty gives
power to vice, and strength and gracefulness to
virtue.
It is also true, that the possession of beauty is
apt to improve those exterior graces, which are
so important in woman as to be almost virtues,
though, in fact, they involve little moral
responsibility
.
The knowledge that we possess an
enviable
quality stimulates to its improvement. The
woman, who discovers in herself the power of
pleasing, is apt to cultivate that which produces
an effect so gratifying to herself and so agreeable
to others. Her ingenuity is quickened by
encouragement
.
As the man who has a capital to build
upon is more apt to husband his resources, and
aim at great wealth, than him who, having nothing
to begin with, has no expectation of accumulating
a fortuneso the beauty has a capital, which
induces her to study neatness, grace, and
propriety
.
I know not whether any of this philosophy holds
good among the OmawhawsI am sure that, as
things go in our own land, I am not far from the
orthodox creed in respect to this delicate matter.
Of one thing, however, there is no doubt: Menae
was not only the most beautiful of the Omawhaws,
but she seemed to feel the consciousness of her
advantage, and to improve it with a skill of which
the unenlightened heathen around her had no idea.
It might have been because she was the daughter
of a chiefor because a portion of her father's
talents had descended to herbut I am inclined
to think it was because she was remarkably
handsome
.
For one or all of these reasons, she was
more neat in her dress, more graceful in her
carriage
,
more sedate and modest in her conduct,
more dignified, and altogether more lady-like, after
the fashion of the Omawhaws, than any other
young lady of that nation:all which I am ready
to verify.
Among the Omawhaws, females are usually
betrothed
in childhood, but the daughter of Blackbird
had remained free from any engagement. Great
men sometimes trample on national usages which
interfere with their own designs, and the politic
chief of the Omawhaws might have kept his
daughter free from any engagement, in order to
be at full liberty, at any time, to make for her the
best match which his situation might command.
Or, perhaps, the awe in which the chief was held,
and the general belief in his supernatural power,
may have kept the other fathers of the tribe at a
distance, or have induced a doubt in their minds
whether a near alliance with their dreaded leader
was desirable. Such however was the fact. Menae
had now reached her fifteenth year, and the young
warriors began to look towards her as an object of
peculiar attraction. In her presence they reined
up their horses, involuntarily seeking to display
the action of their steeds and their own
horsemanship
or
urged their canoes over the eddying
waves of the Missouri with redoubled vigour.
Some of them improved vastly in their attention
to the labours of the toilet, adorned their faces
with an unusual quantity of red paint, and their
necks with the claws of bearsand hung all sorts
of grisly ornaments about their persons. Others
exhibited the scalps of their enemies slain in battle,
with more than ordinary ostentation; and the
trophies
torn from slaughtered white men became
quite the fashion. But all in vain: the New
Moon moved gracefully in her orbit, shedding
her beams alike on all, and not distinguishing
any with particular marks of her favour.
More than a year previous to the time at which
our tale commences, a young trader had arrived
20
at the Omawhaw village. Naturally sagacious,
and expert in business, he soon became acquainted
with the customs of the tribe, and acquired the
confidence of the people. His appearance was
prepossessing, his look was bold and manly, and
his speech prompt and frank, yet cautious and
respectful. The squaws called him
the handsome
white man
, but the more discriminating warriors
designated him
the wise stranger
.
He was one of a very numerous and successful
class, who are chiefly distinguished by their faculty
for getting along in the world, but who, in
consequence
of the possession of this one quality, receive
credit for many others. Calm, mild, with an
agreeable
smile always playing over his features, Mr.
Bolingbroke was pronounced to be a young
gentleman
of excellent heart; but the truth was, that
his heart had nothing to do with the blandness of
his manners. The secret of that uniform
self-possession
and civility consisted simply in the
absence of passion; the heart never concerned
itself in Mr. Bolingbroke's business. He was even
tempered, because he took no interest in any thing
but his own personal advancement; and, as long
as his affairs went on prosperously, there was no
reason why a perpetual sunshine should not play
over his features. He was courteous from policy,
because men are managed more easily by kindness
than by stratagem or force; and because it was
more natural to him to smile than to frown. The
world gave him credit for a great deal of feeling
simply because he had very little; for the less
sensibility a man has, the more he affects. He
was ardent and energetic in his business, earnest
in the pursuit of pleasure, and gay in company;
but the observer, who had watched him closely,
would have found that the only chords in his
bosom which were ever touched, were those of
self-gratification and self-interest.
The judicious conduct of Mr. Bolingbroke met
its usual reward, and he was prosperous in trade.
But, as time rolled on, other traders came to the
village, competition reduced his gains, and he
began
to see the necessity of adopting some expedient
which should give him an advantage over his rivals.
This was a matter of too much importance to be
settled in a moment; therefore he studied over it
for several months, smiling and showing his white
teeth all the while, and banishing every shadow of
care from his fine open countenance. He even
squeezed the hands of his competitors more
warmly
than usual, strolled often to their wigwams,
laughed with glee at their jokes, and seemed
really to love them, and to take an interest in
their prosperity. The result of his cogitations
was a conviction that the most feasible plan for
rising above competition would be that of wedlock,
that of identifying himself with the tribe,
enlisting
their affections, and securing the influence of
a powerful friend by a marriage with the daughter
of some influential person; nor did he hesitate a
moment in selecting, as the happy lady, the beauty
of the tribethe
New Moon
the only and beloved
daughter of the ruling chief.
The young merchant had more than once looked
with a delighted eye at the graceful form of Menae,
had spoken to her kindly when they met, and had
paid her the homage of gallant courtesy which
beauty always exacts. She had received his
attentions
with civility, but without any appearance
of being flattered by them. But now her quick
apprehension discovered that there was something
in his manner altogether different from his
ordinary
politeness. When he met this brightest of
all the stars in the galaxy of Omawhaw beauty,
his eye rested upon her with a peculiar meaning;
and he more than once stopped, as if he would
have spoken. How quick-sighted is woman in the
affairs of the heart! She saw that the white
stranger was smitten; and the conviction afforded
her that mischievous satisfaction, which a pretty
girl always feels, on witnessing the havoc made
by her charms, when her own affections remain
untouched. It was so with Menae; the white
stranger had as yet made no impression on her
heart. Some presents, of more value than those
which he had been in the habit of giving to the
Indian maidens, convinced her of that which she
had begun to suspect; and she whispered to
herself
,
in the exultation of a girl over her first
conquest
,
the handsome white man loves the New
Moon.
Just at this crisis arrived the season of the grand
summer hunt, when, the corn having been weeded,
the whole tribe abandoned the village, and
proceeded
to the great plains where the buffaloes
graze in vast herds. This is an occasion of great
rejoicing. For several days previous to the
departure
of the tribe, feasts were held, and councils
assembled to deliberate on the route, to devise the
plan of the hunt, and to suggest the necessary
precautions to avoid the snares of their enemies.
The elders of the tribe repeated the results of
their experience, the orators embraced the
occasion
to win new trophies of applause, and while
some were successful in these ambitious attempts,
there were also others who
In that unnavigable stream were drowned.
The traders were consulted in reference to the
supply of guns and ammunition; and the hunters
made their contracts individually, in accordance
with which they were provided with rifles,
gunpowder
,
and other articles, to be paid for in furs
and peltry, at the close of the hunting season.
It was on such occasions, that Bolingbroke had
20*
heretofore discovered his influence to be at its
greatest height among his savage customers; who
treated his suggestions with deference, in
proportion
to the amount of the favours which they
solicited at his hands. In the wilderness, as in
the marts of civilised life, people are never so
kind to each other as at the moment when the
relation of debtor and creditor is about to be
created, and never less cordial than during the
existence of that obligation. Bolingbroke had
found himself, at one season, worshipped as the
idol of the tribe, and, at another, feared as its
master; but, by being alternately an indulgent
creditor, and an unassuming friend, had retained
its confidence. It was, therefore, with no small
degree of chagrin that he now saw his business
about to be shared, and his influence divided, with
others. His convictions, as to the propriety of
entering into the honourable state of matrimony,
became greatly strengthened by this new evidence
of the evanescent nature of his own popularity;
and his love for the New Moon increased to a
steady flame, as the propitious influence which
this bright star might exert over his fortunes
became
clearly developed.
The councils continued to be held; and, while
the chief men were employed in maturing the
weighty affairs of their little state, every leisure
interval was filled with sport and feasting. The
men amused themselves with various pastimes,
such as cards, dancing, foot-ball, and racing. The
younger warriors were painted with more than
ordinary care; some gave themselves up to the
affairs of courtship and gallantry-others did
honour to the chiefs and distinguished braves, by
dancing before the doors of their respective lodges
while a few, ludicrously appareled, moved about
the village, exciting laughter by the performance
of coarse feats of buffoonery. The criers passed
through the streets, inviting individuals by name,
in a loud voice, to feasts given by their friends,
charging them, at the same time, to be careful to
bring their own bowls and spoons; and, again,
proclaiming that the entertainments were over,
praising the hospitality of the several hosts,
publishing
the resolves of the council, and
admonishing
the people to hasten their preparations for
departure.
At length, every requisite arrangement being
complete, the females, to whom the prospect of
such a journey is always gratifying, were seen
moving rapidly about, assiduously occupied in
loading their horses with such moveables as were
necessary to be transported. It was obvious that
they felt their own importance; their active
motions
,
busy faces, and loud talking, evinced that
for the moment they had broken through all the
salutary restraints of discipline, and assumed the
reins of government; and they even ventured to
rate their husbands severely, for real or supposed
trespasses, upon what they considered their
peculiar
provinceas we have understood the ladies of
another tribe, which shall be nameless, are
accustomed
to do, when their liege lords intrude upon
them while in the performance of any household
solemnities which they regard as inviolate.
The march of the tribe from the village
presented
a picturesque and beautiful scene. It was
a bright morning in June. The sun was just
rising over the rounded bluffs, and throwing his
beams obliquely along the surface of the turbid
Missouri. The prairie was clad in its richest
apparel. The young grass covered it with a
thick sward, which still preserved the living
freshness and beautiful verdure of spring, and
flowers, infinite in number, as diversified in hue,
reared their heads to the surface of the grassy
carpet, and seemed to repose upon it, like colours
upon the canvass of the painter. The whole plain
presented a series of graceful swells and
depressions
,
which, at this early hour of the day,
received
the sunlight under such a variety of angles,
as to afford an endless diversity of light and shade;
while it heightened the effect of the perspective,
by throwing up a few points into prominent relief,
and casting others, whose features were as
distinctly
visible, into an imaginary back-ground.
As the cavalcade commenced its march, a long
train of warriors, on horseback, were beheld
issuing
from the village, arrayed in all the pomp, and
in all the grave dignity, of Indian display. Their
faces were carefully painted in the best style,
some gaily, with a profusion of crimson, others
lowering in the gloomy ferocity of black, while
their bodies were adorned with the trapping of
savage magnificence, and their heads arrayed in
feathers of a variety of gaudy hues. They were
armed with the numerous implements of war and
huntingwith guns, bows, war-clubs, tomahawks,
and knivesand mounted upon small active horses,
with vicious eyes and untamed spirits, that evinced
submission to the power of their riders, but not
affection for their persons. Some rode without
stirrups, some on saddles richly ornamented. The
bridles of many were decorated with gaudy
coloured
ribbon, tape, or tinsel, or with bits of tin,
or pieces of dressed deer skin cut into fringe, or
rolled into tassels; and many had adorned the
manes and tails of their horses. Although, in the
appearance of some of these native warriors, the
grotesque predominated, while extreme poverty
was displayed in the equipment of others, there
was observable in each, the same unconstrained
air, and indescribable wildness, peculiar to this
original people; and there were a few warriors
mounted on fine horses, well clad, completely
armed and appointed, of sedate carriage, and
military bearing, and whose whole conduct bore
the decisive stamp of dignity. They moved
slowly; but here and there might be seen a young
brave urging his horse rapidly along the flank of
the column, or seeking to attract attention by
dashing off from the party, across the plain, at full
speed, with his feet pressed in his courser's sides,
his body bent forward, his buffalo spear poised, as
if for striking, and his long plume of feathers
streaming upon the wind. Behind the main body
of horsemen, followed the squaws, the children,
and the old men, a few of whom were mounted on
lean ponies, but the greater part on foot, trudging
soberly alongexcept the younger females, who
amused themselves with jeering any of the junior
warriors who happened to lag behind their
comrades
.
Under charge of this body of
non-combatants
,
was a train of pack-horses, bearing the mats,
skin lodges, and other moveables. On the packs
might be seen many a little urchin, too big to be
carried on his mother's back, yet too small to
walk, who enjoyed the high privilege of being
lashed to the baggage, and treated as an article
of furniturewhere he sat comfortably enough,
poking out his dark face from among the
packages
,
and staring with his little wild black eyes,
like a copper-headed snake. With this part of
the cavalcade, too, were the dogs, who, when not
abroad on duty with their masters, usually seek
the society of the ladies, and the agreeable
atmosphere
of the culinary department. Those in
question
were particularly given to these lounging
habits, and for ever stealing after the flesh pots,
and endeavouring to curry favour with the women.
From their appearance, one would suppose their
company not to have been desirable; for the
Indian's
dog is a lean, hungry, ferocious animal, who
gets more kicks than favours, and who sneaks
about, with his bushy tail drooped, his pointed
ears erect, his long nose thrust forward, and his
watchful eye gleaming with mischief and distrust.
Resembling the wolf in appearance and manners,
he seems to be obedient from fear only, and to
have little in common with the generous and
affectionate
animal, who is the friend, as well as the
servant
,
of civilised man, and of whom the poet
testified, when he said, they are
honest
creatures
.
On leaving the village, the Indian train ascended
a long gradual swell, until they reached a
beautifully
rounded eminence, that commanded an
extensive
view of the prairie, over which they were
about to travel. Nothing could be more striking
than this wild picture of native luxuriance, and
aboriginal pomp. A wide expanse of scenery was
spread before the eye. The interminable plain
seemed to extend further than the vision could
reach; and there was something peculiarly
picturesque
in the march of the Omawhaws, whose
long party-coloured line wound and undulated
among the slopes and mounds of the prairie,
headed by armed warriors, and flanked by young
horsemen, darting off from the main body to show
the speed of their horses, and displaying their own
dexterity by a variety of evolutions.
When the party reached the most elevated point
of the plain, it halted, and a glance was thrown
back towards the deserted wigwams. Not a living
thing moved in the village, whose lowly huts,
untenanted
and still, seemed to form a part of the
natural landscape. Beyond it flowed the broad
and turbulent Missouri, and further towards the
east, was a range of low, pointed hills, whose
sides were thinly clothed with timber, while their
bald summits were covered with only a verdant
carpet of grass. The newly risen sun had just
appeared beyond these hills, lighting up their
peaked tops with the full effulgence of his
splendour
,
and strongly marking the characteristic
horizon of this peculiar region of country. Over
this scene they gazed for a few moments with
eomtion, for some of them might never return to
the wigwams of their tribe, and those who should
survive might find their fields ravaged, and the
graves of their fathers desecrated. Even an
Indian
loves his home. Erratic as are his habits,
and little as he seems to understand or enjoy
domestic
comfort, he acquires, unconsciously, an
attachment towards the spot on which he resides,
and a reverence for the associations by which it is
surrounded. There are dear and joyful
recollections
connected with the fireside, however humble
it may be; and the turf that covers the remains
of departed friends, is as holy in the eyes of the
uneducated savage, who has never been taught to
analyse the operations of his own mind, as in those
of the person of refinement, who recognises the
good taste and virtuous feeling of this natural
emotion
of the heart.
Bolingbroke was not the man to appreciate an
interesting landscape, or to sympathise with a flow
of tender feeling. He sat on his horse, apart from
the others, and was calculating the probable
advantages
of an union with the daughter of the chief of
the Omawhaws, and revolving in his mind the
means by which he might most speedily bring
about so desirable an alliance, when the Blackbird
himself rode up beside him.
Is the
Wise Stranger
sorrowful in spirit,
said the chief, or does he regret that the
Omawhaws
are quitting the graves of their fathers?
Neither, replied Bolingbroke; the Great
Spirit has not thrown any cloud over the heart
of his white son, and the graves that we are
leaving
are not those of
my
fathers.
21
Then why should the trader of the white people
be sad, when his red brethren are going to hunt
on the plains where the buffaloes feed?
I am thinking of something that I had
forgotten
.
Has the Master of life told my friend in a
dream, that he has failed to do something which
he ought to have done?
Yes, my father; even thus has the Master of
life whispered to my heart, while my eyes were
sleeping. I have seen my fault. But I feel
comforted
by the reflection that the great chief of the
Omawhaws is my friend.
The chief directed a calm though penetrating
glance of enquiry towards his companion, but the
countenance of the trader betrayed no emotion.
It was evident the offence was not one of deep dye.
His eye wandered back to the cavalcade, and rested
proudly on the warrior train. The young trader
resumed:
My father has always been kind to the white
stranger.
The pale face has reason to believe that the
Blackbird is his friend, replied the chief.
I have endeavoured to convince the great
chief that I desire to serve him. I have no other
pleasure than to make the Omawhaws happy, by
supplying their wants.
The white man has done his dutyI am
satisfied.
Here a pause ensued, and these well-matched
politicians gazed along the line, which was now
beginning to be again set in motioneach
endeavouring
stealthily to catch a glance at the
countenance
of the other. The young merchant was the
first to renew the conversation.
In making my presents to the chiefs, he said,
I endeavoured to distinguish those who were
most worthy, and who stood highest in the
estimation
of the Omawhaws, by the value of the gifts
which I made them. But I fear that I did not
sufficiently recollect the high claims of the
Blackbird
,
who is elevated above all others by his
wisdom, his many victories, and his friendship
for the white people. I am a young man, and the
Great Spirit has not been pleased to give me that
wisdom which he reserves for great chiefs, whose
business is to govern tribes.
As he said this, he drew from his bosom an
elegantly
mounted dirk, a favourite ornament and
weapon of the Indian.
Will the head man of the Omawhaws,
continued
he, presenting it, accept this as a small
part of the atonement which my negligence
imposes
on me; and depend upon my word, that, in
future, I shall not forget the distance between a
great chief and his inferiors?
The white stranger has been very properly
called
wise
, said the chief, and the head man
of the Omawhaws knows how to value his friends.
I have looked back at our path;it is all white
there is no cloud there. The white trader may
know hereafter that the Blackbird is his friend.
Thus saying, he eyed the beautiful weapon
which he had received with complacency, drew it,
and examined the bladepassing his eye along it
with the keen scrutiny of one intimately versed in
the mechanism and use of military implements;
then, having arranged it in the most conspicuous
manner upon his person, he rode away, muttering
to himself, What does the trader want in return
for so fine a present? He did not dream that
Bolingbroke wanted his daughter.
In a few days they arrived at the pastures of the
buffalo, and beheld the plains covered with herds
of wild cattle. The animating scenes of the hunt
commenced. Parties of hunters, mounted upon
fleet horses well trained to this sport, dashed in
among the grazing herds. At their approach the
buffaloes fled in alarm; the hunters pursued at full
speed, each horseman selecting his victim. The
swiftness of the horse soon outstripped the speed
of the buffalo, and placed the hunter by the side of
his noble game; when, dropping the bridle, while
his trained steed continued to bear him gallantly
along, side by side, with the buffalo, he discharged
his arrows into the panting animal, until it fell
mortally wounded. Then the hunter, quitting his
prey, dashed again into the affrighted herd to select
another.
It was an inspiring sight to behold the wide
plain,an immense meadow, studded with
ornamental
groves,covered with numerous herds,
quietly grazing like droves of domestic cattle;
then to see the Omawhaw bands, under the cover
of some copse or swelling ground, covertly
approaching
from the leeward, so that the timid
animals might not scent their approach in the
tainted breeze; and, at last, to view the confusion
occasioned by their sudden onset. On discovering
their enemies, the alarmed herd, following its
leaders
,
would attempt to move away rapidly in a solid
phalanx; but the hunters, penetrating boldly into
the heart of the retreating body, dispersed it in
every directionand the maddened animals were
seen flying towards all points of the compass,
followed
by the fierce wild hunters. The
vicissitudes
of the chase were numerous and diversified.
Sometimes a horse fell, and the prostrate rider was
saluted with loud shouts of derision; sometimes a
large bull turned suddenly upon his pursuer, and
burying his horns deep in the flanks of the steed,
hurled him upon the plain; and more than once
the hunter, thus thrown, with difficulty escaped
being trodden to death by the furious herd.
21*
Bolingbroke engaged with ardour in this sport.
He was a skilful and daring horseman; and though
at first awkward, from his ignorance of the artifices
of the chase, he soon became sufficiently expert to
be considered as an useful auxiliary by his
companions
.
The warriors began to treat him with
increased respect; and even the squaws, whose
favour he had heretofore conciliated by timely
presents, looked upon him with more
complacency
,
after witnessing these displays of his activity
and courage.
A daring horseman gallops rapidly into a lady's
affections. The sex admire intrepidity, and give
their suffrages decidedly in favour of a dashing
fellow who combines boldness with grace and
skill. Bolingbroke found favour in the eyes of
the New Moon; and, though she carefully
concealed
her sentiments in her own bosom, he soon
ceased to be an object of indifference. He was
her father's friend, and she began to discover that
it was her duty to admire his exploits and approve
his conduct. One day, as he was returning to
camp alone from a successful hunt, he overtook
the fair Menae, who was also separated
accidentally
from the company. It was an opportunity too
favourable to be lost. As he joined her she threw
her eyes upon the ground, and walked silently
forward
.
He dismounted, and throwing his bridle
over his arm, placed himself at the side of the
Omawhaw beauty.
How awkward it is to begin a conversation under
such circumstances! Among us, a remark on the
weather would have furnished a theme for the
lovers to begin upon; but these meteorological
discussions were not fashionable at the Omawhaw
village. One of Miss Edgeworth's heroes pulled
a flower to pieces, on a similar occasion, before he
could open his mouth; but Bolingbroke was a man
of business, and came at once to the point.
The daughter of Blackbird looks upon the
ground, said he; she does not seem pleased to
see the white friend of her father.
The white stranger is glad because he has had
a good hunt, replied the maiden, and others
seem to him to be sad, because they are not so
joyful as himself.
When I look at the New Moon, rejoined the
lover, my heart is always filled with gladness,
for she is very beautiful.
I have often heard, replied Menae, that the
white men have forked tongues, and do not mean
what they say.
Others may have lying lips, but mine are
true. I have never deceived the Omawhaws. I
speak truth, when I say that I love the beautiful
Menae, for she is handsomer than all the other
daughters of her tribe. If she will be my wife, I
will build a wigwam in the village of the
Omawhaws
,
and quit for ever the graves of my fathers,
and the council fires of the white people.
The wise stranger would send a cloud over
his father's house. How many of the girls of the
pale faces are looking up the great river, to see
him return, as he promised them? enquired she,
archly.
Not one! not one! You are the only woman
I have ever lovedI will never love another.
Become my wife, and I promise you, here in
the presence of the Master of life, that I wil never
seek the love of any other. Menae shall be the
sole companion, and dearest friend, of my life.
I am the daughter of a great chief, replied
the Indian maid.
Ah! I understand youyou are too proud to
marry one who is not of your nation.
The roaring of the buffalo has made the ear
of the white hunter dull. I am the daughter of a
chief, and I may not give myself away.
Lovely Menae! exclaimed the youth, as he
attempted to seize her hand; but she quietly
folded her arms, and looked at him with
composure
,
assuming a dignity which effectually repelled
any further advance. She then addressed him
with a touching softness of voice.
There is a path to my heart which is right;
it is a straight path. She paused; but her eye,
which beamed softly upon her lover, expressed all
that he could have wished. She added, If the
white trader is wise, as men say he is, he will not
attempt to gain a young maiden's affections by
any crooked way.
So saying, she walked quietly away, while the
politic trader, who understood her meaning,
respectfully
withdrew, satisfied that the lady would
interpose no objection to his suit, if the consent of
a higher authority could be secured.
Having taken his resolution, he proceeded to
the lodge of the Blackbird, and endeavoured to
conciliate the favour of both the parents of Menae
by liberal presents. He adverted artfully to the
advantages which would accrue to both parties by
an alliance between the chief and himself, avowed
his love for their daughter, and his decided wish
to marry one of the Omawhaw tribe. He
promised
,
if they would transfer their daughter to
him in marriage, to treat her kindly, and to
introduce
no other wife into his lodge. He suggested
that he had now established a permanent trading
house at their village, where he should reside
during the greater part of the year, and where he
would be fully able to protect and support, both
his proposed wife, and her kindred, if necessary.
In return, he hoped the nation would give him the
preference in their trade, and consider him as one
allied to them in affection and interest.
To this very business like harangue, which was
sufficiently sentimental for the ears to which it
was addressed, the parents made a suitable reply.
They thanked him for his liberal offers, and were
gratified that he had taken pity on their daughter;
they would not object to the connection, and hoped
their daughter would accept him. The mother
added that Menae was stronger than she looked,
and could carry a great many skins; and, though
she was not very expert in tending corn, she was
young enough to learn. The chief gave him the
comfortable assurance that it was quite indifferent
to them how many wives he might choose to have,
provided he could support and govern themfor
his part, he had had his own trouble with one;
but he commended the prudence of his young
friend in confining himself to a single squaw for
the present, until he should become experienced
in the inequalities of the female temper, and
have learned the difficult art of ruling a
household
.
The parents retired, and opened the subject to
their daughter, to whom they magnified the
advantages
of the proposed alliance, with one who
was, in their opinion, a greater man than any of
the Omawhaws. His wealth exceeded that of all
the tribe; his store of guns, ammunition, trinkets,
and clothing, seemed to be inexhaustible; and
they earnestly requested her to secure her own
happiness, and advance the interests of her family,
by accepting an offer so tempting.
The
New Moon
, though delighted with her
conquest
,
thought it proper, as young ladies are apt to
think, on such occasions, to support her dignity by
affecting some reluctance. In the first place, the
gentleman's complexion was against him, and she
would have given any thingexcept himselfif it
had been a shade or two darker. Then his taste
in dress was by no means such as accorded with
her ideas of manly beauty; and she regretted that
he did not paint his handsome face, decorate his
hair with the feathers of the eagle, ornament his
nasal protuberance with rings, and cover his
shoulders with the ample folds of a Makinaw
blanket. Above all, he had never struck an
enemy in battle; not a single scalp attested his
prowess as a warrior; and although he managed
a horse with skill, and had wielded the rifle
successfully
in the chase, he was as ignorant as a
woman of the use of a tomahawk, or a scalping
knife. Notwithstanding all this, she admitted
that the white trader was wise he was young,
had a good eye, and a stout arm, and might, in
time, with proper tuition, become worthy to be
ranked among the head men of the Omawhaws.
Upon the whole, she expressed her own
unworthiness
,
her ignorance of what would be right on
such an occasion, her willingness to obey the
wishes of her parents, and to advance the interests
of her nation; and as it seemed to be their desire,
and her duty, she would marry the trader.
They were united accordingly, and the beautiful
Menae entered upon a new existence. Marriage
always affects a decided change upon the
sentiments
of those, who come within its sacred pale
under a proper sense of the responsibilities of the
married state. However delightful the intercourse
of wedded hearts, there is, to a well-regulated
mind, something extremely solemn in the duties
imposed by this interesting relation. The
reflection
that an existence which was separate and
independent
is ended, and that all its hopes and
interests are blended with those of another soul, is
deeply affecting, as it imposes the conviction that
every act which shall influence the happiness of
the one, will colour the destiny of the other. But
when the union is that of love, this feeling of
dependence
is one of the most delightful that can be
imagined. It annihilates the habit of selfish
enjoyment
,
and teaches the heart to delight in that
which gives pleasure to another. The affections
become gradually enlarged, expanding as the ties
of relationship, and the duties of life accumulate
around, until the individual, ceasing to know an
isolated existence, lives entirely for others, and for
society.
But it is the generous and the virtuous alone,
who thus enjoy this agreeable relation. Some
hearts there are, too callous to give nurture to a
delicate sentiment. There are minds too narrow
to give play to an expansive benevolence. A
certain
degree of magnanimity is necessary to the
existence of disinterested love, or friendship.
The beautiful Menae was of a noble generous
nature. She had never been selfish, and now that
her affections had an object on which to
concentrate
their warmth, her heart glowed with
disinterested
emotion. With a native ingenuousness
of soul, that had always induced her, even without
reflection, to consult the happiness of others in
preference to her own, she had now an object
whose interests were so dear, that it was as
delightful
,
as it was natural, to sacrifice to them all
her own inclinations. From the moment of her
marriage, she began to adapt her conduct to the
taste of her husband. She adopted his opinions,
imitated his manners, and gradually exchanged
the ornaments of her tribe for those which
accorded
better with his fancy. It cost her not a pang,
nor a regret, to throw aside the costume which
she had considered graceful, and had worn with
pride in the meridian of her beauty, and to invest
her charms in a foreign drapery, which was far
less becoming in her own eyes. Whatever her
husband admired, became graceful in her
estimation
;
and that which rendered her attractive to
22
him, she wore with more than youthful delight.
A similar change took place in her domestic
arrangements. Instead of the rude wigwam of
the Indian, Bolingbroke had built a small but
neat cottage, and had furnished it with some of
the comforts, though few of the luxuries, of his
country, and his wife eagerly endeavoured to
gratify his wishes, by adapting herself to his
habits of living. She learned to sit upon a chair,
to eat from a table, and to treat her husband as a
companion rather than as a master. Hour after
hour did she listen attentively to his descriptions of
the habits of his countrywomen, and carefully did
she treasure up in her memory every hint which
might serve as a guide in her endeavour to render
her own deportment pleasing to him to whom she
had given an unreserved affection. From him
she had learned to attach a name, and an
endearing
value, to the spot which he called his
home;
and, for his sake, she sought to throw every
enchantment
around the scene of their domestic
enjoyments. With all that wonderful facility with
which the female heart, when stimulated by the
desire of pleasing, can mould itself to the wishes of
another, she caught his opinions, and learned to
understand his tastesentwining her own
existence
around his, as the ivy clings to the oak.
Her cottage soon became conspicuous for its
neatness
and beauty. She transplanted the wild rose
and the honeysuckle, from the woods, and trained
them over her door, in imitation of the bowers
that he had described to her. Her table was
spread with the dainties which he had taught her
to prepare, her furniture arranged in the order
which he dictated, and all her household duties
directed with the nicest regard to his feelings or
prejudices.
And had she no prejudices to be respectedno
habits to be indulgedno wishes to be gratified?
None. She loved with the pure devotion of a
generous woman. She had a heart which could
sacrifice every selfish wish upon the altar of
affection
a
mind so resolute in the performance of
duty, that it could magnanimously stifle every
desire that ran counter to its own high standard
of rectitude. She possessed talent and feeling
and to those ideas of implicit obedience, and
profound
respect for her husband, which constitute
nearly the whole code of ethics of an Indian
female
,
she added a nice perception of propriety,
and a tenderness that filled her whole heart. She
had no reserved rights. She was too generous to
give a divided affection. In giving herself to her
husband she severed all other ties, and merged
her whole existence in hisand the language of
her heart was, thy people shall be my people,
and thy God my God. Such is the hallowed
principle of woman's lovesuch the pure
sentiment
,
the deep devotion, the high-minded elevation
of that passion, when sanctioned by duty, in the
bosom of a well-principled and delicate female!
The New Moon of the Omawhaws was a proud
and happy wife. Her young affections reposed
sweetly in the luxury of a blameless attachment.
She had married the man of her choice, who had
freely selected her from all her tribe. That man
was greater than those around him, and, in her
eyes, superior to most of his sex. He had
distinguished
and honoured her. He had taken her to
his bosom, given her his confidence, surrounded
her with luxuries and marks of kindness.
Yet there were some thorns in her path; and,
in the midst of all the brightness of her sunniest
days, her dream of bliss was sometimes chilled by
clouds that threw their dim shadows over it.
Almost
unconsciously to herself a sadness would rest
for a moment upon her heart, and fly before she
had time to enquire whence it came. There was
a dark spot in her destiny, of the existence of
which she was scarcely sensible, because she
turned her eyes away from it in fear or in pride.
A chill sometimes crept over her heart, but,
without
waiting to enquire into its cause, she chased it
away, gazed again upon the bright vision of her
wedded joy, and forgot that an unpleasant image
had been present. Was it the occasional coldness
of Bolingbroke, who, immersed in the cares of
business, or abstracted in the anticipations of a
future affluence, received the endearments of his
wife with indifference? Or was it the estranged
deportment of her tribe, who began to regard her
as an alien? She knew notshe never permitted
herself to doubt the love of her husband, and she
prized the affection of others too little, to enquire
into the ebb and flow of its tide.
The time, however, arrived when Menae began
to discover that she had a difficult task to perform.
Her husband was a trader, bent on the
accumulation
of wealth by catching every gale of fortune
that might chance to blowher relatives, and
those by whom she was surrounded, were fierce
and crafty savages, ignorant of the principles of
justice, and destitute of any fixed standard of moral
right. His interests and theirs were often
opposed
;
and while he was always prepared to reap
the spoil of their labours, they were as ready to
crush or to plunder him whenever he happened to
cross their purposes, or to awaken their suspicion.
His popularity rose and fell with the changes of
the season. A new supply of goods rendered him
the idol of the tribean exhausted stock exposed
him to insult and injustice. Previous to the annual
hunt, or to a warlike expedition, he was flattered
and obeyed by those improvident warriors, who,
having made no preparations for such an occasion,
were dependent upon him for the outfit which was
22*
necessary to enable them to take the field; but
when the spoils of the chase or of battle came to
be divided, and the largest portion was claimed by
the trader in payment of his debts, he became for
the moment an object of hatredand it required
all the power of the chiefs, and all the cunning of
his own politic brain, to secure him from their
vengeance. On such occasions he found his wife
an invaluable counsellor, and an efficient friend.
Her influence with the tribe was by no means
contemptible. Her own popularity, and her ready
access to the ear of her father, whom all others
feared to approach, gave her a degree of authority
among the warriors, which she seldom used, and
never exerted in vain.
But her influence was gradually diminishing.
As Bolingbroke grew rich he became more and
more rapacious. The other traders were
practising
every popular art to recommend themselves,
to destroy him, and to rise upon the ruins of his
prosperity; and his vigilant wife had more than
once protected his life and property, by discovering
the designs of his enemies, and secretly appealing
to her father for protection. These things,
however
,
did not disturb her peace. Vigilant by
natureaccustomed to danger from childhood,
and inured to all the vicissitudes of the savage
mode of lifeshe could watch with composure
over a husband's safety, and expose her own
existence
without fear. Perhaps, to one of her habits,
the excitement of such a life was agreeable; and
she certainly felt a pride in becoming thus
important
to him who was the sole object of her love.
But while she despised the machinations of her
husband's foes, with all the disdain of a proud
woman, it was not without uneasiness that she
discovered a sensible diminution in the cordiality
of her own friends. She had married one who
was an alien to her tribe, and such marriages
always produce estrangement. They saw her
abandoning the customs of her country, and
throwing
aside the dress of her people. She mingled
but little with the women of the Omawhaws; and
while she tacitly condemned some of their
practices
by her own deportment, she withdrew her
sanction from some of their ancient rites by her
absence. Her improvements in domestic economy
were regarded with ridicule and jealousy. The
young warriors no longer regarded her with pride
as the beauty of their nation, but considered her
as one who had apostatised from the customs of
her fathers, and degraded herself by linking her
destiny with that of a stranger from a foreign
land. She felt that she, who had been the idol of
the tribe, was sustained by the wealth of her
husband
and the power of her father, and not by the
affection of those around her.
It was the custom of Bolingbroke to descend
the river annually to St. Louis, for the purpose of
renewing his stock of merchandiseand he had
been married but a few months when the first
absence of this kind occurred. On his return, his
young wife received him with the utmost
tenderness
.
He was charmed to hear of the discretion
with which she had conducted herself in his
absence
,
and to perceive the many evidences of the
manner in which she had spent her time. He
learned that she had lived a retired life, engaging
in none of the public festivals, and receiving few
visiters at her house. She had laboured
incessantly
in decorating their dwelling, or in
fabricating
such articles of dress for her husband as she
thought would please his fancy; while she had
noticed with careful attention the movements of
the tribe, and gathered up every rumour, the
intelligence of which might be useful to him in
his mercantile concerns.
Another year came, and again he left her. His
absence was protracted during several months,
and within this period she became the mother
of a daughter, which she nursed with the fondest
solicitude. Her love for her husband, and her
anxiety for his return, seemed to increase after
this event. With her infant in her arms, she
wandered out daily to a secluded spot on the bank
of the river, where she would sit for hours,
following
the downward course of the river with
eager eyes to gain the earliest notice of his
approach
.
Estimating his feelings by her own, she
was impatient for the moment when she could
place the interesting stranger in his arms, and
see him gaze with delight at that beautiful
miniature
in which each might see the features of the
other. Nor was she disappointed. Bolingbroke
caressed his child with fondness, and she was the
happiest of mothersthe proudest of wives.
We must touch briefly upon the subsequent
events of this narrative. Another and another
year rolled away, and Menae was still the devoted
wife, while Bolingbroke was become a cold,
though a civil, husband: he bending all his
energies
to the acquisition of wealth, she bringing in
her diurnal tribute of love, and living only to
promote his happiness. They had now two
children
,
and when the time approached for his annual
visit to the settlements of the white people, he
proposed to carry the eldest with him. The wife,
always obedient, reluctantly consented, and
commanded
her feelings so far, as to behold their
departure in mute, suppressed affliction. But,
although one charge remained, upon which she
might lavish her caresses, no sooner had her
husband
commenced his voyage, than her maternal
fondness overpowered her, and she ran screaming
along the shore of the river, in pursuit of the boat,
tearing out her long glossy tresses, and appearing
almost bereft of reason. Unable to overtake the
boat, she returned disconsolate, and assumed the
deepest mourning which the customs of her tribe
impose on the state of widowhood. She cut off
her beautiful raven locks, gave away her
ornaments
,
and every thing that she had worn in her
day of pride, and clothed herself in humble attire.
Confining herself to her own dwelling, she refused
the visits of her friends, and repelled their offers of
consolation. She said that she well knew that her
daughter would be better treated among the whites,
than she could be at home, but she could not avoid
regarding her own situation to be the same as if
the Wahcondah had taken away her offspring for
ever.
By degrees her remaining child began to absorb
the entire current of her affections, and, on his
account
,
she resumed the performance of her
household
duties, though she would not throw aside her
mourning. One day, she had gone in company
with some other females to the corn-fields,
adjoining
the village, and was engaged in agricultural
labours, her infant boy being secured, after the
Indian fashion, to a board, which she had carefully
leaned against a tree. They were discovered by a
lurking war-party of Sioux, who rushed upon them
suddenly, in the expectation of gratifying their
vengeance by the massacre of the whole party.
An exclamation of terror, uttered by one of the
females, on discovering the enemy, caused the
alarmed women to fly precipitately; and Menae,
in the first moment of affright, was in the act of
retreating with the others, when she recollected
her child. To save a life more precious than her
own, she swiftly returned, in the face of the Sioux
warriors, snatched her child from the tree, and
bore him rapidly away. She was closely pursued
by one of the savages, who had nearly overtaken
her, when she arrived at a fence which separated
the field from the enclosure surrounding the
trading-house
.
A moment's hesitation would have
been fatalbut, with a presence of mind which
always distinguished her above other women, she
gathered all her strength, threw the child, with
its board, into the enclosure, and then, placing her
hands on the fence, leaped nimbly over. Several
of her companions were murdered, while she
escaped, with her child, unhurt.
*
*
I am indebted to Long's Expedition for this, and some
of the other incidents of this tale.
After a longer absence than usual, Bolingbroke
returned, bringing with him an accomplished lady,
of his own people, whom he had married, but
unaccompanied
by his Indian daughter, whom he
had placed at school. Menae heard this
intelligence
with the deepest sorrow, but with less
surprise
than such an event would have occasioned a
wife in a civilised land; as the practice of
polygamy
,
which prevails among the Omawhaws, had
perhaps prepared her to anticipate such an
occurence
as not improbable. She was stung to the
heart by the conviction that she had lost the love
of him, who was dearer to her than all the world,
and for whom she had sacrificed so much; and
mortified that another should be preferred to
herself
.
But the legality of the transaction, and its
frequency among the people of her tribe, lulled, in
some degree, the sense of degradation, and blunted
the sharpness of her resentment. She considered
the act lawful, while she condemned the actor as
faithless and ungrateful. In secresy she wept
bitterly over her disappointed pride, and blighted
joy; but professed in public a cheerful
acquiescence
in the decision of her husband. The
Blackbird
was now dead; and the keen sighted Menae
could not blind herself to the conviction, that the
decease of her father had rendered her of less
importance
to the mercenary trader.
Previous to the arrival of Bolingbroke at the
Omawhaw village, he despatched a message to
the trading-house, announcing his marriage, and
forbidding his Indian wife from appearing in the
presence of her rival. To this cruel mandate she
submitted, with that implicit obedience which the
females of her race are accustomed to pay to the
commands of their husbands, and departed to a
distant village of her nation. But what woman
can trust the weakness of her heart? Conjugal
love, and maternal fondness, both allured her to
the presence of him who had so long been the
master of her affections. Which of these was the
prevailing inducement, it is difficult to conjecture;
she longed to see Bolingbroke, and her heart
yearned for tidings from her absent child, but
without this plea, her pride would probably have
forbidden her from seeking an interview with the
destroyer of her peace. Unable to remain in
banishment, she returned to her native village,
with her little boy on her back, and encamped in
the neighbourhood of her husband's residencein
sight of that cottage which her own hands had
embellished, in which she had spent years of
domestic
felicity, and where another now reigned in
her place. She sent her son to the trader, who
treated him affectionately. On the following day
he commanded her presence, and she stood before
him, in that house which had been her own, with
her arms meekly folded upon her breast, gazing
calmly on the cold but handsome features of him
who was the lord of her destiny. Suppressing
every other feeling, and avoiding all other topics,
she enquired for her daughter, and listened with
interest to such information as he was pleased to
give her. She then, with much composure,
desired
to know his intentions in relation to the
23
future disposition of both her children. To this
question he gave an evasive answer; and directed
her to accompany her friends, who were on their
way to the hunting grounds. She departed
without
a murmur.
Two months afterwards, she was recalled. She
lost no time in presenting herself before the
husband
whom she still tenderly loved,
notwithstanding
his cruel desertion. Her resentment had in a
great measure subsided, and rather than be
banished
entirely from his affection, she was content
to share it with another, according to the usages
of her tribe. Such she supposed to be his
intention
in sending for her, and she freely forgave the
temporary aberration of his love, under the
supposition
that she would be to him hereafter, if not
his sole favourite, at least a respected wife, that
her children would find a home under his roof, and
that he would be to her, and them, a faithful
protector
.
Alas! how the heart, given up to the
illusions
of love, cheats itself with visions of future
bliss! How often does the young wife build up a
fabric of happiness, which, like the icy palace of
the Russian potentate, is splendid to the eye in the
hour of its illumination, but melts away with the
sun of the succeeding day! The New Moon
hastened to her husband, full of young hope, and
newly kindled affection; but bitter was her
disappointment
,
when, after an austere reception, he
demanded the surrender of her son, and renounced
any future association with herself, directing her
to return to her people, and to provide for her own
support as she might see proper.
Indignant at being thus repudiated, overcome
by feelings which she could not control, and
alarmed at the proposed separation from her
child, she rushed from the house with the infant
in her arms, and finding a canoe on the river
shore, paddled over to the opposite side, and made
her escape into the forest. The weather was
cold and stormy, the snow was falling, and the
wretched mother had no shelter to protect her.
Throughout the whole night she wandered about
in the wilderness, hugging her babe to her bosom,
and keeping it alive by the warmth of her own
breast. But worn down with fatigue and exposure,
and discouraged by her disconsolate condition, she
determined in the morning to return, and, with the
feelings of a wife and mother, to plead her cause
before the arbiter of her fate.
Early in the morning, the wretched woman,
faint, hungry, and shivering with cold, presented
herself before him, who, in the hour of her beauty,
had sued for her favour. She, who had loved,
and cherished, and counselled, and protected him,
and who had higher claims upon him than any
other living individual, stood a trembling suppliant
at his door.
Here is our child, said she; I do not
question
your fondness for himbut he is still more
dear to me. You can not love him with a
mother's
love, nor keep him with a mother's care.
You say that you will keep him for yourself, and
drive me far from you. But, noI will remain
with him. You may spurn me from your own
society, but you cannot drive me from my child.
Take him and feed him. I can find some corner
into which I may creep, in order to be near him,
and hear him when he cries for his mother, and
sometimes see him. If you will not give me food,
I will remain until I starve, and die before your
eyes.
There are those who have no feeling. The
trader had none. Not a chord in his bosom
vibrated
to this eloquent appeal. A young and
beautiful woman reduced to penurya mother
folding her infant in her armshis own wife, the
mother of his childrenshe who had cherished
his interest and honour more dearly than her own
life, and who would have endured any anguish to
have saved him from a momentary pang;with
all these, and a thousand other claims upon his
sympathy and justice, she was an unsuccessful
suppliant
.
He offered her money, and desired her to leave
the child. Her blood rushed to her heart at the
base proposal, and she indignantly repliedIs
my child a dog, that I should sell him for
merchandise
?
You cannot drive me away; you may
beat me, you may taunt me with insults, but I will
remain. When you married me, you promised to
use me kindly as long as I should be faithful to
you; that I have always been so, no one can deny.
I have loved you with tenderness, and served you
with fidelity. Ours was not a marriage contracted
for a seasonit was to terminate only with our
lives. I was then a young girl, the daughter of
the head man of the Omawhaws, and might have
been united to a chief of my own nation; but now
I am an old woman, the mother of two children,
and what Omawhaw will regard me? Is not my
right superior to that of your other wife? She
had heard of me before you possessed her. It is
true, her skin is whiter than mine, but her heart
cannot be more pure towards you, nor her fidelity
more rigid. Do not take the child from my breast
I cannot bear to hear it cry, and not be present
to relieve it: permit me to retain it until the
spring, when it will be able to eat, and then, if it
must be so, take it from my sight, that I may part
with it but once.
The trader remained inexorable; he listened,
with apathy, to the feeling appeal of his wife; but
finding her inflexible, and knowing her high spirit,
he attempted no replycoolly remarking that she
might remain there if she pleased, but that the
23*
child should immediately be sent down to the
settlements
.
The affectionate mother had thus far sustained
herself, during the interview, with the firmness of
conscious right, and had successfully curbed the
impulse of her feelings; but nature now yielded,
the tears burst from her eyesand clasping her
hands, and bowing her head, she gave way to the
agony of her grief, exclaimingWhy did the
Master of life hate me so much, as to induce me
to put my child again into your power?
But, no, she continued, after a momentary
pause, we are not in your poweryou have
renounced
my obedienceI no longer owe you any
duty. I belong to a free wild race that has never
submitted to oppression. The pale face shall learn
that the blood of an Omawhaw chief runs in the
veins of his discarded wife. For herself, she has
no wrongs to resentbut for her child she can
strike the death-blow with as firm an arm as that
of the warrior. My son shall not go to the fires
of the white people, to be their servant, and to be
insulted for his descent from an Indian mother.
He shall not be trained up in the corn-field like a
squaw, or be taught to sell his honour for money
like the trader of the white Americans. I shall
take him with me. He is mine, and shall never
be taken alive from my arms. Attempt to
separate
us, and I will strike this knife to his heart,
and then put an end to my own wretched
existence
!
So saying, she darted away with a swiftness
which announced that the resolution of her mind
had imparted new vigour to her limbs; while the
trader, alarmed by her threats, abandoned his
purpose
,
and suffered her to retire without pursuit.
Two weeks afterwards, a haggard female was
seen slowly approaching a distant hunting-camp
of the Omawhaws, bearing an emaciated child on
her back. It was she who had once been the
pride of their nationthe daughter of that dreaded
chief whose word was law. She had wandered
through the woods, thinly clad, and almost without
food, subsisting upon such small game as she could
entrap by artifice. At night she crept into a
hollow
tree, or scraped the snow from the ground,
and nestled in the leaves. She had traversed the
wide prairies, now desolate and snow clad, on whose
broad expanse scarce a living animal was seen, and
over which the bleak wind swept with unbroken
power. The wolf had tracked her footsteps, and
howled around the dreary spot of her lonesome
encampment. Without a path or a guide
ignorant
of the intended movements of her tribe, and
uncertain where to find themexposed to
imminent
and constantly impending danger from cold,
hunger, beasts of prey, and hostile savagesthis
intrepid female pursued her solitary way through
the vast wilderness with unbroken spirit, trusting
to her native courage and sagacity, and praying to
the Great Master of life for assistance. And who
doubts that such a prayer is heard? Who can
doubt that the same beneficent God who decks the
wilderness with matchless beauty, and stores it
with abundance, listens to the plaintive cry of the
widowed mother and her innocent babe? How
often do the weak and helpless pass unhurt through
perils under which the bold and strong would sink,
or endure privations for the support of which
humanity
seems unequal! And can we see this
without
believing that the same unseen influence, which
tempers the wind to the shorn lamb, is ever ready
to listen to the petition of the afflicted?and that
those who seem most friendless and destitute are
the favoured objects of the most efficient
protection
?
Yesthere is a prayer that is heard,
though it ascend not from the splendid edifices
erected by pride or piety, nor clothes itself in the
rounded periods of polished eloquence. There is
a religion of the heart, and a language of nature;
and God, who so organised the flower that it turns
itself to the sun, to catch vigour from the
life-giving-ray
,
has so framed the human bosom that it
spontaneously expands itself to Him in the hour of
adversity. She prayed to the Great Spirit, and
he conducted her safely through the wilderness.
The Omawhaws had regarded the wife of
Bolingbroke
with coldness, when they saw her
surrounded
with affluence superior to their own, and
considered her as an apostate from the ancient
customs of her people. Their love for her was
turned to distrust, while they beheld her in a
foreign garb, and viewed her as the ally of the
white man. But when she came back to them a
destitute, houseless, deserted woman, they received
her with kindness, restored her to the place she
had occupied in their confidence, and poured out
bitter curses upon her faithless husband. As she
repeated the story of her abandonment, even in
the softened language of an unwilling accuser,
their indignant comments showed that they had
made her cause their own. Bolingbroke was no
longer protected by the mysterious power of the
dreaded chief, his rivals had already supplanted
him in the affections of the tribe, and his last
offence overturned the tottering fabric of his
popularity
.
The passions of the Indian know no
medium: what they condemn they hate, and
whatever
they hate they destroy. The doom of the
trader was deliberately fixed. It was unsparing
and irrevocable. Him, and his household, and all
that he possessed, were solemnly doomed to death
and plunder.
The following morning Menae stood in a secluded
spot, at some distance from the encampment, in
earnest conversation with a young warrior of a
bold and prepossessing appearance, whose hand
was twisted in the mane of a fiery steed.
You know the white trader? said she.
Yes, he gave me a blanket once.
Was that all?
The first time that I went to hunt he filled
my horn with powder, and promised me good
luck.
Think once more. You owe a larger debt
than either of those to the white trader.
When my father was killed by the Sioux, and
I was badly wounded, none of the Omawhaws took
pity on me, for there was a scarcity in the village.
You took me into your wigwam, cured my wounds,
and fed me with the white man's provisions.
You owe him your life.
I owe it to you.
To us both.
I am willing to pay the debt. I have often
said that I would die for the New Moon, and I
am not unfriendly to the trader; I have eaten his
bread.
You can be secret?
The serpent, which has no voice, is not more
secret than I.
Go to the white trader. Let none see you
departlet none but him see you at the principal
village of the Omawhaws. Tell him that Menae
sent youthat she, who helped to build up his
fortune, who has for years watched over his safety,
now warns him of danger, and bids him fly to the
settlements of his own people. Say that the spirit
of my father has whispered in my ear that the
Omawhaws have predicted the death of the trader.
Tell him that I shall never see him againI
would not condescend to be his wife, or his
servant
;
I would starve rather than eat his bread
but I should grieve to see the father of my
children
die the death of a dog, or the pale girl, whom
he has chosen for his wife, suffering the penalty of
his crime. He knows I would not deceive him.
I have but one tongueit has always spoken the
truth. We walked together for yearsI have
looked back at my path, and find that it is white.
Bid them fly to the fires of the white people,
before
another moon shall be seen in the place of that
which is now waning. And say to Bolingbroke
to the white traderthat if he feels any gratitude
to her who has more than once been a true friend
in the hour of peril, and now saves him, and his
new wife, from the rage of the Omawhaws, he
will restore her daughter to the arms of its
mother
.
Let him do this, and Menae will forgive
his faithless treatment of herself, and forget all
her sorrows.
The young Indian bent his head, and listened
attentively, as Menae pronounced these words
with a rapid but distinct utterance. He then
said, respectfully,
It shall be donethough it grieves me to
disappoint
the Omawhaw warriors of their just
vengeance
.
But the daughter of Blackbird was a
mother to me, when I was a sick boy; I will be a
son to her now that I am a man. When I had
no home, I slept in the white man's house: it
shall not be burned over his head.
He loosened his hand from the mane of the
young horse, on whose neck he leaned, and the
liberated animal dashed away over the plain,
snuffing the keen air of the morning, and throwing
up the snow with his heels.
Why turn loose your horse, enquired his
companion, when you have immediate use for
his services?
The Indian smiled, and said, No man rides
on horseback when his business is secret. My
own feet will leave no track upon the frozen snow.
I have a store of dried meat hidden in the woods,
which I can easily find. Farewell. The grayest
head among the Omawhaws shall not find my
trail, nor discover my errand.
Shortly after this event, the Indians learned, to
their great disappointment, that Bolingbroke had
suddenly abandoned the village, with all his
property
,
and announced his intention to return no
more; but they never discovered the cause of his
abrupt departure. On the next visit of the other
traders to St. Louis, the daughter of Menae was
placed under their charge, to be delivered to her
mother, who received her child with the joy of
one who had mourned over a first born. She
lived afterwards in retirement, seldom appearing
at the festivals of the nation, and observing the
decent gravity of a widowed matroncarefully
bringing up her children after the fashion of her
own people, and continually advising them to
avoid the society, the customs, and the vices, of
the whites.
THE END.